   #alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate
   alternate alternate

   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-MB43D4S

   ____________________ ⚲
   SupportPartnersBlogCompany
     * Products

DATA CENTER
         ______________________________________________________________

       Storage Systems
       All-Flash & Hybrid Storage
       Cloud Object Systems
       Storage Platforms
       JBOF & JBOD
       Storage Servers
       COMPOSABLE INFRASTRUCTURE
       Data Center Drives
       Solid State (SSD)
       Hard Disk (HDD)

Mobility, Edge & Computing
         ______________________________________________________________

       Embedded & Removable Flash
       Automotive
       Connected Home
       Industrial and IoT
       Smartphone & Tablet
       Surveillance
       Internal Drives
       Computing
       Enterprise
       Gaming
       NAS
       Surveillance
       View Products A-Z
   For personal storage solutions visit these Western Digital brands
       At G-Technology® we design some of the highest-performing and most
       reliable leading-edge storage solutions for end-to-end creative
       workflows.
       Every day, millions of people count on the performance, quality,
       and reliability of SanDisk®-branded products.
       Upthere®, a Western Digital brand, is transforming the personal
       storage market by providing a new and better way to keep, find, and
       share what’s important and meaningful.
       WD® is a leading global data storage brand that empowers people to
       create, manage, experience and preserve digital content on a range
       of devices.

Fueled by

Darkness
       The WD BLACK SN750 M.2 NVMe SSD packs a powerful punch, delivering
       read speeds up to 3,470MB/s* to intensify your gaming experience.
       Learn More
       *Up to the stated speed. Values derived from internal testing;
       performance may vary depending upon drive capacity, host device, OS
       and application.
     * Solutions

Industries
         ______________________________________________________________

       Automotive & Transportation
       Banking & Finance
       Government
       Health Care & Research
       Media & Entertainment
       Oil & Gas
       Telecommunications

Use Cases
         ______________________________________________________________

       Application Workload
       Big Data
       Data Protection & Management
       Hybrid Cloud
       IoT & Edge
       Surveillance
       Virtualization
   For personal storage solutions visit these Western Digital brands
       At G-Technology® we design some of the highest-performing and most
       reliable leading-edge storage solutions for end-to-end creative
       workflows.
       Every day, millions of people count on the performance, quality,
       and reliability of SanDisk®-branded products.
       Upthere®, a Western Digital brand, is transforming the personal
       storage market by providing a new and better way to keep, find, and
       share what’s important and meaningful.
       WD® is a leading global data storage brand that empowers people to
       create, manage, experience and preserve digital content on a range
       of devices.
   [header-solutions-image-1-western-digital.png]

ROI in Less Than 3 Months
       Forrester examined the potential ROI your organization may realize
       using IntelliFlash storage.
       Download Now
     * Innovations

Innovations
         ______________________________________________________________

       Our Technology Focus
       Academic Collaborations
       Research publications
   image/svg+xml>
       Enabling a New Era of Open Data-Centric Computing Architectures.
       Learn More

GAME CHANGER SERIES
       Profiling the technologies and innovation that are moving the
       industry forward.
       Learn More
   A History of Innovation

   Contact

     * Products
          + Data Center
               o Storage Systems
                    # All-Flash & Hybrid Storage
                    # Cloud Object Storage
               o Storage Platforms
                    # JBOF & JBOD
                    # Storage Servers
                    # COMPOSABLE INFRASTRUCTURE
               o Data Center Drives
                    # Solid State (SSD)
                    # Hard Disk (HDD)
          + Mobility, Edge & Computing
               o Embedded & Removable Flash
                    # Automotive
                    # Connected Home
                    # Industrial and IoT
                    # Smartphone & Tablet
                    # Surveillance
               o Internal Drives
                    # Computing
                    # Enterprise
                    # Gaming
                    # NAS
                    # Surveillance
          + Personal Storage Solutions
               o G-Technology
               o SanDisk
               o Upthere
               o WD
          + All Products A-Z
     * Solutions
          + Industries
               o Automotive & Transportation
               o Banking & Finance
               o Government
               o Health Care & Research
               o Media & Entertainment
               o Oil & Gas
               o Telecommunications
          + Use Cases
               o Application Workload
               o Big Data
               o Data Protection & Management
               o Hybrid Cloud
               o IoT & Edge
               o Surveillance
               o Virtualization
     * Innovations
          + Our Technology Focus
          + Academic Collaborations
          + Publications
          + Risc-V
          + A History of Innovation
     * Partners
     * Support
     * Company
     * Blog
     * Contact
     * ⚲ ____________________

Legal

   Terms of Use
   Privacy Statement
   Cookie Statement
   Your California Privacy Rights
   Terms and Conditions of Sale (Consumer)
   Terms and Conditions of Sale (Commercial)
   Purchase Order Terms and Conditions
   California Supply Chain Act
   Copyright Policy
   Trademarks
   Warranty

   [{{languageTitle(x)}}]

     * {{unescape(item.title)}}
          + {{anchor.title}}

   .آخر تحديث في28 مايو 2018.

   تحكم شروط الاستخدام هذه (المشار إليها بلفظ "شروط الاستخدام") استخدامك
   (وفق ما يلي من تعريف) لمواقع شركة .Western Digital Technologies, Inc
   على الموقع الإلكتروني و/أو شركاتها الفرعية (والمشار إليهم جميعًا بلفظ
   "شركة "Western Digital" أو "نحن/صيغة المتحدث") والمحتوى والميزات
   والمواد والبرامج والمستندات ذات الصلة والخدمات المتاحة على تلك المواقع
   (ويشار إلى كل ذلك من مواقع إلكترونية ومحتوى وميزات ومواد وبرامج
   ومستندات ذات صلة وخدمات جميعًا بلفظ "الخدمات").

   هام – يُرجى القراءة بعناية – إذا لم توافق على شروط الاستخدام هذه، فإنه
   غير مصرح لك باستخدام الخدمات.

   ولمساعدتك على التنقل والعثور على أقسام محددة من شروط الاستخدام هذه،
   يرجى الرجوع إلى قائمة المحتويات التالية:

قبول شروط الاستخدام

   باستخدام الخدمات (وفق ما هو محدد أدناه): فإنك تتعهد وتضمن بأنك في سن
   الرشد على الأقل في المنطقة التي تقطنها وأنك تتمتع بجميع الصلاحيات
   والاختصاصات والتصاريح اللازمة للموافقة على شروط الاستخدام هذه والالتزام
   بها، كما تقر بأنك قد قرأت وفهمت شروط الاستخدام هذه وتوافق على الالتزام
   بها، وتوافق على الالتزام بجميع القوانين والأنظمة المعمول بها فيما يتصل
   باستخدامك للخدمات.

   وإذا كنت تستخدم الخدمات بالنيابة عن شركة أو منظمة أو كيان آخر، فيجب
   الإحاطة بما يلي: أنك مشمول بكلمة "أنت" إضافة إلى ذلك الكيان؛ وأنك تضمن
   وتتعهد بأنك ممثل معتمد للكيان وكل صلاحية إلزام الكيان بشروط الاستخدام
   هذه وأنك أنت (المستخدم) توافق على شروط الاستخدام هذه بالنيابة عن
   الكيان؛ وأنك أنت (المستخدم) توافق على أن هذا الكيان مسؤول من الناحية
   القانونية والمالية عن استخدام الخدمات بالإضافة إلى استخدام حساب
   المستخدم الخاص بك (وفق ما هو محدد أدناه) من جانب كل المرتبطين بالكيان
   الذي تمثله أنت (المستخدم)، بما في ذلك أي موظفين أو وكلاء أو متعاقدين.

التفسير

   لأغراض شروط الاستخدام هذه: يقصد بكلمة "الاستخدام" الوصول إلى حساب
   مستخدم أو إنشاؤه أو تصفحه (وفق ما هو محدد أدناه) على المواقع أو تحميل
   المحتوى أو المواد إليها أو تنزيل المحتوى أو المواد منها أو حتى استخدام
   الخدمات (وتكون للكلمات المشتقة من كلمة "الاستخدام" نفس المعاني)، ويشير
   ضمير الملكية فيما يخص المخاطب إليك أنك بصفتك مستخدم يستخدم الخدمات؛
   وجميع ما يدل على كلمة "يشمل" أو "مشمولة" أو "بما في ذلك" فتعتبر أنها
   متبوعة بالكلمات "على سبيل المثال لا الحصر".

التغييرات على شروط الاستخدام

   يجوز لنا تغيير شروط الاستخدام هذه -وفقًا لتقديرنا- في أي وقت من خلال
   تحديث هذه الصفحة. إذا واصلت استخدام الخدمات بعد هذا التغيير، فإنك تكون
   ملزمًا بتلك التغييرات. وبناءً عليه، يجب عليك زيارة هذه الصفحة بصفة
   دورية لمراجعة شروط الاستخدام هذه. إذا كانت هناك أية تغييرات غير مقبولة
   بالنسبة لك، فلا يحق لك مواصلة استخدام الخدمات.

شروط إضافية

   إننا نقدم مجموعة واسعة من المنتجات والخدمات، بما في ذلك المنتجات
   والخدمات البرمجية. قد تكون بعض المنتجات أو الخدمات المتاحة على مواقعنا
   الإلكترونية خاضعة لأحكام وشروط أخرى أو إضافية (ويشار إليها بلفظ "الشروط
   الإضافية"). وسوف تتم إتاحة هذه الشروط الإضافية مع المنتجات أو الخدمات
   ذات الصلة، كالنشر مباشرة على موقع الويب لتلك المنتجات أو الخدمات أو
   عرضها كمجموعة منفصلة من الأحكام والشروط في وقت الشراء أو التنزيل أو
   الاطلاع أو التصفح أو الاستخدام لهذه المنتجات أو الخدمات. وإلى حد سريان
   شروط الاستخدام هذه على تلك المنتجات أو الخدمات (على سبيل المثال، لأنها
   متاحة على مواقعنا الإلكترونية) لكنها غير متسقة مع الشروط الإضافية
   السارية على تلك المنتجات أو الخدمات، فتلغي تلك الشروط الإضافية الأحكام
   غير المتسقة في شروط الاستخدام وتحل محلها وتكون هي المقياس فيما يخص تلك
   المنتجات أو الخدمات.

الملكية

   إن الخدمات، بما في ذلك "الشكل والتنفيذ" (على سبيل المثال، النص والرسوم
   والصور والشعارات) والمحتوى ذي الملكية الخاصة والمعلومات والمواد الأخرى
   المشمولة في الخدمات محمية بموجب القانون، بما في ذلك قانون الملكية
   الفكرية وحقوق النشر والتوزيع والعلامات التجارية في الولايات المتحدة
   وغيرها من القوانين والمعاهدات الدولية. تقر أنت (المستخدم) بأن شركة
   Western Digital و/أو مرخصينها يمتلكون جميع الحقوق والملكية والمصلحة في
   الخدمات (بما في ذلك أي وجميع براءات الاختراع وحقوق النشر والتوزيع
   والأسرار التجارية والعلامات التجارية والعروض التعريفية والمعرفة العملية
   وأي وجميع حقوق الملكية الفكرية فيها أو المرتبطة بها)، كما توافق أنت
   (المستخدم) على عدم اتخاذ أي إجراء (إجراءات) غير متسقة مع حقوق ومصالح
   الملكية المشار إليها.

قيود المستخدم

   باستثناء ما هو مرخص به صراحة هنا، لا يجوز نسخ أي من الخدمات أو إعادة
   إنتاجها أو توزيعها أو إعادة نشرها أو تنزيل أو عرضها أو نشرها أو نقل بأي
   شكل أو بأية وسيلة، بما في ذلك الوسائل الإلكترونية أو الميكانيكية أو عن
   طريق النسخ أو التسجيل أو خلاف ذلك، دون الحصول على الموافقة الخطية
   المسبقة أو التصريح الخطي المسبق من مالك حقوق النشر والتوزيع. مع مراعاة
   الالتزام بشروط الاستخدام هذه، تمنح شركة Western Digital بموجب ذلك
   للمستخدم حقًا محدودًا غير حصري بالوصول إلى المواد المشمولة في الخدمة
   واستخدامها، وفي كل الأحوال من أجل الاستخدام الشخصي غير التجاري فقط،
   وشريطة عدم تعديل أو إعادة بيع هذه المواد أو استخدامها استخدامًا
   تجاريًا. ويُلغى هذا التصريح تلقائيًا في حالة مخالفة المستخدم لأي من
   شروط الاستخدام هذه. وعند الإنهاء، يجب عليك تدمير أية مواد تم الحصول
   عليها من الخدمات على الفور.

   كما توافق أنت (المستخدم) على عدم: إزالة أو تغيير أي إشعارات أو بحقوق
   النشر والتوزيع أو حقوق الملكية الخاصة الأخرى أو شعار الحقوق المقيدة
   المشمول أو المضمّن في الخدمات؛ أو إلغاء ترجمة أو إلغاء تجميع أو إجراء
   ترجمة عكسية أو تجميع عكسي أو حتى إجراء هندسة عكسية على أي من الخدمات أو
   التحديثات أو أي جزء منها (باستثناء ما يكون محظورًا من القيود السابق
   ذكرها بموجب القانون المرعي وحتى حدود هذا الحظر)؛ أو استخدام أي وسيلة
   لكشف أي شيفرة مصدر سرية لأي جزء من الخدمات؛ أو العبث بأي وظيفة من شأنها
   التحكم في الوصول إلى الخدمات أو تحمي الخدمات.

   كما توافق أنت (المستخدم) على عدم استخدام أي طريقة للتحرش أو الإساءة أو
   الترصد أو التهديد أو التشهير أو الانتهاك أو حتى مخالفة حقوق أي جهة أخرى
   أو تحميل، أو نشر، أو إرسال بالبريد الإلكتروني، أو نقل، أو حتى إتاحة أي
   محتوى غير قانوني، أو ضار أو ينطوي على تهديد، أو بذيء، أو ينطوي على
   تحرش، أو ملتوٍ، أو تشهيري، أو سوقي، أو فاحش، أو فاضح، أو يتعدى على
   خصوصية الغير، أو يحض على الكراهية، أو مرفوض من الناحية العنصرية أو
   الأخلاقية. كما توافق أنت (المستخدم) على أن شركة Western Digital غير
   مسؤولة بأي حال من الأحوال عن أي استخدام من هذا النوع من جانبك، ولا عن
   أي تحرش أو تهديد أو تشهير أو إساءة أو رسائل أو مراسلات غير قانونية قد
   تتلقاها نتيجة استخدام الخدمات. كما توافق أنت (المستخدم) على عدم انتهاك
   أي من القوانين المعمول بها -بقصد أو بدون قصد- فيما يتصل باستخدامك
   للخدمات. وفي حالة مخالفتك لأي مما سبق، فقد تخضع للمقاضاة والتعويضات.

   وتقر أنت (المستخدم) أنه -وباستثناء ما هو منصوص عليه بشكل صريح في هذه
   الوثيقة- لا يفَسَّر أي مما ورد في شروط الاستخدام هذه بأنه منح لك أي
   ترخيص من براءات اختراع مرخصينا أو حقوق الملكية الفكرية، سواء كان ذلك
   تصريحًيا أو ضمنًيا أو خلافه، كما توافق أنت المستخدم بتحملك المسؤولية
   وحدك عن الحصول على تلك التراخيص بموجب اتفاقية خطية منفصلة. فقد يؤدي
   الاستخدام غير المرخص لأي من الخدمات لانتهاك حقوق النشر والتوزيع وقوانين
   العلامات التجارية وقوانين الخصوصية والنشر وقيود وقوانين الاتصالات.

تسجيل الحساب وعمليات الاشتراك

   يجوز لك أنت (المستخدم) تسجيل حساب لاستخدام بعض مزايا الخدمات أو أجزاء
   منها (ويشار إليه بلفظ "حساب المستخدم"). ويجوز لك إنشاء حساب مستخدم من
   خلال إكمال عملية التسجيل المنصوص عليها في القسم المقابل لها من الخدمات.
   وأنت (المستخدم) مسؤول عن توفير معلومات حساب دقيقة ومحتلنة.

   كما أنك أنت (المستخدم) هو المستخدم المرخص الوحيد لحساب المستخدم الخاص
   بك. وتتحمل أنت (المستخدم) مسؤولية الحفاظ على سرية أي كلمة مرور ورقم
   حساب مقدم منك أو من شركة Western Digital من أجل استخدام الخدمات. وأنت
   (المستخدم) مسؤول بالكامل عن جميع الأنشطة التي تتم باسم حساب المستخدم
   الخاص بك. وقد لا يكون لشركةWestern Digital أي رقابة أو سيطرة على
   استخدام حساب المستخدم الخاص بك أو بأي مستخدم آخر، كما تخلي شركة Western
   Digital مسؤوليتها عن أي تبعية تحدث جراء ذلك.

ممارسات الخصوصية

   يخضع استخدامك للخدمات لسياسة الخصوصية المتبعة لدينا، والمتاحة من خلال
   النقر هنا (والمشار إليها بلفظ "بيان الخصوصية"). يُرجى مراجعة بيان
   الخصوصية للتعرف على ممارسات الخصوصية المتبعة لدينا.

منح ترخيص المحتوى للمستخدم

   من بين شروط استخدامك للخدمات، يعد نشر أو تحميل أو إعلان أو تقديم أو عرض
   أو نقل أي محتوى أو مواد أخرى من خلال الخدمات (والمشار إليها بلفظ
   "المحتوى الخاص بك")، منحًا من جانبك لشركةWestern Digital ترخيصًا غير
   حصري وأبدي ولا يمكن الرجوع فيه وبدون أي رسوم وعالمي وقابل للتنازل وقابل
   للترخيص من الباطن بالكامل (بما في ذلك المستخدمين الآخرين للخدمات)
   بالوصول واستخدام وإعادة إنتاج ونقل وعرض ونشر وتوزيع وأداء عام وعرض عام
   وتعديل وتنقيح وإنشاء أعمال مشتقة من المحتوى الخاص بك وتضمين المحتوى
   الخاص بك في أعمال أخرى بأي تنسيق أو وسيط معروف الآن أو يتم تطويره
   لاحقًا لأي ولجميع الأغراض التجارية أو غير التجارية. وتضمن أنت
   (المستخدم) وتقر: بأنك تملك أو تسيطر على جميع الحقوق في المحتوى الخاص
   بك، بما في ذلك حقوق النشر والتوزيع؛ وأن المحتوى الخاص بك دقيق ولا يخالف
   أو يضر حقوق الملكية الفكرية لأي جهة أخرى، بما في ذلك حقوق النشر
   والخصوصية؛ وأن استخدام المحتوى الخاص بك لا يخالف شروط الاستخدام أو
   سياسة الخصوصية ولن يؤدي لإلحاق الضرر بأي شخص أو كيان. لا نتولى أي
   مسؤولية أو نتحمل أي تبعية عن أي محتوى أو مواد أخرى مقدمة أو منشورة من
   خلال الخدمات سواء من جانبك أنت (المستخدم) أو من جهة أخرى. وإلى حد
   احتواء المحتوى الخاص بك على أي صور، فإنك أنت (المستخدم) تتعهد وتضمن بأن
   كل شخص تم تصويره في تلك الصور -إن وجد- قد قدم موافقته على استخدام الصور
   وفق ما هو منصوص عليها في شروط الاستخدام هذه.

   ونحتفظ بالحق في الفحص المسبق أو رفض أو تعديل أو إزالة أي محتوى أو مادة
   على الخدمات لأي سبب، بما في ذلك إذا ما قررنا وفق تقديرنا وحدنا أن هذا
   المحتوى أو هذه المادة تخالف أي قانون أو حق لأي شخص، أو تنتهك حقوق أي
   شخص، أو تكون غير مناسبة للنشر على الخدمات.

الوصول من خارج الولايات المتحدة

   تخضع الخدمات في إداراتها ورقابتها وتشغليها لنا من خلال مكاتبنا في
   الولايات المتحدة. ولا نقدم أي تعهد بأن الخدمات مناسبة أو متاحة
   للاستخدام في أماكن أخرى، كما أن الوصول والاطلاع عليها من مناطق تكون
   محتويات تلك الخدمات غير قانونية محظور. أما من يختارون استخدام الخدمات
   من مواقع أخرى فإنهم يقومون بذلك من تلقاء أنفسهم ويتحملون المسؤولية عن
   الامتثال للقوانين المحلية المعمول بها. في حالة استخدام أنت (المستخدم)
   للخدمات من مواقع أخرى، فتحمل أنت المسؤولية عن الامتثال للقوانين المحلية
   المعمول بها، بما في ذلك قوانين الاستيراد والتصدير للدول الأخرى. وتقر
   أنت (المستخدم) أن بعض أو جميع الخدمات، بما في ذلك المواد المشمولة فيها،
   قد تخضع لقوانين ولوائح إدارة التصدير الأمريكية، ولوائح العقوبات
   الاقتصادية لمكتب مراقبة الأصول الأجنبية التابع لوزارة الخزانة
   الأمريكية، وقوانين التصدير الخاصة بالدول الأخرى، وبأنه يُحظر تحويل
   الخدمات بما يخالف القانون الأمريكي أو قانون الدول الأخرى المعمول بها.
   كما توافق أنت (المستخدم) على عدم الحصول على أي من الخدمات أو أي منتج
   مباشر لها أو شحنه أو نقل أو تصديره أو إعادة تصديره -بشكل مباشر أو غير
   مباشر- إلى دول مفروض عليها حرمان أو حظر أو أي مواطني تلك الدول، أو
   استخدامها من أجل الأنشطة النووية أو الأسلحة الكيميائية البيولوجية أو
   مشروعات الصواريخ، ما لم تقدم حكومة الولايات المتحدة (أو الحكومة الأخرى
   ذات الصلة) موافقة على ذلك لتلك الأغراض. بوصولك واطلاعك أنت (المستخدم)
   على الموقع الإلكتروني، فإنك تتعهد وتضمن بأنك من غير المواطنين أو
   المقيمين أو القاطنين بشكل اعتيادي في أي دولة أو منطقة تخضع لعملية حظر
   من جانب حكومة الولايات المتحدة، وأنك غير مدرج كطرف خاضع لعقوبات على
   قائمة المواطنين المرصودين لاعتبارات خاصة والأشخاص المحظورين من جانب
   مكتب مراقبة الأصول الأجنبية. وتوافق أنت (المستخدم) على الالتزام الصارم
   بجميع قوانين التصدير وإعادة التصدير والاستيراد وتحمل المسؤولية وحدك عن
   الحصول على التراخيص اللازمة للتصدير أو إعادة التصدير أو الاستيراد حسبما
   تقتضي الضرورة.

الروابط المؤدية لمواقع وتطبيقات خارجية

   قد تحتوي الخدمات على روابط تؤدي إلى مواقع ويب وتطبيقات من جهات أخرى.
   وعلى الرغم من ذلك، يرجى توخي الحذر بأننا غير مسؤولين ولا نتحكم في هذه
   المواقع أو التطبيقات الأخرى. ولا تقدم شركة Western Digital أي تعهدات من
   أي نوع حيال أي من المواقع الإلكترونية أو التطبيقات الأخرى التي قد
   تطّلِع أنت (المستخدم) عليها من خلال الخدمات. وعندما تطّلِع على موقع أو
   تطبيق خارجي، حتى وإن كان موقعًا أو تطبيقًا يعرض شعار شركة Western
   Digital، فالأمر عائد إليك في اتخاذ الاحتياطات لضمان أنك توافق على شروط
   استخدام ذلك الموقع أو التطبيق وأن الموقع أو التطبيق خالٍ مما يسمى
   فيروسات وفيروسات متنقلة وفيروسات حصان طروادة، وغيرها من الأشياء ذات
   الطبيعة التدميرية. وتوافق أنت (المستخدم) على أن شركة Western Digital لا
   يتحمل بأي حال من الأحوال المسؤولية مهما كان عن أي مواقع إلكترونية أو
   تطبيقات للغير.

تحديد المسؤولية

   إلى أقصى ما يسمح به القانون المعمول به، فإننا لا نتحمل المسؤولية نحن
   ولا مديرينا ومسؤولينا وموظفينا ومستشارينا (والمشار إليهم جميعًا بلفظ
   "أطراف Western Digital") عن أية أضرار تحدث نتيجة لاستخدام أو تعديل أو
   الإسهام في أو نسخ أو توزيع أو تنزيل الخدمات أو عدم القدرة على القيام
   بأي مما سبق. ولا تتحمل Western Digital بأي حال من الأحوال المسؤولية عن
   أي أضرار غير مباشرة أو غير عادية أو تحذيرية أو عقابية أو خاصة أو عرضية
   أو استتباعية (بما في ذلك فقد البيانات أو العائد أو الأرباح أو الاستخدام
   أو الميزات الاقتصادية الأخرى)، مهما كان سببها سواء نتيجة الانتهاك أو
   المسؤولية التقصيرية، حتى وإن تمت إحاطة أطراف شركة Western Digital
   مسبقًا بإمكانية حدوث ذلك الضرر.

   كما توافق أنت (المستخدم) على تحملك المسؤولية وحدك عن الحماية المناسبة
   والنسخ الاحتياطي للبيانات و/أو المعدات المستخدمة فيما يتصل بالخدمات
   وأنك لن تقدم أي طلب أو ادعاء من أي نوع ضد أطراف شركة Western Digital
   بسبب فقد البيانات أو فقد الأرباح نتيجة استخدام الخدمات أو عدم القدرة
   على استخدامها.

   كما توافق أنت (المستخدم) على حماية أطراف شركة Western Digital بالكامل
   ودفع الضرر عنهم، وتتعهد أنت (المستخدم) أيضًا بعدم مقاضاة شركة Western
   Digital لأي دعاوى ذات صلة بالشركة. وإذا كان لديك أنت (المستخدم) أي أساس
   لطلب الحصول على تعويضات مادية (بما في ذلك مخالفة شروط الاستخدام هذه) من
   أي طرف تابع لشركة Western Digital فيما يتصل بالخدمات أو بشروط الاستخدام
   هذه، فإنك توافق أنت (المستخدم) على أن تعويضك الحصري هو الحصول على
   التعويضات من أطراف شركة Western Digital بمبلغ أقصاه يعادل رسوم الخدمات
   التي حصلت عليها للشهر الذي وقعت فيه المخالفة (بملبغ أقصاه 100.00دولار
   إذا كانت الدعاوى تتعلق بأي من الخدمات المجانية).

   وتسري هذه القيود على مسؤولية الأطراف الخاصة بشركة Western Digital سواء
   تم إشعار شركة Western Digital بإمكانية حدوث تلك الخسائر أو كان من
   الواجب أن تكون على دراية بتلك الاحتمالية. لا تسمح بعض الولايات بتحديد
   أو استثناء الأضرار الفرعية أو التبعية، وبالتالي فقد لا ينطبق عليكم
   التحديد أو الاستثناء المذكور أعلاه.

إخلاء المسؤولية

   تقر أنت (المستخدم) بأنك المتحمل وحدك لمخاطر الخدمات وأنك أنت المتحمل
   للخطر الإجمالي فيما يخص الجودة والأداء والدقة والجهد المقبول. تقدم جميع
   أجزاء الخدمات من جانب شركة Western Digital "كما هي" و"بجميع الأخطاء"
   و"حسب المتاح" فقط، بجميع العيوب وبدون أي ضمان من أي نوع. وبموجب ذلك
   تعلن شركة WESTERN DIGITAL صراحة عن إخلاء مسؤوليتها عن جميع التعهدات
   والضمانات والشروط فيما يخص الخدمات (بما في ذلك الاستخدام والأداء والدعم
   لتلك الخدمات)، سواء كانت صريحة أو ضمنية أو نظامية أو خلاف ذلك، بما في
   ذلك أي ضمانات ضمنية عن الملاءمة لأغراض خاصة والترويج التجاري والملكية
   الخاصة وعدم الانتهاك. ولا تقدم شركة Western Digital أية تأكيدات فيما
   يخص دقة النتائج أو المخرجات التي تستخرجها من الخدمات.

سياسة حقوق النشر والتوزيع ودعاوى انتهاك حقوق النشر والتوزيع حسب قانون الألفية
للملكية الفكرية

   بموجب العنوان 17، من قانون الولايات المتحدة، القسم 512(ج)، تتبع شركة
   Western Digital سياسة الرد على إشعارات الانتهاك المزعوم والتي تتوافق مع
   قانون الألفية لحقوق النشر والتوزيع الرقمي وغيره من قوانين حماية الملكية
   الفكرية الأخرى المعمول بها. علمًا بأننا نحترم الملكية الفكرية للآخرين.
   وإذا رأيت أنت (المستخدم) أن العمل الخاص بك تم نسخه بطريقة تمثل انتهاكاً
   لحقوق النشر والتوزيع، يُرجى استخدام الإجراءات المنصوص عليها في سياسة
   حقوق النشر والتوزيع.

سياسة استخدام العلامات التجارية

   العلامات التجارية والشعارات وعلامات الخدمات (والمشار إليها جميعًا بلفظ
   "العلامات") المعرفة مع توفير السلع والخدمات هي ملكية خاصة لشركة Western
   Digital أو لأطراف أخرى. ولا يجوز استخدام علامات شركة Western Digital
   إلا بموجب الشروط المقيدة وبموجب الحصول على الموافقة الخطية المسبقة من
   شركة Western Digital. علمًا بأن الموافقات تقدم على أساس كل حالة على
   حدة. ويجب أن تكون جميع الاستخدامات المعتمدة وفق التقيد الصارم بإرشادات
   استخدام العلامات التجارية والشعار المعتمدة لدينا. انقر هنا للاطلاع على
   قائمة غير حصرية بعلامات شركة Western Digital.

الحقوق الولايات المتحدة المُقيّدة

   تقدَّم الخدمات ومعها "حقوق مقيدة". ويخضع الاستخدام أو النسخ أو الإفصاح
   من جانب حكومة الولايات المتحدة للقيود المنصوص عليها في FAR52.227-14 وفي
   DFAR252.227-7013 et وما بعدها وما يخلفه (يخلفها)، أو أي من القوانين
   والأنظمة الأخرى المعمول بها. ويمثل استخدام الخدمات من جانب حكومة
   الولايات المتحدة إقرارًا بحقوق ملكيتنا الخاصة فيها.

اختيار القانون واستقلالية النصوص

   يخضع أي ادعاء أو مطالبة تنشأ عن أو تتعلق بالخدمات، بما في ذلك استخدام
   (أو عدم القدرة على استخدام) الخدمات لقوانين ولاية كاليفورنيا دون النظر
   إلى تضاربات المبادئ القانونية. وتوافق أنت (المستخدم) على الخضوع
   للاختصاص القانوني الحصري للولاية والمحاكم الفيدرالية في مقاطعة سانتا
   كلارا، بولاية كاليفورنيا، من أجل حل أي وجميع النزاعات التي تنشأ عن أو
   تتصل باستخدامك للخدمات. وإذا ما تم اعتبار أي من الأحكام الواردة في شروط
   الاستخدام هذه غير صحيح أو فاسد أو كانت غير نافذة لأي سبب من الأسباب،
   فيعتبر هذا الحكم منفصلاً ولا يؤثر على صحة ونفاذ أي من الأحكام المتبقية
   في شروط الاستخدام هذه.

   يحق لمستخدمي الخدمات من ولاية كاليفورنيا الحصول على إشعار حقوق المستخدم
   الخاصة التالية: يمكن الاتصال بوحدة مساعدة الشكاوى في شعبة خدمات العملاء
   التابعة لإدارة شئون العملاء في ولاية كاليفورنيا خطيًا على
   1625 North Market Blvd., Suite N 112, Sacramento, CA 95834، أو عن طريق
   الهاتف على (800) 952-5210.

البيانات التطلعية

   قد تحتوي بعض المعلومات حول الخدمات التي نقدمها، بما في ذلك مواقعنا على
   الويب مثل موقع investor.wdc.com، بيانات تطلعية في حدود معاني قوانين
   السندات الفيدرالية، بما في ذلك البيانات المتعلقة بالفعاليات المستقبلية،
   والخطط التشغيلية والمالية في المستقبل أو الأداء التشغيلي أو المالي،
   والنمو المتوقع لشركتنا، والاتجاهات في أعمالنا والأسواق التي نعمل بها،
   والسمات الأخرى للفعاليات أو الظروف المستقبلية. تستند جميع البيانات التي
   لا تعد حقائق تاريخية إلى توقعاتنا الحالية وهي تخضع لعدد من المخاطر
   والشكوك التي قد تؤدي إلى اختلاف النتائج الفعلية اختلافًا ماديًا عن
   النتائج المعبر عنها أو المضمّنة في البيانات التطلعية. علمًا بأن المزيد
   من المعلومات حول المخاطر والشكوك التي قد تؤثر على أعمالنا مدرج في
   ملفاتنا المقدمة إلى هيئة الأوراق والتداولات المالية الأميركية ("SEC")
   وهي متاحة على موقع SEC على الويب على www.sec.gov، بما في ذلك آخر
   التقارير الدورية المدرجة، التي يتوجه إليها انتباهك. لا يجب عليك
   الاعتماد اعتمادًا كبيرًا على هذه البيانات التطلعية. فنحن لا نقدم أي
   التزام بتحديث أي بيانات تطلعية للجماهير أو مراجعتها، سواء نتيجة
   لمعلومات جديدة أو تطورات مستقبلية أو خلاف ذلك باستثناء ما يقتضيه
   القانون.

التغييرات على الخدمات

   تحتفظ شركة Western Digital بالحق في تغيير أو وقف الخدمات (أو أي جزء
   منها) -بشكل مؤقت أو دائم- أو المنتجات أو الخدمات المشار إليها هنا، في
   أي وقت دون سابق إشعار. وعند أي إنهاء للخدمات أو أي جزء منها، ليس ثمة
   التزام على شركة Western Digital بتقديم أو الحفاظ على المحتوى الخاص بك
   أو بيانات أخرى.

اتصل بنا

   إذا كانت لديك أسئلة أو شكاوى أو تعليقات حول شروط الاستخدام، أو إذا رغبت
   في الحصول على المزيد من المعلومات فيما يخص الخدمات، أو إذا كانت ترغب في
   الاتصال بشركة Western Digital، يُرجى الاتصال بنا من خلال المعلومات
   الموجودة على صفحة اتصل بشركة Western Digital.

     * {{unescape(item.title)}}
          + {{anchor.title}}

   Zuletzt aktualisiert am 28. Mai, 2018.

   Diese Benutzungsbedingungen (diese “Benutzungsbedingungen”) gelten für
   Ihre Benutzung (wie nachstehend definiert) der von Western Digital
   Technologies, Inc. und/oder ihren Konzerngesellschaften (kollektiv
   “Western Digital”, “wir” oder “unser/e/er/es”) zur Verfügung gestellten
   Websites und deren Inhalte, Merkmale, deren Material, Software und der
   damit verbundenen Dokumente ebenso wie für die auf diesen Websites
   erhältlichen Dienstleistungen (solche Websites, Inhalte, Merkmale,
   solches Material, solche Software und die damit verbundenen Dokumente
   und Dienstleistungen sind kollektiv die ‚Dienstleistungen‘).

   WICHTIG – BITTE SORGFÄLTIG LESEN – Falls Sie diese
   Benutzungsbedingungen nicht akzeptieren, sind Sie nicht zur Benutzung
   der Dienstleistungen berechtigt.

   Um Ihnen die Navigation und den Zugriff auf spezifische Abschnitte
   dieser Benutzungsbedingungen zu erleichtern, benutzen Sie bitte die
   nachstehende Inhaltsübersicht:

Annahme dieser Benutzungsbedingungen

   Durch die Benutzung (wie nachstehend definiert) der Dienstleistungen:
   Sie gewährleisten, dass Sie gemäß dem Recht des für Sie geltenden
   Hoheitsgebiets volljährig und in vollem Umfang ermächtigt sind, diese
   Benutzungsbedingungen rechtswirksam zu akzeptieren; Sie bestätigen,
   dass Sie diese Benutzungsbedingungen gelesen und zur Kenntnis genommen
   haben und durch diese verpflichtet sind; und Sie bestätigen, dass Sie
   in Verbindung mit Ihrer Benutzung der Dienstleistungen alle in Frage
   kommenden Gesetze und Verordnungen beachten werden.

   Falls Sie die Dienstleistungen im Namen einer juristischen Person oder
   sonstigen Entität benutzen, dann schließt “Sie” sowohl Sie als auch
   diese juristische Person oder diese Entität ein, und Sie gewährleisten,
   dass Sie ein ordnungsgemäß Bevollmächtigter dieser juristischen Person
   oder dieser Entität sind und folglich ermächtigt sind, die juristische
   Person oder die Entität im Rahmen dieser Benutzungsbedingungen zu
   verpflichten und dass Sie diese Benutzungsbedingungen im Namen der
   juristischen Person oder der Entität akzeptieren; und Sie bestätigen
   außerdem, dass eine solche juristische Person oder eine solche Entität
   rechtlich und finanziell für Ihre Benutzung  der Dienstleistungen
   verantwortlich ist ebenso wie für die Benutzung Ihres Benutzerkontos
   (wie nachstehend definiert) durch mit der juristischen Person oder der
   Entität verbundene andere, einschließlich Arbeitnehmern, Vertretern
   oder Auftragnehmern.

Auslegung

   Für die Zwecke dieser Benutzungsbedingungen: Das Verb “benutzen”
   bedeutet zugreifen, browsen, Erstellung eines Benutzerkontos (wie
   nachstehend definiert), das Heraufladen von Inhalt oder Material, das
   Herunterladen von Inhalt oder Material oder die anderweitige Benutzung
   der Dienstleistungen (und die Substantive “Benutzen” und ‘”Benutzung”
   haben eine entsprechende Bedeutung); die Begriffe “Sie” und “Ihr(e)”
   beziehen sich auf Sie in Ihrer Eigenschaft als ein Benutzer, der die
   Dienstleistungen benutzt, und alle Bezugnahmen auf die Wörter
   „einschließen“, „eingeschlossen“ oder „einschließlich“ erfolgen stets
   unter Annahme des Zusatzes „unter anderem“.

Änderungen dieser Benutzungsbedingungen

   WIR KÖNNEN DIESE BENUTZUNGSBEDINGUNGEN NACH UNSEREM ALLEINIGEN ERMESSEN
   JEDERZEIT DURCH EINE AKTUALISIERUNG DIESER SEITE ÄNDERN. FALLS SIE DIE
   DIENSTLEISTUNGEN NACH EINER SOLCHEN ÄNDERUNG WEITERHIN IN ANSPRUCH
   NEHMEN, SIND SIE IM RAHMEN DER ÄNDERUNG VERPFLICHTET. FOLGLICH SOLLTEN
   SIE DIESE SEITE IN REGELMÄSSIGEN ZEITLICHEN ABSTÄNDEN BESUCHEN, UM SICH
   MIT DER JEWEILS NEUESTEN FASSUNG DER BENUTZUNGSBEDINGUNGEN VERTRAUT ZU
   MACHEN. FALLS SIE MIT EINER SOLCHEN ÄNDERUNG NICHT EINVERSTANDEN SIND,
   DÜRFEN SIE DIE DIENSTLEISTUNGEN NICHT LÄNGER IN ANSPRUCH NEHMEN.

Zusätzliche Bedingungen

   Wir bieten ein breites Produkt- und Dienstleistungsspektrum,
   einschließlich Softwareprodukten und -dienstleistungen. Für bestimmte
   auf unseren Websites zur Verfügung stehende Produkte oder
   Dienstleistungen kommen unter Umständen zusätzliche Bedingungen
   („Zusätzliche Bedingungen“) in Frage. Diese zusätzlichen Bedingungen
   werden im Zusammenhang mit den relevanten Produkten oder
   Dienstleistungen angegeben, wie z.B. durch direkte Angabe auf der
   jeweiligen Website dieser Produkte oder Dienstleistungen oder durch
   Angabe als separate Bedingungen zum Kauf-, Download-, Zugriffs-,
   Browsing- oder Benutzungszeitpunkt dieser Produkte oder
   Dienstleistungen. In dem Umfang, in dem die vorliegenden
   Benutzungsbedingungen für jene Produkte oder Dienstleistungen gelten,
   (z. B. weil sie auf unseren Websites angeboten werden), jedoch nicht
   mit den für jene Produkte oder Dienstleistungen geltenden zusätzlichen
   Bedingungen übereinstimmen, sind die entsprechenden zusätzlichen
   Bedingungen für die fraglichen Produkte oder Dienstleistungen
   maßgebend.

Eigentum

   Die Dienstleistungen, einschließlich ihres “Look and Feel” (z.B. Text,
   Graphik, Bilder und Logos), ihres geschützten Inhalts, ihrer
   Informationen und des sonstigen darin enthaltenen Materials, sind
   gesetzlich geschützt, einschließlich durch gewerbliche Schutzrechte,
   Urheberrechte, Markenrechte und sonstiges Recht der Vereinigten Staaten
   ebenso wie durch internationale Abkommen. Sie bestätigen, dass Western
   Digital und/oder unsere jeweiligen Lizenzgeber Eigentümer aller Rechte
   und Ansprüche an den Dienstleistungen sind (einschließlich aller
   Patente, Urheberrechte, Geschäftsgeheimnisse, Markenzeichen sowie
   Show-how, Know-how und einschließlich aller anderen dafür geltenden
   oder damit verbundenen gewerblichen Schutzrechte), und Sie bestätigen,
   dass Sie keine Handlungen ergreifen werden, die diesen
   Eigentumsinteressen zuwiderlaufen.

Benutzungsbeschränkungen

   Außer wie ausdrücklich hierin vorgesehen, darf keine Dienstleistung
   ohne unsere vorherige schriftliche Einwilligung oder die vorherige
   schriftliche Einwilligung des Urheberrechtseigentümers in irgendeiner
   Weise kopiert, reproduziert, verteilt, neu veröffentlicht,
   heruntergeladen, dargestellt, gepostet oder übermittelt werden, und
   zwar weder elektronisch, mechanisch, durch Ablichtung, Aufzeichnung
   oder anderweitig. Vorbehaltlich Ihrer Compliance mit diesen
   Benutzungsbedingungen erteilt Ihnen Western Digital hiermit eine
   begrenzte einfache Lizenz zum Zugriff auf das in den Dienstleistungen
   enthaltene Material und zu dessen Benutzung, und zwar jeweils nur zum
   persönlichen, nichtgewerblichen Gebrauch sowie unter der Voraussetzung,
   dass Sie das entsprechende Material nicht modifizieren, weiterverkaufen
   oder gewerblich verwerten. Diese Lizenz endet automatisch, falls Sie
   eine der Bestimmungen dieser Benutzungsbedingungen verletzen. Im Falle
   einer solchen Beendigung müssen Sie das gesamte durch die
   Dienstleistungen erhaltene Material sofort vernichten.

   Sie bestätigen, dass Sie keine der folgenden Handlungen vornehmen
   werden: Entfernung oder Änderung von Urheberrechts- oder sonstigen
   gewerblichen Schutzrechtsvermerken oder Beschränkungshinweisen, die in
   den Dienstleistungen enthalten sind; Dekompilation, Zerlegung,
   Rückkompilation, Rückzerlegung oder anderweitige Rückzerlegung von
   Dienstleistungen, Updates oder Teilen davon (außer falls und nur in dem
   Umfang, in dem die obige Beschränkung durch geltendes Recht verboten
   ist); Benutzung beliebiger Mittel zur Entdeckung vertraulicher
   Quellcodes von Teilen der Dienstleistungen; oder Umgehung von
   Funktionalitäten, die den Zugriff auf die Dienstleistungen
   kontrollieren oder anderweitig schützen.

   Sie bestätigen ferner, dass Sie die Dienstleistungen in keiner Weise
   dazu benutzen werden, Dritte zu schikanieren, zu stalken, zu bedrohen,
   zu diffamieren, zu missachten oder deren Rechte anderweitig zu
   verletzen oder Inhalt heraufzuladen, zu posten, per E-Mail zu senden,
   zu übermitteln oder anderweitig zur Verfügung zu stellen, der
   rechtswidrig, schädlich, bedrohlich, beleidigend, schikanös, unerlaubt,
   diffamierend, vulgär, obszön, verleumderisch, privatsphärenverletzend,
   gehässig oder rassisch, ethnisch oder anderweitig verwerflich ist. Sie
   bestätigen, dass Western Digital in keiner Weise für eine derartige
   Benutzung durch Sie verantwortlich ist ebenso wenig wie für schikanöse,
   bedrohliche, diffamierende, beleidigende oder rechtswidrige
   Mitteilungen oder Übermittlungen, die Sie unter Umständen aufgrund der
   Benutzung der Dienstleistungen erhalten. Sie bestätigen, dass Sie weder
   absichtlich noch unabsichtlich Gesetze verletzen werden, die in
   Verbindung mit Ihrer Benutzung der Dienstleistungen in Frage kommen.
   Falls Sie gegen die obigen Bestimmungen verstoßen, werden Sie unter
   Umständen strafrechtlich verfolgt und auf Schadenersatz verklagt.

   Sie bestätigen, dass, außer wie hierin ausdrücklich festgehalten,
   nichts in diesen Benutzungsbedingungen dahingehend ausgelegt werden
   kann, dass Ihnen eine Lizenz für unsere Patente oder die unserer
   Patentgeber oder im Hinblick auf andere gewerbliche Schutzrechte
   erteilt wird, und zwar gleichgültig, ob durch unzulässige
   Rechtsausübung, Implikation oder anderweitig, und Sie bestätigen, dass
   Sie allein für die Einholung solcher Lizenzen im Rahmen separater
   schriftlicher Vereinbarungen verantwortlich sind. Die unbefugte
   Benutzung von Dienstleistungen verletzt unter Umständen Urheber-,
   Marken- und Datenschutzrechte sowie Persönlichkeitsrechte ebenso wie
   gesetzliche Kommunikationsverordnungen und -vorschriften.

Kontoregistrierung und Abonnements

   Unter Umständen müssen Sie ein Konto einrichten, um bestimmte Merkmale
   oder Abschnitte der Dienstleistungen benutzen zu können (ein
   „Benutzerkonto“). Sie können ein Konto durch die Befolgung des
   Registrierungsverfahrens einrichten, das sich im entsprechenden
   Abschnitt der Dienstleistungen befindet. Sie müssen in diesem
   Zusammenhang richtige und aktuelle Informationen angeben.

   Sie sind der einzige befugte Benutzer Ihres Benutzerkontos. Sie sind
   für die vertrauliche Behandlung von Passwörtern und Kontonummern
   verantwortlich, die Western Digital Ihnen zur Benutzung der
   Dienstleistungen zur Verfügung stellt. Sie sind in vollem Umfang für
   alle auf Ihrem Benutzerkonto stattfindenden Aktivitäten verantwortlich.
   Western Digital übt unter Umständen keine Kontrolle über die Benutzung
   Ihres Benutzerkontos oder anderer Benutzerkonten aus, und Western
   Digital lehnt in diesem Zusammenhang ausdrücklich jegliche Haftung ab.

Datenschutzverfahren

   Ihre Benutzung der Dienstleistungen erfolgt außerdem vorbehaltlich
   unserer Datenschutzerklärung, die durch Anklicken hier  eingesehen
   werden kann (die “Datenschutzerklärung”).  Bitte lesen Sie die
   Datenschutzerklärung durch, um sich über unsere Datenschutzverfahren zu
   informieren.

Lizenzerteilung für benutzerstellten Inhalt

   Als Bedingung Ihrer Benutzung der Dienstleistungen erteilen Sie Western
   Digital hiermit durch Posten, Heraufladen, Veröffentlichen, Vorlegen,
   Darstellen oder Übermitteln von Inhalt oder anderem Material durch die
   Dienstleistungen (“Ihr Inhalt”) eine einfache, unbefristete,
   unwiderrufliche, kostenlose, weltweite, übertragbare, voll
   unterlizenzierbare (einschließlich an andere Benutzer der
   Dienstleistungen) Lizenz, um auf Ihren Inhalt zuzugreifen, diesen zu
   benutzen, zu reproduzieren, zu übertragen, darzustellen, zu
   veröffentlichen, zu verteilen, öffentlich aufzuführen, öffentlich
   darzustellen, zu modifizieren, zu adaptieren und derivative Werke
   daraus zu erstellen und Ihren Inhalt zu allen gewerblichen und
   nicht-gewerblichen Zwecken in andere Werke in einem jetzigen oder
   zukünftigen Format oder Medium aufzunehmen. Sie gewährleisten, dass
   Ihnen alle mit Ihrem Inhalt verbundenen Rechte gehören oder dass sie
   diese kontrollieren, einschließlich Urheberrecht; dass Ihr Inhalt
   richtig ist und keine gewerblichen Schutzrechte Dritter verletzt oder
   widerrechtlich verwendet, einschließlich Persönlichkeits- und
   Datenschutzrechten, und dass die Benutzung Ihres Inhalts nicht diese
   Benutzungsbedingungen oder die Datenschutzerklärung verletzt und keiner
   natürlichen oder juristischen Person Schaden zufügen wird.  Wir
   übernehmen keine Verantwortung und keine Haftung für Inhalt oder
   anderes Material, das von Ihnen oder Dritten durch die Dienstleistungen
   vorgelegt oder gepostet wird. In dem Umfang, in dem Ihr Inhalt Bilder
   enthält, gewährleisten Sie außerdem, dass alle in solchen Bildern
   erscheinenden Personen ihre Einwilligung zur Benutzung der Bilder
   gegeben haben wie in diesen Benutzungsbedingungen angegeben.

   WIR BEHALTEN UNS DAS RECHT VOR, JEDEN INHALT UND JEDES MATERIAL, DAS IN
   DEN DIENSTLEISTUNGEN VORHANDEN IST, AUS BELIEBIGEM GRUND
   VORZUSORTIEREN, ABZULEHNEN, ZU MODIFIZIEREN ODER ZU ENTFERNEN,
   EINSCHLIESSLICH, FALLS WIR NACH UNSEREM ALLEINIGEN ERMESSEN DER ANSICHT
   SIND, DASS DER JEWEILIGE INHALT ODER DAS JEWEILIGE MATERIAL
   RECHTSWIDRIG IST ODER DIE RECHTE VON PERSONEN VERLETZT ODER ANDERWEITIG
   ZUM POSTING IM RAHMEN DER DIENSTLEISTUNGEN UNGEEIGNET IST.

Zugriff von außerhalb der Vereinigten Staaten

   Wir kontrollieren und betreiben die Dienstleistungen von unseren
   Standorten in den Vereinigten Staaten. Wir leisten keine Gewähr dafür,
   dass die Dienstleistungen zur Benutzung an anderen Standorten geeignet
   oder verfügbar sind, und der Zugriff auf die Dienstleistungen ist von
   Gebieten verboten, in denen ihr Inhalt illegal ist. Jene, die die
   Dienstleistungen von anderen Standorten aus benutzen, tun dies aus
   eigener Initiative und sind folglich für die Compliance mit dem
   jeweiligen landesspezifischen Recht verantwortlich. Falls Sie die
   Dienstleistungen von anderen Standorten aus benutzen, sind Sie für die
   Befolgung der in Frage kommenden landesspezifischen Gesetze
   verantwortlich, einschließlich der Export- und Importvorschriften
   anderer Länder. Sie nehmen zur Kenntnis, dass bestimmte oder alle der
   Dienstleistungen, einschließlich des mit diesen verbundenen Materials,
   unter Umständen den United States Export Administration Laws and
   Regulations, den United States Treasury Department’s Office of Foreign
   Assets Control (“OFAC”) Economic Sanctions Regulations und den
   Exportgesetzen anderer Länder unterliegen und dass die Umleitung der
   Dienstleistungen unter Missachtung der Gesetze der Vereinigten Staaten
   oder anderer in Frage kommender Länder verboten ist. Sie bestätigen,
   dass keine der Dienstleistungen und kein sich direkt aus diesen
   ergebendes Produkt direkt oder indirekt von oder für verbotene oder
   durch ein Embargo belegte Länder oder deren Staatsangehörige direkt
   oder indirekt erworben, verschifft, transferiert, exportiert, oder
   reexportiert worden sind oder werden und außerdem nicht für nukleare
   Aktivitäten, chemische biologische Waffen oder Raketenprojekte in Frage
   kommen, außer falls mit der entsprechenden spezifischen Genehmigung der
   Regierung der Vereinigten Staaten (oder einer relevanten
   Regierungsbehörde). Durch den Zugriff auf die Website gewährleisten
   Sie, dass Sie kein Staatsangehöriger oder Gebietsansässiger oder eine
   Person mit gewöhnlichem Aufenthalt in einem Land oder einer Region
   sind, über die die Regierung der Vereinigten Staaten ein Embargo
   verhängt hat und dass sie keine von einer Sanktion betroffene Partei
   sind, die auf der Liste der speziell designierten Staatsangehörigen und
   gesperrten Personen erscheint, die von OFAC geführt wird. Sie
   bestätigen, dass Sie alle Export-, Reexport- und Importgesetze streng
   beachten werden und dass Sie die alleinige Verantwortung für die
   Einholung eventuell erforderlicher Export-, Reexport- oder
   Importlizenzen übernehmen.

Links zu Dritt-Websites und -Applikationen

   Die Dienstleistungen enthalten unter Umständen Links zu Dritt-Websites
   oder -Applikationen. Bitte nehmen Sie jedoch zur Kenntnis, dass wir für
   diese anderen Websites oder Applikationen nicht verantwortlich sind und
   diese nicht kontrollieren. Western Digital übernimmt keine
   Gewährleistungen irgendwelcher Art für andere Websites oder
   Applikationen, auf die Sie durch die Dienstleistungen zugreifen. Wenn
   Sie auf Dritt-Websites oder -Applikationen zugreifen, auch solche, auf
   denen unter Umständen das Logo von Western Digital erscheint, müssen
   Sie sicherstellen, dass Sie mit den Benutzungsbedingungen der
   jeweiligen Website oder Applikation einverstanden sind und dass die
   Website oder Applikation keine Viren, Würmer, Trojaner oder sonstige
   destruktive Software aufweist. Sie akzeptieren, dass Western Digital
   unter keinen Umständen in irgendeiner Weise für Dritt-Websites oder
   -Applikationen haftet.

Haftungsbeschränkung

   IM DURCH GELTENDES RECHT MAXIMAL ZULÄSSIGEN AUSMASS ÜBERNEHMEN WIR UND
   UNSERE VORSTANDS-/GESCHÄFTSFÜHRUNGSMITGLIEDER, FÜHRUNGSKRÄFTE,
   ARBEITNEHMER UND BERATER (KOLLEKTIV “DIE WESTERN-DIGITAL-PARTEIEN”)
   KEINE HAFTUNG FÜR SCHÄDEN AUFGRUND DER BENUTZUNG, MODIFIKATION,
   BEISTELLUNG, KOPIERUNG, VERTEILUNG ODER HERUNTERLADUNG DER
   DIENSTLEISTUNGEN ODER DER VERHINDERUNG DIESER TÄTIGKEITEN. UNTER KEINEN
   UMSTÄNDEN HAFTEN DIE WESTERN-DIGITAL-PARTEIEN FÜR INDIREKTEN,
   AUSSERORDENTLICHEN, ÜBERNORMALEN, PÖNALISIERENDEN ODER ATYPISCHEN
   SCHADENERSATZ ODER SCHADENERSATZ FÜR NEBEN- ODER FOLGEKOSTEN ODER
   MITTELBAREN SCHADEN (EINSCHLIESSLICH VERLUST VON DATEN, EINNAHMEN,
   GEWINN, NUTZUNG ODER SONSTIGER WIRTSCHAFTLICHER VORTEILE), UND ZWAR
   UNGEACHTET DER SCHADENURSACHE, EINSCHLIESSLICH VERTRAGSVERLETZUNG ODER
   UNERLAUBTER HANDLUNG, UND AUCH DANN, FALLS DIE WESTERN-DIGITAL-PARTEIEN
   ZUVOR AUF DIE JEWEILIGE SCHADENMÖGLICHKEIT HINGEWIESEN WORDEN SIND.

   SIE BESTÄTIGEN, DASS SIE ALLEINIG FÜR DEN ANGEMESSENEN SCHUTZ UND DIE
   SICHERUNG VON DATEN UND/ODER GERÄTEN VERANTWORTLICH SIND, DIE IM
   ZUSAMMENHANG MIT DEN DIENSTLEISTUNGEN BENUTZT WERDEN UND DASS SIE KEINE
   ANSPRÜCHE IRGENDWELCHER ART FÜR VERLOREN GEGANGENE DATEN, UNRICHTIGE
   LEISTUNG, ARBEITSVERZÖGERUNGEN ODER ENTGANGENEN GEWINN GELTEND MACHEN
   WERDEN, DIE AUF DER BENUTZUNG ODER VERHINDERTEN BENUTZUNG DER
   DIENSTLEISTUNGEN BERUHEN.

   SIE BESTÄTIGEN, DASS SIE DIE WESTERN-DIGITAL-PARTEIEN VON ALLEN MIT DEN
   DIENSTLEISTUNGEN VERBUNDENEN ANSPRÜCHEN FREISTELLEN UND IN DIESEM
   ZUSAMMENHANG NICHT VERKLAGEN WERDEN. FALLS SIE EINEN ANSPRUCH AUF
   SCHADENERSATZ (EINSCHLIESSLICH IM HINBLICK AUF EINE VERLETZUNG DIESER
   BENUTZUNGSBEDINGUNGEN) IN VERBINDUNG MIT DEN DIENSTLEISTUNGEN ODER
   DIESEN BENUTZUNGSBEDINGUNGEN GEGEN DIE WESTERN-DIGITAL-PARTEIEN GELTEND
   MACHEN MÖCHTEN, AKZEPTIEREN SIE, DASS IHRE EINZIGE ABHILFE AUS EINER
   SCHADENERSATZZAHLUNG DER WESTERN-DIGITAL-PARTEIEN IN HÖHE EINES
   BETRAGES BESTEHT, DER IHRER DIENSTLEISTUNGSGEBÜHR FÜR DEN MONAT
   ENTSPRICHT, IN DEM DIE VERTRAGSVERLETZUNG STATTFAND (ODER BIS ZU EINEM
   BETRAG VON MAXIMAL $ 100,00, FALLS SICH DER ANSPRUCH AUF KOSTENLOSE
   DIENSTLEISTUNGEN BEZIEHT).

   DIESE BESCHRÄNKUNGEN DER HAFTUNG DER WESTERN-DIGITAL-PARTEIEN GELTEN,
   GLEICHGÜLTIG, OB WESTERN DIGITAL AUF DIE MÖGLICHKEIT DERARTIGER SCHÄDEN
   AUFMERKSAM GEMACHT WURDE ODER VON DIESER MÖGLICHKEIT HÄTTE WISSEN
   MÜSSEN. BESTIMMTE STAATEN GESTATTEN NICHT DEN AUSSCHLUSS VON
   SCHADENERSATZ FÜR NEBEN- UND FOLGEKOSTEN UND FÜR MITTELBAREN SCHADEN,
   SO DASS DIE OBIGEN AUSSCHLÜSSE UNTER UMSTÄNDEN NICHT AUF SIE ZUTREFFEN.

Haftungsablehnung

   SIE BESTÄTIGEN AUSDRÜCKLICH, DASS DIE BENUTZUNG DER DIENSTLEISTUNGEN
   AUF IHR ALLEINIGES RISIKO ERFOLGT UND DASS DAS GESAMTE RISIKO IN BEZUG
   AUF AUSREICHENDE QUALITÄT, LEISTUNG, RICHTIGKEIT UND AUFWAND BEI IHNEN
   LIEGT. ALLE TEILE DER DIENSTLEISTUNGEN WERDEN VON WESTERN DIGITAL “OHNE
   MÄNGELGEWÄHR” UND UNTER VERFÜGBARKEITSVORBEHALT EBENSO WIE OHNE JEDE
   GEWÄHRLEISTUNG ERBRACHT. WESTEN DIGITAL LEHNT HIERMIT ALLE
   GEWÄHRLEISTUNGEN UND BEDINGUNGEN IM HINBLICK AUF DIE DIENSTLEISTUNGEN
   AB (EINSCHLIESSLICH DEREN BENUTZUNG, LEISTUNG UND UNTERSTÜTZUNG), UND
   ZWAR GLEICHGÜLTIG, OB AUSDRÜCKLICH, IMPLIZIERT, GESETZLICH ODER
   ANDERWEITIG, EINSCHLIESSLICH ALLER STILLSCHWEIGENDEN GEWÄHRLEISTUNGEN
   FÜR EIGNUNG FÜR EINEN BESTIMMTEN VERTRAGSZWECK, EIGNUNG FÜR DEN
   GEWÖHNLICHEN GEBRAUCH, RECHTSMÄNGELHAFTUNG UND NICHTVERLETZUNG VON
   PATENTEN. WESTERN DIGITAL LEISTET KEINE GEWÄHR IN BEZUG AUF DIE
   RICHTIGKEIT DER RESULTATE ODER LEISTUNGEN, DIE DURCH DIE
   DIENSTLEISTUNGEN HERVORGEBRACHT WERDEN.

Urheberrechtsbestimmungen und DMCA-Ansprüche aus Urheberrechtsverletzungen

   Laut Title 17, United States Code, Section 512(c) reagiert Western
   Digital grundsätzlich auf alle Mitteilungen behaupteter
   Schutzrechtsverletzungen, die gemäß dem Digital Millennium Copyright
   Act und anderen in Frage kommenden gewerblichen Schutzrechten erfolgen.
   Wir respektieren das geistige Eigentum anderer. Sollten Sie der Ansicht
   sein, dass Ihre Arbeit in einer Weise kopiert worden ist, die eine
   Urheberrechtsverletzung darstellt, befolgen Sie bitte das in unserer
   Copyright Policy  angegebene Verfahren.

Markengebrauchsrichtlinien

   Die in Verbindung mit der Benutzung unserer Waren und Dienstleistungen
   angegebenen Schutzmarken, Logos und Dienstleistungsmarken (kollektiv
   “Marken”) stellen das Eigentum von Western Digital oder Dritter dar.
   Die Marken von Western Digital dürfen nur unter begrenzten Umständen
   und mit vorheriger schriftlicher Einwilligung von Western Digital
   benutzt werden. Diese Einwilligungen erfolgen auf individueller Basis.
   Jede genehmigte Benutzung muss streng unseren Trademark and Logo Usage
   Guidelines entsprechen.  Bitte hier zur Einsichtnahme der Liste mit den
   wesentlichen Marken von Western Digital klicken.

Beschränkte Rechte der US-Regierung

   Die Dienstleistungen werden mit “RESTRICTED RIGHTS” (“beschränkte
   Rechte”) erbracht. Die Benutzung, Duplikation oder Offenlegung durch
   die Regierung der Vereinigten Staaten unterliegt den Beschränkungen
   gemäß FAR52.227-14 und DFAR252.227-7013 et seq., deren
   Anschlussbestimmungen oder anderen in Frage kommenden Gesetzen und
   Verordnungen. Die Benutzung der Dienstleistungen durch die US-Regierung
   konstituiert die Anerkennung unserer für die Dienstleistungen geltenden
   Schutzrechte.

Geltendes Recht; Salvatorische Klausel

   Alle Ansprüche aus oder in Verbindung mit den Dienstleistungen,
   einschließlich ihrer Benutzung (oder Nichtbenutzung), werden durch das
   Recht des Staates Kalifornien geregelt, und zwar ohne Bezugnahme auf
   Kollisionsrecht. Sie unterwerfen sich zur Beilegung aller Streitfälle
   aus Ihrer oder in Verbindung mit Ihrer Benutzung der Dienstleistungen
   der ausschließlichen Zuständigkeit der Staats- und Bundesgerichte in
   Santa Clara County, Kalifornien. Falls eine Bestimmung dieser
   Benutzungsbedingungen aus irgendeinem Grund als rechtsunwirksam,
   nichtig oder undurchsetzbar gilt, dann gilt diese Bestimmung als
   abgetrennt, so dass sie die Rechtswirksamkeit und Durchsetzbarkeit der
   übrigen Bestimmungen dieser Benutzungsbedingungen nicht berührt.

   Kalifornische Benutzer der Dienstleistungen sind zum Empfang der
   folgenden spezifischen Verbraucherschutzmitteilung berechtigt: Die
   Complaint Assistance Unit of the Division of Consumer Services of the
   California Department of Consumer Affairs kann schriftlich an der
   Adresse 1625 North Market Blvd., Suite N 112, Sacramento, CA 95834
   erreicht werden oder per Telefon unter der Nummer (800) 952-5210.

Zukunftsorientierte Aussagen

   Bestimmte im Rahmen unserer Dienstleistungen vorhandene Informationen,
   einschließlich unserer Website investor.wdc.com, enthalten unter
   Umständen zukunftsorientierte Aussagen im Sinne der bundesrechtlichen
   Wertpapiergesetze, einschließlich Aussagen zu zukünftigen Ereignissen,
   unseren zukünftigen Geschäfts- oder Finanzplänen oder unserer
   Performance, unserem erwarteten Wachstum, unseren Geschäfts- und
   Markttrends ebenso wie andere Beschreibungen zukünftiger Ereignisse
   oder Umstände. Alle Aussagen, die keine historischen Tatsachen
   darstellen, basieren auf unseren derzeitigen Erwartungen und erfolgen
   vorbehaltlich einer Anzahl von Risiken und Ungewissheiten, die unter
   Umständen bewirken können, dass die tatsächlichen Ergebnisse erheblich
   von den in den zukunftsorientierten Aussagen angegebenen oder
   angenommenen abweichen. Zusätzliche Informationen über die Risiken und
   Ungewissheiten, die sich möglicherweise auf unser Geschäft auswirken,
   sind in den Einreichungen an die United States Securities and Exchange
   Commission (die “SEC”) enthalten und stehen auf der SEC-Website,
   www.sec.gov, zur Verfügung, einschließlich unseres neuesten
   periodischen Berichts, auf den wir Sie aufmerksam machen. Sie sollten
   den zukunftsorientierten Aussagen keine übermäßige Bedeutung beimessen.
   Wir sind nicht verpflichtet, zukunftsorientierte Aussagen öffentlich zu
   aktualisieren oder zu revidieren, und zwar weder aufgrund neuer
   Informationen, zukünftiger Entwicklungen noch anderweitig, außer falls
   gesetzlich vorgeschrieben.

Änderungen der Dienstleistungen

   Western Digital behält sich das Recht vor, die Dienstleistungen (oder
   Teile davon) oder die darin beschriebenen Produkte oder
   Dienstleistungen jederzeit ohne Vorankündigung vorübergehend oder
   permanent zu ändern oder einzustellen. Nach Beendigung der
   Dienstleistungen oder von Teilen davon ist Western Digital nicht
   verpflichtet, Ihren Inhalt oder sonstige Daten zur Verfügung zu stellen
   oder aufrechtzuerhalten.

Kontaktangaben

   Falls Sie Fragen, Beschwerden oder Bemerkungen zu diesen
   Benutzungsbedingungen haben oder zusätzliche Informationen über die
   Dienstleistungen benötigen oder Western Digital anderweitig ansprechen
   möchten, richten Sie sich bitte nach den Hinweisen auf der Seite
   Contact Western Digital.

     * {{unescape(item.title)}}
          + {{anchor.title}}

   Last Updated May 28, 2018

   These Terms of Use (these “Terms of Use”) govern your Use (as defined
   below) of the websites offered by Western Digital Technologies, Inc.
   and/or its affiliates (collectively, “Western Digital,” “we,” or “our”)
   and the content, features, materials, software and related
   documentation, and services available on such websites (such websites,
   content, features, materials, software and related documentation, and
   services, collectively, the “Services”).

   IMPORTANT – PLEASE READ CAREFULLY – If you do not agree to these Terms
   of Use, then you are not authorized to Use the Services.

   To help you navigate and find specific sections of these Terms of Use,
   please refer to this table of contents below:

Acceptance of These Terms of Use

   By Using (as defined below) the Services: you represent and warrant
   that you are at least the age of majority in your jurisdiction and have
   all power, authority, and permissions necessary to enter into and be
   bound by these Terms of Use; you acknowledge that you have read and
   understood, and agree to be bound by, these Terms of Use; and you agree
   to comply with all applicable laws and regulations in connection with
   your Use of the Services.

   If you Use the Services on behalf of a company, organization, or other
   entity, then:  “you” includes you and that entity; you represent and
   warrant that you are an authorized representative of the entity with
   the authority to bind the entity to these Terms of Use and that you
   agree to these Terms of Use on the entity’s behalf; and you agree that
   such entity is legally and financially responsible for your Use of the
   Services as well as for the use of your User Account (as defined below)
   by others affiliated with your entity, including any employees, agents,
   or contractors

Interpretation

   For purposes of these Terms of Use: the capitalized verb “Use” means to
   access, browse, create a User Account (as defined below) on, upload
   content or material to, download content or material from, or otherwise
   use the Services (and the noun “Use” and term “Using” will have
   corollary meanings); the terms “you” and “your” refer to you as a user
   who Uses the Services; and all references to the words “includes,”
   “included,” or “including” are deemed to be followed by the
   words “without limitation.”

Changes to These Terms of Use

   WE MAY, AT OUR SOLE DISCRETION, CHANGE THESE TERMS OF USE AT ANY TIME
   BY UPDATING THIS PAGE.  IF YOU CONTINUE TO USE THE SERVICES AFTER ANY
   SUCH CHANGE, THEN YOU ARE BOUND BY SUCH CHANGE.  THEREFORE, YOU SHOULD
   VISIT THIS PAGE PERIODICALLY TO REVIEW THESE TERMS OF USE.  IF ANY
   CHANGE IS NOT ACCEPTABLE TO YOU, YOU ARE NOT PERMITTED TO CONTINUE
   USING THE SERVICES.

Additional Terms

   We offer a broad range of products and services, including software
   products and services.  Some products or services available on our
   websites may be subject to other or additional terms and conditions
   (“Additional Terms”).  Those Additional Terms will be made available
   with the relevant products or services, such as by being posted
   directly on the website of those products or services or being
   presented as a separate set of terms and conditions at the time of
   purchase, download, access, browsing, or use of those products or
   services.  To the extent these Terms of Use apply to those products or
   services (e.g., because they are made available on our websites) but
   are inconsistent with the Additional Terms applicable to those products
   or services, those Additional Terms will supersede any inconsistent
   provisions in these Terms of Use and will control with respect to those
   products or services.

Ownership

   The Services, including their “look and feel” (e.g., text, graphics,
   images, and logos), proprietary content, information, and other
   materials contained on the Services, are protected by law, including
   United States intellectual property, copyright, trademark, and other
   laws, and international treaties.  You acknowledge that Western Digital
   and/or our licensors own all right, title, and interest in and to the
   Services (including any and all patent, copyright, trade secret,
   trademark, show-how, and know-how, and any and all other intellectual
   property rights therein or related thereto), and you agree not to take
   any action(s) inconsistent with such ownership interests.

Use Restrictions

   Except as expressly authorized herein, none of the Services may be
   copied, reproduced, distributed, republished, downloaded, displayed,
   posted, or transmitted in any form or by any means, including
   electronic, mechanical, photocopying, recording, or otherwise, without
   our prior written permission or the copyright owner’s prior written
   permission.  Subject to your compliance with these Terms of Use,
   Western Digital hereby grants you a limited non-exclusive right to
   access and use the materials contained on the Services, in each case
   for personal, non-commercial use only, and provided you do not modify,
   re-sell, or make commercial use of such materials.  This permission
   terminates automatically if you breach any of these Terms of Use.  Upon
   termination, you must immediately destroy any materials obtained from
   the Services.

   You agree that you will not: remove or alter any copyright or other
   proprietary rights’ notice or restrictive rights legend contained or
   included in the Services; decompile, disassemble, reverse compile,
   reverse assemble, or otherwise reverse engineer any Services, any
   updates, or any part thereof (except as and only to the extent any
   foregoing restriction is prohibited by applicable law); use any means
   to discover any confidential source code of any portion of the
   Services; or circumvent any functionality that controls access to or
   otherwise protects the Services.

   You further agree not to Use the Services in any manner to harass,
   abuse, stalk, threaten, defame, infringe, or otherwise violate the
   rights of any other party, or to upload, post, email, transmit, or
   otherwise make available any content that is unlawful, harmful,
   threatening, abusive, harassing, tortuous, defamatory, vulgar, obscene,
   libelous, invasive of another’s privacy, hateful, or racially,
   ethnically, or otherwise objectionable. You agree that Western Digital
   is not in any way responsible for any such Use by you, nor for any
   harassing, threatening, defamatory, offensive, or illegal messages or
   transmissions that you may receive as a result of Using the Services.
   You agree that you will not intentionally or unintentionally violate
   any applicable law in connection with your Use of the Services. If you
   breach any of the foregoing, you may be subject to prosecution and
   damages.

   You acknowledge that, except as expressly set forth herein, nothing in
   these Terms of Use shall be construed as conferring any license to you
   in our or any of our licensors’ patents or other intellectual property
   rights, whether by estoppel, implication, or otherwise, and you agree
   that you have sole responsibility for obtaining such licenses by
   separate written agreement.  Unauthorized Use of any Services may
   violate copyright laws, trademark laws, the laws of privacy and
   publicity, and communications regulations and statutes.

Account Registration and Subscriptions

   We may require you to register an account to Use certain features or
   sections of the Services (a “User Account”). You may create a User
   Account by completing the registration process set forth on the
   applicable section of the Services. You are responsible for providing
   accurate and current account information.

   You are the sole authorized user of your User Account. You are
   responsible for maintaining the confidentiality of any password and
   account number provided by you or Western Digital for Using the
   Services. You are fully responsible for all activities that occur under
   your User Account. Western Digital may not have control over the use of
   your or any other user’s User Account, and Western Digital expressly
   disclaims any liability derived therefrom.

Privacy Practices

   Your Use of the Services is also subject to our Privacy Statement,
   which is available by clicking here (the “Privacy Statement”).  Please
   review the Privacy Statement to learn about our privacy practices.

User Content License Grant

   As a condition of your Use of the Services, by posting, uploading,
   publishing, submitting, displaying, or transmitting any content or
   other materials through the Services (“Your Content”), you hereby grant
   to Western Digital a non-exclusive, perpetual, irrevocable,
   royalty-free, worldwide, transferable, fully sublicenseable (including
   to other users of the Services) license to access, use, reproduce,
   transmit, display, publish, distribute, publicly perform, publicly
   display, modify, adapt, and create derivative works from Your Content
   and to incorporate Your Content into other works in any format or
   medium now known or later developed for any and all commercial or
   non-commercial purposes.  You represent and warrant: that you own or
   otherwise control all of the rights to Your Content, including all
   copyrights; that Your Content is accurate and does not infringe or
   misappropriate the intellectual property rights of any third party,
   including, the rights of publicity and privacy; and that use of Your
   Content does not violate these Terms of Use or the Privacy Statement
   and will not cause injury to any person or entity.  We take no
   responsibility and assume no liability for any content or other
   materials submitted or posted through the Services by you or any third
   party.  To the extent that Your Content contains any images, you
   further represent and warrant that each person depicted in such images,
   if any, has provided consent to the use of the images as set forth in
   these Terms of Use.

   WE RESERVE THE RIGHT TO PRE-SCREEN, REFUSE, MODIFY, OR REMOVE ANY
   CONTENT OR MATERIAL ON THE SERVICES FOR ANY REASON, INCLUDING IF WE
   DETERMINE IN OUR SOLE DISCRETION THAT SUCH CONTENT OR MATERIAL VIOLATES
   ANY LAW OR RIGHT OF ANY PERSON, INFRINGES THE RIGHTS OF ANY PERSON, OR
   IS OTHERWISE INAPPROPRIATE FOR POSTING ON THE SERVICES.

Access from Outside the United States

   The Services are controlled and operated by us from our offices within
   the United States.  We make no representation that the Services are
   appropriate or available for Use in other locations, and access to them
   from territories where their contents are illegal is prohibited.  Those
   who choose to Use the Services from other locations do so on their own
   initiative and are responsible for compliance with applicable local
   laws.  If you Use the Services from other locations, you are
   responsible for compliance with applicable local laws, including the
   export and import regulations of other countries.  You acknowledge that
   some or all of the Services, including the materials contained thereon,
   may be subject to the United States Export Administration Laws and
   Regulations, the United States Treasury Department’s Office of Foreign
   Assets Control (“OFAC”) Economic Sanctions Regulations, as well as
   export laws of other countries and that diversion of the Services
   contrary to the law of the United States or other applicable countries
   is prohibited.  You agree that none of the Services, nor any direct
   product thereof, is being or will be acquired for, shipped,
   transferred, exported, or re-exported, directly or indirectly, to
   proscribed or embargoed countries or their nationals, nor be Used for
   nuclear activities, chemical biological weapons, or missile projects,
   unless specifically authorized by the United States government (or
   other relevant government) for such purposes.  By accessing the
   website, you represent and warrant that you are not a citizen or
   resident of, and are not customarily resident in, any country or region
   that is subject to an embargo by the United States government, and that
   you are not listed as a sanctioned party on the list of specially
   designated nationals and blocked persons maintained by OFAC.  You agree
   to comply strictly with all export, re-export, and import laws and
   assume sole responsibility for obtaining licenses to export, re-export,
   or import as may be required.

Links to Third-Party Sites and Applications

   The Services may contain links to third-party websites or
   applications.  However, please be aware that we are not responsible for
   and do not control these other websites or applications.  Western
   Digital makes no representations whatsoever about any other website or
   application that you may access through the Services.  When you access
   a third-party website or application, even one that may display a
   Western Digital company logo, it is up to you to take precautions to
   ensure that you agree with that website’s or application’s terms of use
   and that the website or application is free of such items as viruses,
   worms, Trojan horses, and other items of a destructive nature.  You
   agree that under no circumstances will Western Digital be liable in any
   way for any third-party websites or applications.

Limitation of Liability

   TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, WE AND OUR
   DIRECTORS, OFFICERS, EMPLOYEES, AND CONSULTANTS (COLLECTIVELY, “THE
   WESTERN DIGITAL PARTIES”) SHALL NOT BE LIABLE FOR ANY DAMAGES SUFFERED
   AS A RESULT OF USING, MODIFYING, CONTRIBUTING, COPYING, DISTRIBUTING,
   OR DOWNLOADING THE SERVICES OR BEING UNABLE TO DO ANY OF THE FOREGOING.
   IN NO EVENT SHALL THE WESTERN DIGITAL PARTIES BE LIABLE FOR ANY
   INDIRECT, EXTRAORDINARY, EXEMPLARY, PUNITIVE, SPECIAL, INCIDENTAL, OR
   CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES (INCLUDING LOSS OF DATA, REVENUE, PROFITS, USE,
   OR OTHER ECONOMIC ADVANTAGE), HOWEVER ARISING, WHETHER FOR BREACH OR IN
   TORT, EVEN IF THE WESTERN DIGITAL PARTIES HAVE BEEN PREVIOUSLY ADVISED
   OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGE.

   YOU AGREE THAT YOU HAVE SOLE RESPONSIBILITY FOR ADEQUATE PROTECTION AND
   BACKUP OF DATA AND/OR EQUIPMENT USED IN CONNECTION WITH THE SERVICES
   AND WILL NOT MAKE A CLAIM OF ANY NATURE AGAINST THE WESTERN DIGITAL
   PARTIES FOR LOST DATA, INACCURATE OUTPUT, WORK DELAYS, OR LOST PROFITS
   RESULTING FROM THE USE OF, OR INABILITY TO USE, THE SERVICES.

   YOU AGREE TO HOLD THE WESTERN DIGITAL PARTIES ENTIRELY HARMLESS FROM,
   AND YOU COVENANT NOT TO SUE THE WESTERN DIGITAL PARTIES FOR, ANY CLAIMS
   RELATED TO THE SERVICES. IF YOU HAVE ANY BASIS FOR RECOVERING DAMAGES
   (INCLUDING BREACH OF THESE TERMS OF USE) FROM ANY WESTERN DIGITAL
   PARTIES IN CONNECTION WITH THE SERVICES OR THESE TERMS OF USE, YOU
   AGREE THAT YOUR EXCLUSIVE REMEDY IS TO RECOVER FROM THE WESTERN DIGITAL
   PARTIES DAMAGES UP TO AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO YOUR SERVICES FEE FOR THE
   MONTH DURING WHICH THE BREACH OCCURRED (OR UP TO $100.00 IF THE CLAIMS
   RELATE TO ANY SERVICES THAT ARE FREE).

   THESE LIMITATIONS ON THE WESTERN DIGITAL PARTIES’ LIABILITY SHALL APPLY
   WHETHER OR NOT WESTERN DIGITAL HAS BEEN ADVISED OF OR SHOULD HAVE BEEN
   AWARE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF ANY SUCH LOSSES. SOME STATES DO NOT ALLOW
   THE EXCLUSION OR LIMITATION OF INCIDENTAL OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES, SO
   THE ABOVE EXCLUSIONS OR LIMITATIONS MAY NOT APPLY TO YOU.

Disclaimer

   YOU EXPRESSLY ACKNOWLEDGE THAT USE OF THE SERVICES IS AT YOUR SOLE RISK
   AND THAT THE ENTIRE RISK AS TO SATISFACTORY QUALITY, PERFORMANCE,
   ACCURACY, AND EFFORT IS WITH YOU. ALL PARTS OFTHE SERVICES ARE PROVIDED
   BY WESTERN DIGITALON AN “AS IS,” “WITHALL FAULTS,” AND “AS AVAILABLE”
   BASIS ONLY, WITH ALL FAULTS AND WITHOUT WARRANTY OF ANY KIND.
   WESTERNDIGITAL HEREBY EXPRESSLY DISCLAIMS ALL
   REPRESENTATIONS,WARRANTIES, AND CONDITIONS WITH RESPECT TO THE SERVICES
   (INCLUDING THE USE, PERFORMANCE, AND SUPPORT THEREOF), WHETHER EXPRESS,
   IMPLIED, STATUTORY, OR OTHERWISE,INCLUDING ANY IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF
   FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, MERCHANTABILITY, TITLE, AND
   NON-INFRINGEMENT.WESTERN DIGITAL DOES NOT MAKE ANY ASSURANCES WITH
   REGARD TO THE ACCURACY OF THE RESULTS OR OUTPUT THAT DERIVES FROM THE
   SERVICES.

Copyright Policy and DMCA Copyright Infringement Claims

   Pursuant to Title 17, United States Code, Section 512(c), it is Western
   Digital’s policy to respond to notices of alleged infringement that
   comply with the Digital Millennium Copyright Act and other applicable
   intellectual property laws.  We respect the intellectual property of
   others.  If you believe that your work has been copied in a way that
   constitutes copyright infringement, please use the procedures as stated
   in our Copyright Policy.

Trademark Usage Policy

   The trademarks, logos, and service marks (collectively, “Marks”)
   displayed with the provision of our goods and services are the property
   of Western Digital or third parties.  Western Digital’s Marks may only
   be used under limited circumstances and with Western Digital’s prior
   written approval.  Approvals are provided on a case-by-case basis.  All
   approved uses must be in strict accordance with our Trademark and Logo
   Usage Guidelines.  Click here for a non-exhaustive list of Western
   Digital Trademarks.

United States Government Restricted Rights

   The Services are provided with “RESTRICTED RIGHTS.”  Use, duplication,
   or disclosure by the United States government is subject to
   restrictions as set forth in FAR52.227-14 and DFAR252.227-7013 et seq.,
   its successor(s), or any other applicable laws and regulations.  Use of
   the Services by the United States government constitutes acknowledgment
   of our proprietary rights in them.

Choice of Law; Severability

   Any claim arising from or relating to the Services, including the Use
   of (or inability to Use) the Services, is governed by, the laws of the
   State of California without regard to conflicts of laws principles.
   You agree to submit to the exclusive jurisdiction of the state and
   federal courts located in Santa Clara County, California, for the
   resolution of any and all disputes arising from or relating to your Use
   of the Services.  If any provision of these Terms of Use shall be
   deemed invalid, void, or for any reason unenforceable, that provision
   shall be deemed severable and shall not affect the validity and
   enforceability of any remaining provision of these Terms of Use.

   California users of the Services are entitled to receive the following
   specific consumer rights notice: The Complaint Assistance Unit of the
   Division of Consumer Services of the California Department of Consumer
   Affairs may be contacted in writing at 1625 North Market Blvd., Suite N
   112, Sacramento, CA 95834, or by telephone at (800) 952-5210.

Forward-Looking Statements

   Some of the information on our Services, including our websites such as
   investor.wdc.com, may contain forward-looking statements within the
   meaning of the federal securities laws, including statements regarding
   future events, our future operating or financial plans or performance,
   our anticipated growth, trends in our business and the markets in which
   we operate, and other characterizations of future events or
   circumstances.  All statements that are not historical facts are based
   on our current expectations and are subject to a number of risks and
   uncertainties that may cause actual results to differ materially from
   those expressed or implied in the forward-looking statements.  More
   information about the risks and uncertainties that could affect our
   business are listed in our filings with the United States Securities
   and Exchange Commission (the “SEC”) and available on the SEC’s website
   at www.sec.gov, including our most recently filed periodic report, to
   which your attention is directed.  You should not place undue reliance
   on these forward-looking statements.  We do not undertake any
   obligation to publicly update or revise any forward-looking statement,
   whether as a result of new information, future developments, or
   otherwise, except as required by law.

Changes to the Services

   Western Digital reserves the right to change or discontinue,
   temporarily or permanently, the Services (or any part thereof), or the
   products or services described therein, at any time without notice.
   Upon any termination of the Services or any portion thereof, Western
   Digital has no obligation to maintain or provide Your Content or other
   data.

Contact Us

   If you have questions, complaints, or comments about these Terms of
   Use, if you wish to receive further information regarding the Services,
   or if you wish to otherwise contact Western Digital, please contact us
   at the information located on our Contact Western Digital page.

     * {{unescape(item.title)}}
          + {{anchor.title}}

   最近更新於2018年5月28日。

   這些使用條款（這些「使用條款」）提供您對使用（如下所述）Western Digital
   Technologies，Inc.和/或其附屬公司（統稱「威騰電子」，「我們」或「我們的」）網站上的內容、功能、材料、軟體和相關文檔以及可用服
   務（如網站、內容、功能、材料、軟體和相關文檔以及服務，統稱「服務」）

   重要- 請仔細閱讀 - 如果您不同意這些使用條款，您便無權使用服務。

   為了幫助您瀏覽和查詢這些使用條款的特定部分，請參閱下面的目錄：

接受這些使用條款

   通過使用（如下所述）服務：聲明並保證您至少在所在轄區已成年，並且擁有進入並受這些使用條款約束的所有權力，權限和許可；承認您已閱讀、理解，並同意
   受這些使用條款約束；並且同意遵守與使用服務相關的所有適用法律和法規。
   如果您代表公司、機構或其他實體使用此服務，則：「您」包括您和該實體；您聲明並保證您是該實體的授權代表，有權約束該實體，並且同意代表該實體使用這
   些條款；為了此實體以及使用您用戶帳戶（如下所述）的其他人（包括任何員工，代理商或承包商），您同意使用本服務時在法律和財務上負責。

解釋

   對於這些使用條款的目的：大寫動詞「使用」意指使用、瀏覽、建立用戶帳戶（如下所述）、上傳內容或材料、下載內容或材料或指以其他方式使用服務（名詞的
   「使用」和條款的「使用」必然意思相當）；條款「您」和「您的」是指您作為使用服務的用戶；
   所有論及「包含」、「包含的」都被視為後面跟著「但不限於」。

使用條款的變更

   我們可以隨時透過更新本頁面來更改這些使用條款。如果您在這些變更後繼續使用此服務，那麼您將受到此變更的約束。因此，您應該定期訪問本頁以審核這些使
   用條款。如果您不接受任何更改，則不得繼續使用此服務。

附加條款

   我們提供廣泛的產品和服務，包括軟體產品和服務。我們網站上提供的某些產品或服務可能需要遵守其他附加條款和條件（「附加條款」）。這些附加條款將與相
   關產品或服務一起提供，例如直接在這些產品或服務的網站上公佈，或在購買、下載、使用、瀏覽或使用這些產品或服務時，作為獨立的一組條款和條件呈現。倘
   若這些使用條款適用於那些產品或服務（例如因為它們在我們的網站上提供），但與那些產品或服務的附加條款不一致，這些附加條款將取代那些不一致的條款，
   且控制這些產品或服務。

所有權

   服務包含產品的「界面外觀」（例如文字，圖形，圖片和商標），內容的所有權、資訊和其他包含在服務內的材料
   ，都受法律保護，包括美國智慧財產權法、版權法、商標法、其他法律和國際條約。您了解威騰電子和/或我們的許可人對服務擁有所有權利、所有權以及利益（
   包括任何和所有專利、版權、商業機密、商標、展示方法和專有技術以及任何和所有其他智慧財產權產權或相關智慧財產權），並且您同意不採取與此類所有權利
   益不符合的任何行動。

使用限制

   除了事先書面許可或版權所有者的事先書面許可，或是在此明確授權，否則不得以任何形式或通過任何方式拷貝、複製、分發、轉載、下載、展示、發佈或傳輸任
   何服務，包括電子、機械、影印、錄製。在遵守這些使用條款的前提下，威騰電子授予您有限的非專有權利，以使用服務中包含的材料，每種情況下僅限個人使用
   、非商業用途使用，並且您不得修改、再銷售或將這些材料用於商業行為。如果您違反任何使用條款，此權限將自動終止。終止後，您必須立即銷毀從服務中獲得
   的任何材料。

   您同意不會：刪除或更改服務中任何版權、其他智慧財產權或包含注意或限制性權利圖例；
   對任何服務，任何更新或其任何部分進行反編譯、反彙編、反向編譯、反向彙編或以其他方式進行反向工程（除非且僅限於適用法律禁止任何上述限制的情況）；
   使用任何手段發現任何服務部分的任何機密來源代碼； 或規避任何控制使用或以其他方式保護服務的功能。

   您進一步同意不以任何方式騷擾、濫用、追踪、威脅、誹謗、侵犯或以其他方式侵犯其他任一方的權利，或上傳、發布、電子郵件、傳播或以其他方式提供以下任
   何情況的內容：非法、有害、具威脅性、辱罵性、騷擾性、欺騙性、誹謗性、粗俗、淫穢、公然誹謗、侵犯他人隱私、充滿仇恨、種族或令人反感。
   您同意威騰電子對您任何使用以及因使用服務而可能收到的任何騷擾、威脅、誹謗、冒犯、非法的信息或傳輸不負任何責任。
   您同意您不會有意或無意地違反任何與您使用服務有關的適用法律。 如果您違反上述任何規定，您可能會受到起訴和被要求損害賠償。

   您承認，除本協議中明確規定的情況外，本使用條款中的任何內容您都不應解釋為我們或我們的任何許可方的專利或其他智慧財產權中被授予任何許可，無論是通
   過禁止反言、暗示還是其他方式， 並且同意您藉由單獨簽署的書面協議獲得此類許可證的全部責任。
   未經授權使用任何服務可能違反版權法、商標法、隱私和公示法以及通信法規。

帳戶註冊和訂閱

   我們可能會要求您註冊一個帳戶以使用服務的某些功能或部分（「用戶帳戶」）。您可以通過完成申請服務中規定的註冊過程來建立用戶帳戶。您有責任提供正確
   和最新的帳戶信息。
   您是您用戶帳戶的唯一授權用戶。您有責任保持您或威騰電子服務提供的任何密碼和帳號的機密性。您對您的用戶帳戶下發生的所有活動負完全責任。威騰電子可
   能無法控制您或任何其他用戶使用用戶帳戶，威騰電子明確表示不承擔任何責任。

隱私條例

   您對服務的使用也受我們隱私聲明的約束，您可以點擊此處查看隱私聲明（「隱私聲明」）。請查看隱私聲明以了解我們的隱私條例。

用戶內容授權許可

   作為您使用服務的條件，通過服務（「您的內容」）張貼、上傳、發佈、提交、展示或傳輸任何內容或其他材料，您特此授予威騰電子非獨占、永久、允許訪問、
   可使用、可複製、可傳輸、可展示、可發佈、可分發、可公開展示、可修改、可改編和創作的衍生作品，且其不可撤銷、免版稅、全球性的、可轉讓、完全可再許
   可（包括服務的其他用戶），並將您的內容以任何格式或媒體納入其他作品中，以現在已知或以後任何和所有商業或非商業目的而開發。您聲明並保證：您擁有或
   以其他方式控制您內容中的所有權利，包括所有版權；您的內容準確無誤並且不侵犯或盜用任何第三方的智慧財產權，包括公示和隱私權；並且使用您的內容不違
   反這些使用條款或隱私聲明，並且不會對任何個人或實體造成傷害。對於您或任何第三方通過服務提交或發布的任何內容或其他材料，我們不承擔任何責任，也不
   會承擔任何法律責任。如果您的內容包含任何圖像，則您進一步聲明並保證，此類圖像中出現的每個人（如果有）都已同意圖像能如前述之使用條款規定般使用。
   我們保留以任何理由預先封鎖、拒絕、修改或刪除服務中的任何內容或材料的權力，包括我們根據自己的判斷確定此類內容或材料違反任何法律或任何人的人權、
   侵犯任何人的權利，或者不適宜用於發佈服務。

從美國境外進入

   服務由我們在美國境內的辦事處進行控制和操作。我們不會聲明服務適合或可用於其他地區，並且我們也禁止使用違反當地法律的服務內容。那些選擇從其他地點
   使用服務的人會主動遵守適用的當地法律，且他們也有責任這樣做。如果您從其他地方使用服務，您有責任遵守適用的當地法律，包括其他國家的進出口法規。您
   承認部分或全部服務（包括其中包含的材料）可能受美國出口管理法律、美國財政部外國資產管理辦公室（OFAC）的「經濟制裁條例」以及其他國家的出口法
   律規範，且服務的轉移禁止違反美國或其他適用國家的法律。您同意，不直接或間接地向被禁止國家或禁運國家或其國民收購、轉讓、出口或再出口本服務及其直
   接產品，不得將其用於核活動、化學生物武器或導彈項目，除非美國政府（或其他有關政府）為此目的特別授權。通過網站，您聲明並保證您不是美國政府禁運的
   任何國家或地區的公民或居民，也不是居住在被OFAC列為特別指定的任何國家或地區的國民和被阻止的人名單上。您同意嚴格遵守所有出口、再出口和進口法
   律，並承擔根據需要獲得出口、再出口或進口許可證的全部責任。

連向第三方網站和應用程式的連結

   服務可能包含指向第三方網站或應用程式的連結。但請注意，我們對這些其他網站或應用程式不負責任也不控制。您可能通過服務使用的任何其他網站或應用程式
   ，威騰電子對此不作任何陳述。當您訪問第三方網站或應用程式即使是顯示威騰電子公司商標的網站或應用程式時，您仍需要採取預防措施以確保您同意該網站或
   應用程式的使用條款，並確保該網站或應用程式沒有病毒、蠕蟲、特洛伊木馬和其他具有破壞性的物品。您同意威騰電子在任何情況下都不需以任何方式對任何第
   三方網站或應用程式承擔責任。

責任限制

   在法律適用允許的最大範圍內，我們和我們的董事、職員、員工和顧問（統稱為「威騰電子」）不需對使用、修改、貢獻、複製、分發、下載服務或無法執行上述
   任何一項負責。不論是違反或侵權行為，即使威騰電子已接到可能發生此類損害的事先告知，在任何情況下，威騰電子方均不為任何間接的、特殊、懲戒性、懲罰
   性、特殊、偶然或相應的損害（包括數據，收入，利潤，使用或其他經濟利益的損失）負責。

   您同意，您有責任對與服務有關的數據和/或設備進行充分的保護和備份，並且不會因為任何因為使用或無法使用服務而導致數據丟失、輸出不准確、工作延遲或
   利潤損失而對威騰電子進行任何性質的索賠。

   您同意對威騰電子方完全無害，並且您不會控訴及向威騰電子方與服務相關的任何索賠。如果您有任何與本服務或使用條款有關的任何威騰電子的損害賠償（包括
   違反使用條款）的基礎，您同意違約發生時，您的唯一補救措施是從威騰電子索取損害賠償，而您的賠償等於您的服務費（如果索賠與任何免費服務有關，則最高
   為100.00美元）。

   無論威騰電子是否已被告知或應該知道任何此類損失的可能性，威騰電子責任的這些限制均適用。某些州不允許排除或限制偶然或間接的損害賠償，因此上述免除
   或限制可能不適用於您。

免責聲明

   您明確了解且自行承擔使用服務的風險，並且由您承擔質量的滿意度、性能、準確性和努力的全部責任。所有部分服務均由威騰電子按「現況」，「不保證沒有瑕
   疵」和「現有」為基礎提供，並且不保證沒有瑕疵、不提供任何形式的擔保。威騰電子特此明確否認有關服務（包括其使用、性能和支援）的所有陳述，保證和條
   件，無論是明示，暗示，法定還是其他方式，包括對特定用途適用性的暗示保證、適銷性、所有權和非侵權。
   威騰電子對於衍生自服務的結果或輸出的準確性不做任何保證。

版權政策和DMCA侵權索賠

   根據美國法第17篇第512（c）節，威騰電子的政策是對涉及侵犯版權的通知進行回應，該通知符合數字千年版權法和其他適用的智慧財產權法。我們尊重他
   人的智慧財產權。如果您認為您的作品被製作複本的方式構成侵權，請進行我們版權政策中所述的程序。

商標使用政策

   提供我們的商品和服務時顯示的商標、標示和服務標誌（統稱為「標誌」）是威騰電子或第三方的財產。
   威騰電子的商標只能在有限的情況下使用，並且必須事先獲得威騰電子的書面許可。批准是根據實際情況提供的。所有批准使用必須嚴格遵守我們的商標和標示使
   用法則。點擊這裡查看威騰電子商標的清單。

美國政府限制權利

   本服務提供「受限制的權利」。被美國政府FAR52.227-14和DFAR252.227-7013 et
   seq.使用、複製或披露其繼任者，或任何其他適用的法律和法規規定限制。美國政府使用服務後，構成了對我們所有權的承認。

法律適用條款；可分割性

   任何由服務引起或與服務有關的索賠，包括使用（或無法使用）服務，均受加利福尼亞州的法律管轄，不考慮法律衝突原則。您同意接受位於加利福尼亞州聖克拉
   拉縣的州和聯邦法院的專屬管轄權，以解決因您使用服務而引起或有關的所有爭議。如果這些使用條款的任何條款被認為無效，或因任何原因無法執行，則該條款
   應被視為可分割，並且不得影響本使用條款的任何其餘條款的有效性和可執行性。
   加利福尼亞服務使用者有權獲得以下特定消費者權利聲明：加利福尼亞州消費者事務部消費者服務部的投訴協助單位可以書面聯繫1625 North
   Market Blvd. Suite N 112，Sacramento ，CA 95834，或致電：（800）952-5210。

前瞻性陳述

   我們服務的部分信息（包括我們的網站，例如investor.wdc.com）可能包含聯邦證券法律意義下的前瞻性聲明，包括有關未來事件、未來經營、
   財務計劃或業績的聲明、我們增長的期望、業務的趨勢以及我們經營的市場，以及未來事件或環境的其他特徵。所有非歷史事實的陳述均基於我們目前的期望，並
   受到一系列風險和不確定因素的影響，這些風險和不確定性可能導致實際結果與前瞻性陳述中明示或暗示的結果大不相同。有關可能影響我們業務的風險和不確定
   因素等更多信息，都在我們向美國證券交易委員會（「SEC」）提交的文件中列出，並可在SEC網站www.sec.gov上獲得，包括我們最近提交的周
   期報告，都是您必須注意的。您不應該過分依賴這些前瞻性陳述。除法律要求外，無論是新資訊、未來發展或其他原因，我們都不負擔公開更新或修改任何前瞻性
   聲明的義務。

服務的更改

   威騰電子保留隨時更改或中止服務（或其任何部分）或其中所述產品或服務的權利，恕不另行通知。在服務或其任何部分終止後，威騰電子沒有義務維護或提供您
   的內容或其他數據。

聯繫我們

   如果您有關於使用條款的問題、投訴或評論，如果您希望收到有關本服務的進一步資訊，或者您希望以其他方式聯繫威騰電子，請通過我們「聯繫威騰電子」頁面
   上的信息與我們聯繫。

     * {{unescape(item.title)}}
          + {{anchor.title}}

   2018년 5월 28일에 마지막으로 업데이트됨.

   본 이용 약관(이하"이용 약관")은 Western Digital Technologies, Inc. 및/또는 그 계열사(총칭
   “Western Digital”, “당사”, “우리”)에서 제공하는 웹사이트 및 그러한 웹사이트에서 이용 가능한 콘텐츠, 기능,
   자료, 소프트웨어 및 관련 문서, 서비스(이하 웹사이트, 콘텐츠, 기능, 자료, 소프트웨어 및 관련 문서, 서비스는 총칭하여
   “서비스”라고 부름)의 사용(아래 정의된 대로)을 규율합니다.

   중요 - 주의깊게 읽어 주십시오 - 본 이용 약관에 동의하지 않을 경우 서비스를 사용하실 수 없습니다.

   본 이용 약관의 특정 섹션을 탐색하고 찾는 데 도움이 필요하시면 아래의 목차를 참조하십시오.

본 이용 약관 동의

   서비스 사용(아래 정의된 바와 같이): 귀하는 최소한 귀하의 관할권에서 성인의 나이이고 본 이용 약관을 체결하고 준수해야하는
   모든 권한, 권한 및 허가를 가지고 있음을 진술하고 보증합니다. 귀하는 본 이용 약관을 읽고 이해했으며 이에 동의해야 한다는
   점을 인정합니다. 귀하는 귀하의 서비스 사용과 관련하여 모든 관련 법률 및 규정을 준수할 것에 동의합니다.

   회사, 조직 또는 기타 단체를 대신하여 서비스를 이용하는 경우 :  "귀하"는 귀하와 그 단체를 포함합니다. 귀하는 귀하가 본
   사용 조건을 귀하가 본 이용 약관에 단체를 구속할 수 있는 권한을 가진 인가받은 대표자라는 점과 단체를 대신하여 이용 약관에
   동의한다는 점을 나타내고 보증합니다. 귀하는 해당 법인이 귀하의 서비스 사용에 대한 법적 책임 뿐만 아니라 직원, 대리인 또는
   계약자를 포함한 귀하의 법인과 관련된 다른 사람에 의한 귀하의 사용자 계정(아래 정의된 바와 같이)의 사용에 대해 법적 및
   재정적으로 책임이 있음에 동의합니다.

해석

   본 이용 약관의 목적: 동사 “이용하다”는 서비스 접근, 찾아보기, 사용자 계정 만들기(아래 정의된 대로), 콘텐츠 또는 자료
   업로드, 콘텐츠 또는 자료 다운로드 또는 서비스 사용(그리고 명사 “이용” 및 “이용하기” 는 부수적 의미입니다)을 의미하며
   “귀하” 및 “귀하의” 라는 용어는 서비스를 사용하는 사용자를 의미하며, “포함”, “포함된” 또는“포함하는”이라는 단어에 대한
   모든 참조는 “제한 없음”이라는 단어 뒤에 따르는 것으로 간주합니다.

본 이용 약관의 변경 사항

   당사는 본 페이지를 업데이트하여 언제든지 이러한 이용 약관을 변경할 수 있습니다.  귀하가 변경이 있은 후에도 계속 서비스를
   사용하신다면 이러한 변경 사항을 따르게 됩니다.  따라서 이용 약관을 검토하시려면 이 페이지를 정기적으로 방문해야 합니다.
   변경 사항을 허용하지 않으신 경우 서비스를 계속 사용하실 수 없습니다.

추가 약관

   당사는 소프트웨어 제품 및 서비스를 비롯하여 다양한 제품과 서비스를 제공합니다.  당사 웹사이트에서 이용 가능한 일부 제품 또는
   서비스는 기타 또는 추가 약관("추가 약관")의 대상이 될 수 있습니다.  이러한 추가 약관은 해당 제품 또는 서비스의
   웹사이트에 직접 게시되거나 해당 제품 또는 서비스의 구매, 다운로드, 접근, 검색 또는 사용 시 별도의 약관으로 제시되는 등의
   관련 제품 또는 서비스를 이용할 수 있도록 제공됩니다.  본 이용 약관이 해당 제품이나 서비스(예: 당사 웹사이트에서 제공되기
   때문)에 적용되지만, 해당 제품이나 서비스에 적용되는 추가 약관과 일치하지 않는 경우, 이러한 추가 약관은 본 이용 약관의
   일관성 없는 조항에 우선하며 해당 제품 또는 서비스와 관련하여 제한합니다.

소유권

   본 서비스의 "외관 및 느낌"(예: 텍스트, 그래픽, 이미지 및 로고), 독점 콘텐츠, 정보 및 기타 서비스를 포함한 자료는
   미국의 지적 재산권, 기타 저작권 및 상표, 기타 법률 및 국제법을 포함한 법률로 보호됩니다.  귀하는 Western
   Digital 및/또는 당사의 라이선스 소지자가 모든 서비스에 대한 권리, 타이틀, 이익을 소유(특허, 저작권, 영업 비밀,
   상표권, 보여주기 예, 노하우 및 기타 지적 저작권을 포함한)함을 인정하며 이러한 소유권 이익에 일관되지 않은 행동을 취하지
   않음에 동의합니다.

사용 제한

   여기에 명시적으로 허가된 경우를 제외하고 사전 서면 허가 또는 저작권 소유자의 사전 서면 허가없이 전자, 기계, 복사, 녹음
   또는 기타 방법을 포함한 어떠한 형식이나 수단으로도 서비스를 복사, 복제, 배포, 재발행, 다운로드, 표시, 게시 또는 전송할
   수 없습니다.  본 이용 약관의 준수 여부에 따라 Western Digital은 귀하에게 서비스에 포함된 자료에 개인적,
   비상업적 용도로만 접근하고 사용할 수 있는 제한적 비독점적 권리를 부여하며 귀하가 수정하지 않는 한 재판매 또는 상업적 사용을
   금지합니다.  이 이용 권한을 위반할 경우 이 이용 권한은 자동으로 종료됩니다.  해지시 귀하는 서비스에서 얻은 자료를 즉시
   폐기해야 합니다.

   귀하는 서비스에 포함되거나 포함 된 저작권 또는 기타 소유권의 고지 또는 제한적 권리 범례를 삭제하거나 변경하는 행위/서비스,
   업데이트 또는 그 일부를 디컴파일러, 디스어셈블러, 리버스 컴파일, 리버스 어셈블리 또는 리버스 엔지니어링(적용 가능한 법률에
   의해 앞에서 이야기한 제한이 금지된 경우에만 예외로 함)/모든 수단을 사용하여 서비스의 모든 부분에 대한 기밀 소스 코드를
   검색/또는 서비스에 대한 액세스를 제어하거나 서비스를 보호하는 기능을 피하기를 하지 않을 것임에 동의합니다.

   귀하는 다른 당사자의 권리를 괴롭히거나, 학대, 스토킹, 위협, 명예 훼손, 침해, 또는 타인의 권리 침해 또는 타인의 사생활을
   학대하고, 괴롭히고, 왜곡하고, 조롱하고, 저속하고, 음란하고, 비방하고, 침해하고 증오성, 인종 차별성, 민족적 또는 기타
   불쾌한 콘텐츠를 업로드하거나, 게시하거나, 이메일로 보내거나, 다른 방법으로 사용 가능하도록 제공하는 데 어떠한 방식으로든
   서비스를 사용하지 않을 것에 동의합니다.  귀하는 Western Digital이 귀하가 행한 이러한 사용이나 서비스 이용의
   결과로 받을 수 있는 괴롭힘, 위협, 명예 훼손, 불쾌감 또는 불법적인 메시지 또는 전송에 어떠한 책임도 지지 않음에
   동의합니다.  귀하는 서비스 사용과 관련하여 고의적 또는 부지 불식적으로 적용 가능한 법률을 위반하지 않을 것에 동의합니다.
   상기 내용 중 어느 하나라도 위반하면 기소 및 손해의 대상이 될 수 있습니다.

   귀하는 본 약관에 명시적으로 규정된 경우를 제외하고 본 이용 약관은 금반언, 암시, 또는 그 밖의 다른 방법으로, 당신은 별도의
   서면 계약에 의해 그러한 라이선스를 획득할 단독 책임이 있다는 것에 동의함으로써 당사 또는 당사의 라이선스 소지자의 특허 또는
   기타 지적 재산권에 있는 라이선스를 전적으로 서면, 묵시적 또는 단독으로 취득하거나 귀하에게 동의하는 것으로 해석됩니다.
   서비스의 무단 사용은 저작권법, 상표법, 개인정보 보호법 및 홍보법, 통신 규정 및 법률에 위배될 수 있습니다.

계정 등록 및 구독

   서비스의 특정 기능 또는 섹션("사용자 계정")을 사용하려면 계정을 등록해야 합니다.  서비스의 해당 섹션에 명시된 등록 과정을
   완료하여 사용자 계정을 생성할 수 있습니다.  귀하는 정확한 현재 계정 정보를 제공할 책임이 있습니다.

   귀하는 사용자 계정의 개인 승인된 사용자입니다.  귀하는 서비스 사용을 위해 귀하 또는 Western Digital에서 제공한
   암호와 계정 번호 기밀을 유지할 책임이 있습니다.  귀하는 사용자 계정에서 발생하는 모든 활동에 대해 전적으로 책임이
   있습니다.  Western Digital은 귀하 또는 다른 사용자의 사용자 계정 사용에 대한 통제권을 가지고 있지 않을 수
   있으며, Western Digital은 거기에서 파생된 모든 책임을 명백히 부인합니다.

개인정보 취급 방침

   귀하의 서비스 사용은 여기를 클릭하여 사용할 수 있는 개인정보 보호정책의 대상이 됩니다("개인정보 보호정책").  개인정보
   보호정책을 검토하여 개인정보 취급 방침에 대해 알아보십시오.

사용자 콘텐츠 라이선스 승인

   귀하는 귀하의 서비스 사용 조건으로서 서비스("귀하의 콘텐츠")를 통해 콘텐츠 또는 기타 자료를 포스팅, 업로드, 게시, 제출,
   표시 또는 전송함으로써 Western Digital에 접근, 사용, 복제, 전송, 전시, 게시, 배포, 공개적 수행, 공개적
   표시, 수정, 개조 및 작성을 위해 비독점적이고 영구적이며 취소 불가능하고 사용료가 없고 로열티가 없고 전세계적이며 양도가
   가능하며 완전히 재사용 할 수 있는 라이선스(다른 서비스 사용자를 포함하여)를 귀하의 콘텐츠로부터 파생된 저작물을 귀하의
   콘텐츠를 다른 상업적 또는 비상업적 목적으로 현재 알려져 있거나 나중에 개발된 형식이나 매체로 다른 저작물에 통합할 수
   있습니다.  귀하는 모든 저작권을 포함하여 귀하의 콘텐츠에 대한 모든 권리를 소유하거나 달리 관리한다는 것을 진술하고
   보증합니다. 귀하의 콘텐츠는 정확하며 홍보 및 개인정보 보호의 권리를 포함하여 제 3자의 지적 재산권을 침해하거나 부당하게
   이용하지 않습니다. 귀하의 콘텐츠 사용이 본 이용 약관 또는 개인정보 취급 방침을 위반하지 않으며 어떠한 개인이나 단체에게도
   해를 입히지 않습니다.  당사는 귀하 또는 제 3자가 서비스를 통해 제출 또는 게시한 콘텐츠 또는 기타 자료에 대해 어떠한
   책임도 지지 않습니다.  귀하의 콘텐츠에 이미지가 포함되는 규모 내에서 귀하는 그러한 이미지에 사람이 묘사된 경우 그 사람이 본
   이용 약관에 명시된대로 이미지 사용에 대한 동의를 제공했음을 진술하고 보증합니다.

   당사는 당사의 독점적 재량에 따라 콘텐츠 또는 자료가 임의의 법률 또는 권리를 침해하거나 타인의 권리를 침해하거나 서비스에 대한
   포스팅이 부적절한 것으로 판단되는 경우를 포함하여 어떠한 이유로든 서비스의 콘텐츠 또는 자료를 사전 검열, 환불, 수정 또는
   삭제할 수 있는 권리를 보유합니다.

미국 외 지역 접속

   서비스는 미국 내에 있는 당사 사무실에서 관리하고 운영합니다.  당사는 서비스가 다른 지역에서 사용하기에 적합하거나 사용할 수
   있다고 주장하지 않으며, 서비스의 콘텐츠가 불법인 지역에서는 서비스에 접근할 수 없습니다.  다른 지역에서 서비스를 사용하기로
   선택한 사람은 자신의 주도로 서비스를 이용하고 해당 지역 법률을 준수할 책임이 있습니다.  다른 위치에서 서비스를 사용하는 경우
   귀하는 다른 국가의 수출 및 수입 규정을 포함하여 해당 지역 법률을 준수해야 합니다.  귀하는 서비스에 포함된 자료를 포함하여
   일부 또는 모든 서비스가 미국 수출 관리법 및 규정, 미국 재무부 해외 자산 관리국 (“OFAC”) 경제 제재 규정의 적용을
   받을 수 있다는 점과 미국 또는 다른 해당 국가의 법에 위배되는 서비스의 전환은 금지됨을 인지하고 있습니다.  귀하는 엄밀히
   미국 정부(또는 기타 관련 정부)가 승인하지 않은 한 그러한 생물학적인 국가의 핵 개발을 위해 생물학적으로 승인되거나
   직간접적으로 해당 국가의 핵 개발 계획을 목적으로 어떠한 서비스나 직접적 제품도 금지되거나 제제 또는 금지 국가에게 직간접적으로
   승인되거나 운송, 전송, 수출 또는 재수출되지 않는다는 점에 동의합니다.  웹사이트에 접속함으로써 귀하는 미국 정부의 금수
   조치가 적용되는 국가 또는 지역의 시민 또는 거주자가 아니며 관습상 거주하지도 않으며 귀하가 미국 정부의 금령 제재 대상이
   아니며 OFAC가 유지 관리하는 사람을 특별히 차단한 사람의 명단에 올라있지 않음을 나타내며 보증합니다.  귀하는 모든 수출,
   재수출 및 수입 법률을 엄격히 준수하고 필요에 따라 수출, 재수출 또는 수입할 수 있는 라이선스 취득에 대한 전적인 책임을
   진다는 데 동의합니다.

제3자 사이트 및 어플리케이션에 대한 링크

   서비스에는 타사 웹사이트 또는 어플리케이션에 대한 링크가 포함될 수 있습니다.  그러나 당사는 이러한 다른 웹 사이트 또는
   어플리케이션에 대한 책임이 없으며 이러한 웹 사이트 또는 어플리케이션을 제어하지도 않습니다.  Western Digital은
   서비스를 통해 접근할 수 있는 다른 웹 사이트 또는 어플리케이션에 대해 대표하지 않습니다.  타사 웹사이트 또는 어플리케이션에
   접근할 때 Western Digital 회사 로고가 표시 될 수도 있는 경우에도 귀하가 해당 웹사이트 또는 어플리케이션의 이용
   약관에 동의하고 웹사이트 또는 어플리케이션에 바이러스, 웜, 트로이 목마 및 기타 유해 항목이 없는지 확인하는 것은 귀하에게
   달려 있습니다.  귀하는 어떠한 경우에도 Western Digital이 제 3자 웹사이트 또는 어플리케이션에 대해 어떠한 책임도
   지지 않음에 동의합니다.

유한 책임

   관련 법률이 허용하는 최대 한도 내에서 당사와 당사의 이사, 임원, 직원 및 컨설턴트(이하 “Western Digital
   관계자”로 통칭)는 소프트웨어의 사용, 수정, 기여, 복사, 배포 또는 서비스 다운로드, 상기 내용 이용 불가능으로 인해 발생한
   손해에 대해 책임을 지지 않습니다.  Western Digital 관계자는 어떠한 경우에도 간접적, 특별, 우발적 또는 결과적
   손해 (데이터, 수입, 이익, 사용 또는 기타 경제적 이점의 손실 포함)에 대한 어떠한 손해에 대해서도 책임을 지지 않습니다.
   아무리 위반 행위나 불법 행위 중인지 상관없이 일어났거나 심지어 Western Digital 관계자가 그와 같은 손해의 가능성을
   사전에 미리 알고 있던 경우에도 마찬가지입니다.

   귀하는 서비스와 관련하여 사용된 데이터 및/또는 장비의 적절한 보호 및 백업에 대한 귀하의 단적으로 책임을 지며 Western
   Digital 관계자에 대한 데이터의 손실, 정확하지 않은 출력, 작업 지연 또는 서비스의 사용 또는 사용 불능으로 인해
   발생하는 이익 손실에 대해 어떠한 요구도 하지 않을 것에 동의합니다 .

   귀하는 Western Digital 관계자를 완전히 무해하게 유지하는 데 동의하며, 귀하는 Western Digital
   관계자에게 서비스와 관련된 어떠한 배상 청구도 하지 않을 것을 동의합니다.  귀하가 본 서비스 약관 또는 본 이용 약관과
   관련하여 Western Digital 관계자로부터 손해(본 이용 약관의 위반 포함) 복구를 목적으로 한 어떠한 근거가 있다면
   귀하는 귀하의 배타적 구제 수단이 Western Digital 관계자로 인한 손해를 보상이라는 점에 동의하며 계약 기간 중
   귀하의 서비스 요금과 동일한 금액이 부과됩니다(또는 무료로 제공되는 서비스와 관련된 클레임인 경우 $ 100.00까지).

   Western Digital 관계자의 책임에 대한 이러한 제한은 Western Digital이 그러한 손실의 가능성을 알고
   있었는지 여부에 관계없이 적용됩니다.  일부 주에서는 부수적 또는 결과적 손해의 제외 또는 제한을 허용하지 않으므로 상기 제외
   또는 제한이 적용되지 않을 수도 있습니다.

면책 조항

   귀하는 서비스의 사용이 귀하의 전적인 책임하에 있으며 품질 만족도, 성능, 정확성 및 노력에 대한 모든 위험이 귀하에게 있음을
   명시적으로 인정합니다.  서비스의 모든 부분은 Western Digital에서 “있는 그대로”, “모든 결함이 있는”, “가능한
   대로”의 기준으로 제공되며 모든 결함이 있고 어떤 종류의 보증도 제공되지 않습니다.  Western Digital은 특정
   목적에의 적합성, 상품성, 이름 및 비침해에 대한 묵시적 보증을 포함하여 명시적, 묵시적, 법령 또는 기타 다른 방식으로
   서비스(사용, 성능 및 지원 포함)에 대한 모든 진술, 보증 및 조건을 명시적으로‑ 부인합니다.  Western Digital은
   서비스에서 파생된 결과 또는 출력의 정확성에 대해 보증 하지 않습니다.

저작권 정책 및 DMCA 저작권 침해 청구

   미국 헌법 제17편 제512조(c)에 의거하여, 디지털 밀레니엄 저작권법 및 기타 해당 지적 재산권법 준수 위반 혐의 통지에
   대응하는 것은 Western Digital의 정책입니다.  당사는 타인의 지적 재산권을 존중합니다.  귀하의 작품이 저작권
   침해에 해당하는 방식으로 복사되었다고 생각되면 당사 저작권 정책에 명시된 절차를 따르십시오.

상표 사용 정책

   당사의 상품 및 서비스 제공과 함께 표시되는 상표, 로고 및 서비스 마크(총칭 "마크")는 Western Digital 또는
   타사의 재산입니다.  Western Digital의 마크는 제한된 상황에서 Western Digital의 사전 서면 승인을 받은
   경우에만 사용할 수 있습니다.  승인은 사례별로 제공됩니다.  승인된 모든 사용은 당사의 상표 및 로고 사용 지침을 엄격하게
   준수해야 합니다.  Western Digital 마크의 목록을 보려면 여기를 클릭하십시오.

미국 정부의 제한적 권한

   서비스는 "제한된 권리"로 제공됩니다.  미국 정부에 의한 사용, 복제 또는 공개는 FAR52.227-14 및
   DFAR252.227-7013 등의 규정 및 기타 적용 가능한 법률에 명시된대로 제한됩니다.  미국 정부가 서비스를 이용하는
   것은 미국 정부의 독점적 권리를 인정하는 것입니다.

법 선택, 분리 가능

   서비스 사용(또는 사용 불가능)을 포함하여 서비스와 관련된 모든 청구는 법률 원칙의 충돌과 관계 없이 캘리포니아주 법률에
   적용됩니다.  귀하는 귀하의 서비스 사용과 관련하여 발생하는 모든 분쟁의 해결을 위해 캘리포니아 주 산타클라라 카운티에 위치한
   주 및 연방 법원의 독점 관할권에 동의합니다.  본 이용 약관의 조항이 유효하지 않거나 무효이거나 어떤 이유로든 집행 불가능한
   것으로 간주될 경우 해당 조항은 이 이용 약관의 남아있는 모든 조항의 유효성 및 시행 가능성에 영향을 미치지 않는 것으로
   간주됩니다.

   본 서비스의 캘리포니아 사용자는 다음과 같은 특정 소비자 권리 고지를 받을 수 있습니다. 캘리포니아 소비자 부서의 소비자 서비스
   부서의 불만 사항 지원 팀은 서면 1625 North Market Blvd., Suite N 112, Sacramento, CA
   95834 또는 전화 (800) 952-5210로 연락할 수 있습니다.

미래를 내다보는 성명

   investor.wdc.com과 같은 당사 웹사이트를 포함하여 당사 서비스에 관한 일부 정보는 향후 연방 보안법의 의미 내에서
   미래 사건, 미래 영업 또는 재무 계획 또는 실적에 관한 진술을 포함하는 장래 예상 진술을 포함할 수 있습니다. 이에는 예상
   성장, 비즈니스 및 시장 동향, 미래 사건이나 상황에 대한 다른 특성 분석 등이 포함됩니다.  역사적 사실이 아닌 모든 진술은
   현재 당사의 기대에 기초하고 있으며, 실제 결과를 미래 예측 진술에 명시되거나 암시된 것과 실질적으로 달리될 수 있는 많은
   위험과 불확실성에 노출됩니다.  당사 사업에 영향을 미칠 수 있는 위험과 불확실성에 대한 자세한 정보는 미국 증권 거래
   위원회(이하 "SEC")에 제출된 보고서에 나와 있으며, 최근에 귀하가 관심 갖고 있는 당사가 제공한 정기 보고서는 SEC
   웹사이트인 www.sec.gov에서 보실 수 있습니다.  귀하는 이러한 미래 지향적인 진술에 지나치게 의존해서는 안 됩니다.
   당사는 법의 요구를 제외하고는 새로운 정보, 향후 개발 또는 기타 사항의 결과로 인한 미래에 대한 진술을 공개적으로
   업데이트하거나 수정할 의무가 없습니다.

서비스 변경 사항

   Western Digital은 언제든지 통지 없이 서비스(또는 서비스의 일부) 또는 제품 또는 서비스를 일시적 또는 영구적으로
   변경하거나 중단할 수 있습니다.  서비스 또는 그 일부가 종료되면 Western Digital은 귀하의 콘텐츠 또는 기타
   데이터를 유지 또는 제공할 의무가 없습니다.

문의하기

   본 이용 약관에 대한 질문, 불만 사항 또는 의견이 있거나 서비스에 대한 추가 정보를 받고 싶거나 Western Digital에
   문의하시려면 당사의 Western Digital 문의 페이지에 문의하십시오.

     * {{unescape(item.title)}}
          + {{anchor.title}}

   Última Atualização em 28º de maio de 2018.

   Estes Termos de Uso (“Termos de Uso”) regem seu Uso (conforme definido
   abaixo) dos websites oferecidos pela Western Digital Technologies, Inc.
   e/ou suas afiliadas (coletivamente, “Western Digital”, “nós” ou
   “nosso”) e o conteúdo, funções, materiais, software e documentação
   relacionados e serviços disponíveis nesses websites (como websites,
   conteúdo, características, materiais, software e documentação
   relacionada e serviços, coletivamente, os “Serviços”).

   IMPORTANTE - POR FAVOR, LEIA ATENTAMENTE - Se você não concordar com
   estes Termos de Uso, você não está autorizado a utilizar os Serviços.

   Para ajudá-lo a navegar e a encontrar seções específicas destes Termos
   de Uso, consulte o índice abaixo:

Aceitação destes Termos de Uso

   Ao utilizar (conforme definido abaixo) os Serviços: você declara e
   garante que é maior de idade em sua jurisdição e tem todos os poderes,
   autoridade e permissões necessárias para assumir e estar vinculado a
   estes Termos de Uso; você reconhece que leu e entendeu, e concordou em
   estar vinculado a, estes Termos de Uso; e você concorda em cumprir
   todas as leis e normas aplicáveis relacionadas a seu Uso dos Serviços.

   Se Utilizar os Serviços em nome de uma empresa, organização ou outra
   entidade, então:  “você” inclui você e essa entidade; você declara e
   garante que é um representante autorizado da entidade com autoridade
   para vincular a entidade a estes Termos de Uso e que concorda com estes
   Termos de Uso em nome da entidade; e você concorda que tal entidade é
   legalmente e financeiramente responsável por seu Uso dos Serviços, bem
   como pelo uso de sua Conta de Usuário (conforme definido abaixo) por
   outros afiliados a sua entidade, incluindo quaisquer colaboradores,
   agentes ou contratados.

Interpretação

   Para fins destes Termos de Uso: o verbo “Utilizar/Usar” em maiúscula
   significa acessar, navegar, criar uma Conta de Usuário (conforme
   definido abaixo), carregar conteúdo ou material, baixar conteúdo ou
   material ou, de outra forma, usar os Serviços (e o substantivo “Uso” e
   o termo “Usando” terão significados corolários); os termos “você” e
   “seu” se referem a você como um usuário que Utiliza os Serviços; e
   todas as referências às palavras “inclui”, “incluído(a)” ou “incluindo”
   são consideradas como acompanhadas pelas palavras “sem limitação”.

Alterações a Estes Termos de Uso

   PODEMOS, A NOSSO PRÓPRIO CRITÉRIO, ALTERAR ESTES TERMOS de uso A
   QUALQUER MOMENTO ATUALIZANDO ESTA PÁGINA.  SE CONTINUAR A UTILIZAR OS
   SERVIÇOS APÓS QUALQUER ALTERAÇÃO DESSE TIPO, VOCÊ ESTARÁ VINCULADO A
   ESSA ALTERAÇÃO.  PORTANTO, VOCÊ DEVE VISITAR ESTA PÁGINA PERIODICAMENTE
   PARA REVISAR ESTES TERMOS DE USO.  SE ALGUMA ALTERAÇÃO NÃO FOR
   ACEITÁVEL, VOCÊ NÃO TERÁ PERMISSÃO DE CONTINUAR UTILIZANDO OS SERVIÇOS.

Termos Adicionais

   Oferecemos uma ampla variedade de produtos e serviços, incluindo
   produtos de software e serviços.  Alguns produtos ou serviços
   disponíveis em nossos websites podem estar sujeitos a outros termos e
   condições ou a termos e condições adicionais “Termos Adicionais”).
   Esses Termos Adicionais serão disponibilizados com os produtos ou
   serviços relevantes, como sendo postados diretamente no website desses
   produtos ou serviços ou sendo apresentados como um conjunto separado de
   termos e condições no momento da compra, download, acesso, navegação ou
   uso desses produtos ou serviços.  Na extensão em que esses Termos de
   Uso se aplicarem a esses produtos ou serviços (ex. por serem
   disponibilizados em nossos websites) mas forem inconsistentes com os
   Termos Adicionais aplicáveis a esses produtos ou serviços, esses Termos
   Adicionais substituirão as disposições inconsistentes nestes Termos de
   Uso e regerão em relação a esses produtos ou serviços.

Propriedade

   Os Serviços, incluindo seu “look and feel” (ex. texto, imagem gráfica,
   imagens e logotipos), conteúdo exclusivo, informações e outros
   materiais contidos nos Serviços, são protegidos por lei, incluindo de
   propriedade intelectual, direitos autorais, marca registrada e outras
   leis dos Estados Unidos e tratados internacionais.  Você reconhece que
   a Western Digital e/ou nossos licenciantes detém todo o direito, título
   e interesse por e para os Serviços (incluindo qualquer patente,
   direitos autorais, sigilo comercial, marca registrada, demonstração e
   know-how e quaisquer outros direitos de propriedade intelectual nesse
   sentido ou relacionado a isso) e concorda em não tomar qualquer ação
   inconsistente com tais interesses de propriedade

Restrições de Uso

   Exceto conforme expressamente autorizado no presente, nenhum dos
   Serviços pode ser copiado, reproduzido, distribuído, republicado,
   baixado, exibido, publicado ou transmitido de qualquer forma ou por
   quaisquer meios, incluindo meio eletrônico, mecânico, fotocópia,
   gravação ou algum outro meio, sem nossa permissão prévia por escrito ou
   permissão prévia por escrito do titular dos direitos autorais.  Sujeito
   a sua conformidade com estes Termos de Uso, a Western Digital garante,
   pelo presente, um direito limitado não exclusivo de acessar e usar os
   materiais contidos nos Serviços, em todo caso apenas para uso pessoal e
   não comercial e contanto que você não modifique, revenda ou faça uso
   comercial desses materiais.  Esta permissão é rescindida
   automaticamente se você infringir algum destes Termos de Uso.  Após a
   rescisão, você deve destruir imediatamente quaisquer materiais obtidos
   pelos Serviços.

   Você concorda que não irá: remover ou alterar qualquer aviso de direito
   autoral ou outros direitos exclusivos ou a legenda de direitos
   restritos contidas ou incluídas nos Serviços; descompilar, desmontar,
   fazer a compilação reversa, montagem reversa ou, de outra forma,
   engenharia reversa de quaisquer Serviços, quaisquer atualizações, ou
   qualquer parte dela (exceto e apenas na extensão em que qualquer dessas
   restrições forem proibidas pela lei aplicável); utilizar qualquer meio
   para descobrir qualquer código-fonte confidencial de qualquer parte dos
   Serviços; ou contornar qualquer funcionalidade que controle o acesso
   aos Serviços ou que de alguma forma os proteja.

   Você também concorda em não Utilizar os Serviços de qualquer forma que
   moleste, abuse, persiga, ameace, difame, infrinja ou, de outra forma,
   viole os direitos de qualquer outra parte ou em não carregar, publicar,
   enviar por e-mail, transmitir ou, de outra forma, disponibilizar
   qualquer conteúdo que seja ilegítimo, prejudicial,ameaçador, abusivo,
   molestante, desonesto, difamatório, vulgar, obsceno, acusatório,
   invasivo da privacidade de outra pessoa, de ódio ou que seja
   racialmente, etnicamente ou de alguma outra forma censurável.  Você
   concorda que a Western Digital não é, de nenhuma forma, responsável por
   qualquer Uso feito por você, nem por qualquer mensagem ou transmissões
   molestadoras, ameaçadoras, difamatórias, ofensivas ou ilegais que você
   possa receber como resultado do Uso dos Serviços.  Você concorda que
   não irá, de forma intencional ou não intencional, violar qualquer lei
   aplicável relacionada ao Uso dos Serviços.  Se violar qualquer uma das
   previsões acima, você pode estar sujeito a sanções legais e danos.

   Você reconhece que, exceto conforme expressamente estabelecido no
   presente, nenhum destes Termos de Uso serão considerados como
   concedendo qualquer licença a você sobre qualquer uma de nossas
   patentes como licenciantes ou outros direitos de propriedade
   intelectual, seja por preclusão, implicação ou, de outra forma, e você
   concorda que possui a responsabilidade exclusiva por obter tais
   licenças por acordos por escrito separados.  O Uso não autorizado de
   quaisquer Serviços pode violar leis de direitos autorais, leis de marca
   registrada, as leis de privacidade e publicidade e as normas e
   estatutos de comunicação.

Registro de Conta e Subscrições

   Podemos demandar que você registre uma conta para Usar certas funções
   ou seções dos Serviços (uma “Conta de Usuário”).  Você pode criar uma
   Conta de Usuário preenchendo o processo de registro estabelecido na
   seção aplicável dos Serviços.  Você é responsável por fornecer
   informações de conta precisas e atuais.

   Você é o único usuário autorizado de sua Conta de Usuário.  Você é
   responsável por manter a confidencialidade de qualquer senha e número
   de conta fornecido por você ou pela Western Digital para Utilizar os
   Serviços.  Você é integralmente responsável pelas atividades que
   ocorrerem em sua Conta de Usuário.  A Western Digital pode não ter
   controle sobre o uso de sua Conta de Usuário ou de qualquer outro
   usuário e a Western Digital expressamente renuncia qualquer
   responsabilidade disso derivada.

Práticas de Privacidade

   Seu Uso dos Serviços também está sujeito a nossa Política de
   Privacidade, que está disponível clicando aqui (a “Política de
   Privacidade”).  Por favor, revise a Política de Privacidade para saber
   mais sobre as práticas de privacidade.

Concessão de Licença de Conteúdo de Usuário

   Como condição de seu Uso dos Serviços, ao postar, carregar, publicar,
   encaminhar, exibir ou transmitir qualquer conteúdo ou outros materiais
   pelos Serviços (“Seu Conteúdo”, você concede, pelo presente, à Western
   Digital uma licença não exclusiva, permanente, irrevogável, livre de
   royalties, mundial, transferível, totalmente sublicenciável (incluindo
   a outros usuários dos Serviços) a acessar, utilizar, reproduzir,
   transmitir, exibir, publicar, distribuir, realizar publicamente, exibir
   publicamente, modificar, adaptar e criar trabalhos derivados a partir
   de Seu Conteúdo e incorporar Seu Conteúdo a outros trabalhos, em
   qualquer formato ou meio atualmente conhecidos ou desenvolvidos
   posteriormente para qualquer fim comercial ou não comercial.  Você
   declara e garante: que detém ou, de outra forma, controla todos os
   direitos de Seu Conteúdo, incluindo todos os direitos autorais; que Seu
   Conteúdo é preciso e não infringe ou se apropria indevidamente de
   quaisquer direitos de propriedade intelectual de qualquer terceiro,
   incluindo os direitos de publicidade e privacidade; e que o uso de Seu
   Conteúdo não viola estes Termos de Uso ou a Política de Privacidade e
   não causará lesão a qualquer pessoa ou entidade.  Não assumimos
   responsabilidade e não nos responsabilizamos por qualquer conteúdo ou
   outros materiais encaminhados ou publicados pelos Serviços, por você ou
   por qualquer terceiro.  Na extensão em que Seu Conteúdo contém
   quaisquer imagens, você também declara e garante que qualquer pessoa
   ilustrada nessas imagens, se houver, deu consentimento para o uso das
   imagens, conforme estabelecido nestes Termos de Uso.

   RESERVAMO-NOS AO DIREITO DE PRÉ-SELECIONAR, RECUSAR, MODIFICAR OU
   REMOVER QUALQUER CONTEÚDO OU MATERIAL SOBRE OS SERVIÇOS POR QUALQUER
   MOTIVO, INCLUINDO SE DETERMINARMOS, A NOSSO PRÓPRIO CRITÉRIO, QUE TAL
   CONTEÚDO OU MATERIAL VIOLA QUALQUER LEI OU DIREITO DE QUALQUER PESSOA,
   INFRINGE OS DIREITOS DE QUALQUER PESSOA OU É, DE OUTRA FORMA,
   INAPROPRIADO PARA PUBLICAÇÃO NOS SERVIÇOS.

Acesso Fora dos Estados Unidos

   Os Serviços são controlados e operados por nós a partir de nossos
   escritórios dentro dos Estados Unidos.  Não declaramos que os Serviços
   são apropriados ou disponíveis para Uso em outros locais e o acesso a
   eles a partir de territórios onde seu conteúdo é ilegal ou proibido.
   Aqueles que optarem pelo Uso dos Serviços de outros locais fazem isso
   por sua própria iniciativa e são responsáveis pelo cumprimento às leis
   locais aplicáveis.  Se Utilizar os Serviços de outros locais, você é
   responsável por cumprir as leis locais aplicáveis, incluindo as normas
   de exportação e importação de outros países.  Você reconhece e concorda
   que alguns ou todos os Serviços, incluindo os materiais ali contidos,
   podem estar sujeitos às Leis e Regulamentos da Administração de
   Exportação dos EUA, às Regulamentações de Sanções Econômicas do
   Escritório de Controle de Ativos Estrangeiros (“OFAC” - Office of
   Foreign Assets Control) do Departamento do Tesouro dos Estados Unidos,
   e também a leis de exportação de outros países, e que o uso indevido
   dos Serviços contrário à lei dos Estados Unidos ou à lei de outros
   países aplicáveis é proibido.  Você concorda que nenhum dos Serviços,
   nem qualquer produto direto dele, está sendo ou será adquirido,
   enviado, transferido, exportado ou reexportado, direta ou
   indiretamente, a países proibidos ou com embargo ou a seus cidadãos, e
   nem será Usado para atividades nucleares, armas químicas ou biológicas,
   ou projetos de mísseis, a menos que especificamente autorizado pelo
   governo dos Estados Unidos (ou outro governo relevante) para tais
   finalidades.  Ao acessar o website, você declara e garante que não é
   cidadão ou residente, e que não é um residente usual, de qualquer país
   ou região que está sujeita a um embargo pelo governo dos Estados
   Unidos, e que não está listado como um membro na lista de cidadãos
   especialmente designados e de pessoas bloqueadas mantida pela OFAC.
   Você concorda em cumprir rigorosamente todas as leis de exportação,
   reexportação e de importação, assumindo a responsabilidade exclusiva
   pela obtenção de licenças para exportar, reexportar ou importar
   conforme necessário.

Links para Sites e Aplicativos de Terceiros

   Os Serviços podem conter links a websites ou aplicações de terceiros.
   Entretanto, esteja ciente de que não somos responsáveis e não
   controlamos esses outros websites ou aplicações.  A Western Digital não
   faz qualquer declaração quanto a qualquer outro website ou aplicação
   que você possa acessar pelos Serviços.  Quando você acessa ou website
   ou aplicação de terceiros, mesmo um que possa exibir um logo da empresa
   Western Digital, fica a seu critério tomar as precauções para garantir
   que concorda com os termos de uso do website ou aplicação e que o
   website ou aplicação está livre de itens como vírus, worms, cavalos de
   troia e outros itens de natureza destrutiva.  Você concorda que, em
   nenhuma circunstância, a Western Digital será responsável, de qualquer
   forma, por quaisquer websites ou aplicativos de terceiros.

Limitação de Responsabilidade

   NA EXTENSÃO MÁXIMA PERMITIDA PELA LEI APLICÁVEL, NÓS E NOSSODIRETORES,
   OFICIAIS,COLABORADORES E CONSULTORES (COLETIVAMENTE, “AS PARTES DA
   WESTERN DIGITAL”) NÃO SEREMOS RESPONSÁVEIS PORQUAISQUER DANOS SOFRIDOS
   COMO RESULTADO DO USO, MODIFICAÇÃO,CONTRIBUIÇÃO, CÓPIA,DISTRIBUIÇÃO OU
   DOWNLOAD DOS SERVIÇOS OUPOR NÃO CONSEGUIR FAZER ALGUMA DAS ATIVIDADES
   ACIMA. EM NENHUM CASO AS PARTES DA WESTERN DIGITAL SERÃO RESPONSÁVEIS
   POR QUALQUER DANO INDIRETO, EXTRAORDINÁRIO, EXEMPLAR, PUNITIVO,
   ESPECIAL, INCIDENTALOU CONSEQUENTE (INCLUINDO PERDA DE DADOS, RECEITA,
   LUCROS, USOOU OUTRA VANTAGEM ECONÔMICA), PROVENIENTE, SEJA POR INFRAÇÃO
   OU ATO ILÍCITO, MESMO SE AS PARTES DAWESTERN DIGITAL TIVEREM
   SIDOANTERIORMENTE ORIENTADAS SOBRE A POSSIBILIDADE DESSE DANO.

   VOCÊ CONCORDA QUE TEM RESPONSABILIDADE EXCLUSIVA PELA PROTEÇÃO ADEQUADA
   E BACKUP DOS DADOS E/OU EQUIPAMENTO USADOS EM CONJUNTO COM OS SERVIÇOS
   E QUE NÃO FARÁ UMA REIVINDICAÇÃO DE QUALQUER NATUREZA CONTA AS PARTES
   DA WESTERN DIGITAL POR DADOS PERDIDOS, RESULTADOSIMPRECISOS, ATRASOS NO
   TRABALHO, OU PERDA DE LUCROS RESULTANTEDO USO OU DA INCAPACIDADE DE USO
   DOS SERVIÇOS.

   VOCÊ CONCORDA EM MANTER AS PARTES DA WESTERN DIGITAL INTEGRALMENTE
   ISENTAS DE E CONCORDA EM NÃO PROCESSAR AS PARTES DA WESTERN DIGITAL POR
   QUAISQUER REIVINDICAÇÕES RELACIONADASAOS SERVIÇOS. SE TIVER QUALQUER
   BASE PARA RECUPERAÇÃO DE DANOS (INCLUINDO INFRAÇÃO A ESTES TERMOS DE
   USO) DEQUALQUER PARTE DA WESTERN DIGITAL EM RELAÇÃO AOS SERVIÇOS OU A
   ESTES TERMOS DEUSO, VOCÊ CONCORDA QUE SEU REMÉDIO EXCLUSIVO É SE
   RECUPERAR DOS DANOS PELAS PARTES DA WESTERN DIGITAL ATÉ UMA QUANTIA
   IGUAL A SEUS HONORÁRIOS DE SERVIÇO DO MÊS DURANTE O QUAL AINFRAÇÃO
   OCORREU (OU ATÉ $100,00 SE AS REIVINDICAÇÕES FOREM RELATIVASA QUAISQUER
   SERVIÇOS GRATUITOS).

   ESSAS LIMITAÇÕES DASRESPONSABILIDADES DAS PARTES DA WESTERN DIGITAL SE
   APLICARÃOCASO A WESTERN DIGITAL TENHA SIDO ORIENTADA OU NÃOOU CASO
   TENHA TOMADOCIÊNCIA OU NÃO DA POSSIBILIDADE DE QUAISQUER DESSAS PERDAS.
   ALGUNS ESTADOSNÃO PERMITEM A EXCLUSÃO OU LIMITAÇÃO DE RESPONSABILIDADE
   POR DANOS CONSEQUENTES OU INCIDENTAIS, DE FORMA QUE A LIMITAÇÃO ACIMA
   PODE NÃO SE APLICAR AO SEU CASO.

Aviso Legal

   VOCÊ RECONHECE EXPRESSAMENTE QUE O USO DOS SERVIÇOS É DE SEURISCO
   EXCLUSIVO E QUE TODOS OS RISCOS QUANTO À QUALIDADE SATISFATÓRIA,
   DESEMPENHO, EXATIDÃO E ESFORÇO É POR SUA CONTA. TODAS AS PARTES DOS
   SERVIÇOS SÃO FORNECIDAS PELA WESTERN DIGITAL APENAS “COMO SE
   ENCONTRAM”, “COM TODAS AS FALHAS” E “CONFORME DISPONÍVEL”, COM TODAS AS
   IMPERFEIÇÕES E SEM GARANTIA DE QUALQUER TIPO. A WESTERN DIGITAL, PELO
   PRESENTE, EXPRESSAMENTE NEGA QUAISQUER DECLARAÇÕES, GARANTIAS E
   CONDIÇÕES RELATIVAS AOS SERVIÇOS (INCLUINDO SEU USO, DESEMPENHO E
   SUPORTE), SEJAM ELAS EXPRESSAS, IMPLÍCITAS, ESTATUTÁRIAS OU DE OUTRA
   FORMA, INCLUINDO QUAISQUER GARANTIAS IMPLÍCITAS DE ADEQUAÇÃO A UM FIM
   ESPECÍFICO, COMERCIABILIDADE, TÍTULOE NÃO INFRAÇÃO.A WESTERN DIGITAL
   NÃO DÁ QUALQUER GARANTIA RELATIVA À EXATIDÃO DOSRESULTADOS OU PRODUTO
   DERIVADO DOS SERVIÇOS.

Política de Direitos Autorais e Infração aos Direitos Autorais da DMCA

   Conforme o Item17, Código dos Estados Unidos, Seção 512(c), é da
   política da Western Digital responder a notificações das infrações
   alegadas que atendem à Digital Millennium Copyright Act [Lei dos
   Direitos Autorais do Milênio Digital] e outras leis de propriedade
   intelectual aplicáveis.  Respeitamos a propriedade intelectual de
   outras entidades.  Se achar que seu trabalho foi copiado de alguma
   forma que constitua uma infração aos direitos autorais, por favor,
   utilize os procedimentos informados em nossa Política de Direitos
   Autorais.

Política de Uso de Marca Registrada

   As marcas registradas, logos e marcas de serviço (coletivamente,
   “Marcas”) exibidas com o fornecimento de nossos produtos e serviços,
   são de propriedade da Western Digital ou terceiros.  As Marcas da
   Western Digital só podem ser usadas em circunstâncias limitadas e com a
   aprovação prévia por escrito da Western Digital.  As aprovações são
   concedidas caso a caso.  Todos os usos aprovados devem estar em total
   concordância com nossas Diretrizes de Uso de Marca Registrada e Logo.
   Clique aqui para obter uma lista não completa das Marcas da Western
   Digital.

Direitos Restritos do Governo dos Estados Unidos

   Os Serviços são prestados com “DIREITOS RESTRITOS”.  O uso, duplicação
   ou divulgação pelo governo dos Estados Unidos estão sujeitos às
   restrições conforme determinadas no FAR52.227-14 e DFAR252.227-7013 et
   seq., suas sucessoras ou quaisquer outras leis e normas aplicáveis.  O
   uso dos Serviços pelo governo dos Estados Unidos constitui o
   reconhecimento de nossos direitos exclusivos em si.

Escolha da Lei; Independência das Cláusulas

   Qualquer reivindicação proveniente de ou relativa aos Serviços,
   incluindo o Uso de (ou incapacidade de Uso) dos Serviços, é regida
   pelas leis do Estado da Califórnia, sem levar em conta conflitos de
   princípios legais.  Você concorda em encaminhar para a jurisdição
   exclusiva dos tribunais do estado e federais localizados no condado de
   Santa Clara, Califórnia, para a resolução de qualquer disputa
   proveniente ou relativa ao Uso dos Serviços.  Se alguma disposição
   desses Termos de Uso for considerada inválida, nula ou, por alguma
   razão, inexigível, essa disposição deve ser considerada exclusiva e não
   afetará a validade e exigibilidade de qualquer disposição remanescente
   destes Termos de Uso.

   Os usuários dos Serviços da Califórnia têm direito a receber a seguinte
   notificação de direitos do consumidor: A Unidade de Assistência a
   Reclamações [Complaint Assistance Unit] da Divisão de Serviços ao
   Consumidor do Departamento de Assuntos do Consumidor da Califórnia pode
   ser contatada por escrito pelo 1625 North Market Blvd., Suite N 112,
   Sacramento, CA 95834, ou por telefone pelo (800) 952-5210.

Declarações Prospectivas

   Algumas das informações sobre nossos Serviços, incluindo nossos
   websites, como investor.wdc.com, podem conter políticas prospectivas no
   sentido das leis de títulos federais, incluindo informações sobre
   eventos futuros, nossos planos ou desempenho financeiros ou
   operacionais futuros, nosso crescimento previsto, tendências em nossos
   negócios e nos mercados em que operamos, e outras caracterizações de
   eventos ou circunstâncias futuras.  Todas as declarações que não forem
   fatos históricos são baseadas em nossas atuais expectativas e estão
   sujeitas a diversos riscos e incertezas que podem fazer com que os
   resultados reais difiram materialmente daqueles expressados ou
   implícitos nas declarações prospectivas.  Mais informações sobre os
   riscos e incertezas que poderiam afetar nossos negócios estão listadas
   em nossos protocolos na Comissão de Títulos e Câmbios dos Estados
   Unidos (a “SEC”) e disponíveis no website da SEC no www.sec.gov,
   incluindo nosso relatório periódico protocolado mais recentemente, para
   o qual sua atenção é direcionada.  Você não deve confiar indevidamente
   nessas declarações prospectivas.  Não assumimos qualquer obrigação por
   atualizar ou revisar publicamente qualquer declaração prospectiva, seja
   como resultado de novas informações, futuros desenvolvimentos, ou de
   outra forma, exceto conforme exigido por lei.

Alterações aos Serviços

   A Western Digital se reserva ao direito de alterar ou descontinuar,
   temporária ou permanentemente, os Serviços (ou qualquer parte deles),
   ou os produtos ou serviços neles descritos a qualquer momento sem
   aviso.  Mediante o término dos Serviços ou de qualquer de suas partes,
   a Western Digital não tem a obrigação de manter ou dar Seu
   Consentimento ou outros dados.

Contato

   Se tiver dúvidas, reclamações ou comentários sobre estes Termos de Uso,
   se desejar receber mais informações sobre os Serviços ou se desejar
   contatar, de outra forma, a Western Digital, entre em contato conosco
   conforme as informações localizadas em nossa página Contato com a
   Western Digital.

     * {{unescape(item.title)}}
          + {{anchor.title}}

   Última actualización realizada el 28 de mayo de 2018.

   Estas Condiciones de uso (las presentes «Condiciones de Uso») regulan
   su Uso (tal y como se define a continuación) de los sitios web
   ofrecidos por Western Digital Technologies, Inc. y/o sus afiliadas
   (conjuntamente denominadas «Western Digital», «nosotros» o «nuestro») y
   todo el contenido, las funcionalidades, los materiales, el software y
   la documentación relacionada, así como los servicios disponibles en
   tales sitios web (se hará referencia de forma colectiva a tales sitios
   web, contenido, funcionalidades, materiales, software y documentación
   relacionada, así como a los servicios, como los «Servicios»).

   IMPORTANTE: SE RUEGA LEER CON ATENCIÓN. Si no está de acuerdo con lo
   establecido en las presentes Condiciones de Uso, no tiene autorización
   para Usar los Servicios.

   Para ayudarle a navegar en el documento y encontrar secciones
   específicas de las presentes Condiciones de Uso, le remitimos al índice
   que figura a continuación:

Aceptación de las Condiciones de Uso

   Mediante el Uso (tal y como se define a continuación) de los Servicios,
   usted declara y garantiza que es, al menos, mayor de edad en su
   jurisdicción y que tiene todas las facultades, autorizaciones y
   permisos necesarios para suscribir y obligarse en virtud de las
   presentes Condiciones de Uso; usted reconoce que ha leído y comprendido
   las presentes Condiciones de Uso y acuerda obligarse en virtud de las
   mismas; y usted acuerda cumplir con todas las leyes y los reglamentos
   aplicables en relación con su Uso de los Servicios.

   Si usted Usa los Servicios en nombre de una empresa, organización u
   otra entidad, por «usted» se entenderá que se incluye usted y dicha
   entidad; usted declara y garantiza que es un representante autorizado
   de la entidad con autorización para obligar a la entidad en virtud de
   las presentes Condiciones de Uso y que acepta las presentes Condiciones
   de Uso en nombre de la entidad; y acuerda asimismo que dicha entidad es
   responsable, desde un punto de vista legal y financiero, de su Uso de
   los Servicios, así como del uso de su Cuenta de Usuario (tal y como se
   define a continuación) por parte de otros afiliados a su entidad,
   incluidos cualesquier empleados, agentes o contratistas.

Interpretación

   A los efectos de las presentes Condiciones de Uso, el verbo «Usar» en
   mayúsculas significa acceder, navegar, crear una Cuenta de Usuario (tal
   y como se define a continuación) en los Servicios, así como subir
   contenido o material, descargar contenido o material o de otro modo
   usar los Servicios (y el sustantivo «Uso» y el gerundio «Usando»
   tendrán significados semejantes); los términos «usted» y «suyo» hacen
   referencia a usted como usuario que Usa los Servicios; y se entenderá
   que las palabras «incluye», «incluido» o «incluyendo» van siempre
   seguidas de las palabras «a modo no limitativo».

Enmiendas a las presentes Condiciones de Uso

   PODREMOS, A NUESTRA TOTAL DISCRECIÓN, ENMENDAR LAS PRESENTES
   CONDICIONES DE USO EN CUALQUIER MOMENTO MEDIANTE LA ACTUALIZACIÓN DE
   ESTA PÁGINA. SI USTED CONTINÚA USANDO LOS SERVICIOS TRAS UNA ENMIENDA
   DE ESTE TIPO, QUEDARÁ OBLIGADO EN VIRTUD DE TAL ENMIENDA. POR TANTO,
   DEBE VISITAR LA PÁGINA PERIÓDICAMENTE PARA VERIFICAR LAS PRESENTES
   CONDICIONES DE USO. SI ALGUNO DE LOS CAMBIOS LE RESULTA INACEPTABLE, NO
   SE LE PERMITE CONTINUAR USANDO LOS SERVICIOS.

Condiciones adicionales

   Ofrecemos una amplia gama de productos y servicios, incluidos productos
   y servicios de software. Algunos productos o servicios disponibles en
   nuestros sitios web pueden estar sujetos a otras condiciones o a
   condiciones adicionales («Condiciones Adicionales»). Se pondrán a
   disposición tales Condiciones Adicionales con los productos o servicios
   pertinentes, ya sea publicándose directamente en el sitio web de dichos
   productos o servicios o presentándose como un conjunto de condiciones
   independientes en el momento de la compra, descarga, el acceso, la
   navegación o el uso de tales productos o servicios. En la medida en que
   las presentes Condiciones de Uso se apliquen a tales productos o
   servicios (p. ej., porque se ponen a disposición en nuestros sitios
   web) pero sean incoherentes con las Condiciones Adicionales aplicables
   a dichos productos o servicios, tales Condiciones Adicionales
   prevalecerán sobre las disposiciones incoherentes de las presentes
   Condiciones de Uso y se aplicarán respecto a tales productos o
   servicios.

Propiedad

   Los Servicios, incluido su «aspecto general» (look and feel) (p. ej.,
   el texto, los gráficos, las imágenes y los logos), el contenido de
   propiedad exclusiva, la información y otros materiales contenidos en
   los Servicios están protegidos por ley, incluidas las leyes de Estados
   Unidos sobre propiedad intelectual, derechos de autor, marcas
   comerciales y otras leyes, así como por las disposiciones de tratados
   internacionales. Usted reconoce que Western Digital y/o nuestros
   otorgantes de licencias son los propietarios de todos los derechos y la
   titularidad en relación con los Servicios (con inclusión de la
   totalidad de las patentes, derechos de autor, secretos comerciales,
   marcas comerciales, demostraciones técnicas (show-how), y conocimientos
   técnicos (know-how), y todos y cualesquier otros derechos de propiedad
   intelectual inherentes a los mismos o relacionados con los mismos), y
   usted acuerda no tomar ninguna medida que resulte incoherente con tales
   derechos relativos a la propiedad.

Restricciones del Uso

   Salvo autorización expresa en el presente, ninguno de los Servicios
   podrá someterse a copia, reproducción, distribución, nueva publicación,
   descarga, exhibición, publicación, o transmisión de ninguna forma ni
   por ningún medio, incluidos medios electrónicos y mecánicos, ni
   mediante fotocopia, grabación ni de ningún otro modo, sin la
   autorización previa por escrito emitida por nosotros o por el
   propietario de los derechos de autor. Con sujeción a que usted cumpla
   con las presentes Condiciones de Uso, Western Digital, por el presente,
   le concede un derecho limitado no exclusivo de acceder y usar los
   materiales incluidos en los Servicios, en cada caso para uso personal y
   no comercial exclusivamente, y siempre que usted no modifique, revenda
   ni dé ningún uso comercial a dichos materiales. Este permiso terminará
   automáticamente si usted incumple cualquiera de las presentes
   Condiciones de Uso. Tras la terminación, usted debe destruir
   inmediatamente todos los materiales obtenidos de los Servicios.

   Usted acuerda que no quitará ni modificará ninguna notificación o
   leyenda sobre la restricción de derechos en relación con derechos de
   autor o derechos de propiedad exclusiva incluidas en los Servicios; que
   no descompilará ni desensamblará, ni compilará ni ensamblará de manera
   inversa, ni aplicará ninguna otra técnica de ingeniería inversa a
   ninguno de los Servicios, ninguna actualización de los mismos ni
   ninguna parte de los mismos (salvo y únicamente en la medida en que
   cualquiera de las restricciones antes mencionadas esté prohibida por
   ley); que no usará ningún medio para averiguar ningún tipo de código
   fuente confidencial de ninguna porción de los Servicios; y que no
   eludirá ninguna funcionalidad que controle el acceso a los Servicios o
   que proteja los Servicios de alguna otra manera.

   Usted también conviene en que no Usará los Servicios de ningún modo con
   el fin de hostigar, acosar, molestar, amenazar, difamar, infringir ni
   de otro modo violar los derechos de cualquier otra parte, ni subir,
   publicar, enviar por correo electrónico, transmitir ni de otro modo
   permitir el acceso a cualquier contenido que sea ilegítimo, peligroso,
   amenazador, abusivo, atormentador, enrevesado, difamatorio, vulgar,
   obsceno, calumniante, invasivo de la privacidad de otra persona, que
   incite al odio u objetable desde un punto de vista de origen racial,
   étnico o de otro. Usted conviene en que Western Digital no asume
   ninguna responsabilidad respecto de su Uso de los Servicios del modo
   antes descrito, ni respecto de ningún tipo de mensajes o transmisiones
   atormentadores, amenazadores, difamatorios, ofensivos o ilegales que
   usted pudiera recibir como consecuencia de su Uso de los Servicios.
   Usted acuerda que no infringirá, de forma intencional o no intencional,
   ninguna ley aplicable en relación con su Uso de los Servicios. Si
   incumple alguna de las disposiciones precedentes, podrá tener que
   responder en tribunales y pagar daños y perjuicios.

   Usted reconoce que, salvo en la medida aquí expresamente establecida,
   nada de lo dispuesto en las presentes Condiciones de Uso se
   interpretará como que le otorga a usted una licencia respecto de
   patentes u otros derechos de propiedad intelectual nuestros o de
   nuestros otorgantes de licencias, ya sea en virtud del principio de
   estoppel (impedimento), por inferencia, o de otro modo, y usted acuerda
   que usted asume la totalidad de la responsabilidad para la obtención de
   tales licencias mediante un acuerdo por escrito por separado. El Uso no
   autorizado de cualquiera de los Servicios puede infringir las leyes de
   derechos de autor, las leyes sobre marcas comerciales, las leyes sobre
   privacidad y publicidad, y las normas y disposiciones legales sobre
   comunicaciones.

Registro de Cuenta y Suscripciones

   Es posible que le solicitemos que registre una cuenta para Usar
   determinadas funcionalidades o secciones de los Servicios (una «Cuenta
   de Usuario»). Puede crear una Cuenta de Usuario completando el proceso
   de registro establecido en la sección aplicable de los Servicios. Usted
   tiene la responsabilidad de que la información sobre la cuenta que
   facilite sea exacta y esté actualizada.

   Usted es el único usuario autorizado de su Cuenta de Usuario. Usted
   tiene la responsabilidad de mantener la confidencialidad de cualquier
   contraseña y número de cuenta proporcionado por usted o por Western
   Digital para el Uso de los Servicios.  Usted asume la responsabilidad
   exclusiva respecto de todas las actividades realizadas con su Cuenta de
   Usuario. Es posible que Western Digital no tenga control sobre el uso
   de su Cuenta de Usuario o de la Cuenta de Usuario de cualquier otro
   usuario, y Western Digital expresamente rechaza cualquier
   responsabilidad derivada de tales usos.

Prácticas de Privacidad

   El Uso, por su parte, de los Servicios también está sujeto a nuestra
   Política de Privacidad, que está disponible para consulta si se hace
   clic aquí (la «Política de privacidad»). Le rogamos que lea
   detenidamente la Política de privacidad para obtener más información
   sobre nuestras prácticas de privacidad.

Concesión de Licencia respecto al Contenido de Usuario

   Como condición para el Uso, por parte de usted, de los Servicios, al
   publicar, subir, compartir, enviar, exhibir, o transmitir cualquier
   contenido u otros materiales a través de los Servicios («Su
   Contenido»), usted concede a Western Digital una licencia no exclusiva,
   a perpetuidad, irrevocable, libre de regalías, aplicable a nivel
   internacional, transferible y plenamente sublicenciable (lo cual
   incluye para otros usuarios de los Servicios) para acceder, utilizar,
   reproducir, transmitir, exhibir, publicar, distribuir, presentar en
   público, modificar, adaptar y crear obras derivadas de Su Contenido y
   para incorporar Su Contenido en otras obras en cualquier formato o
   medio conocido en el presente o que se cree en el futuro con todos y
   cualesquier fines comerciales o no comerciales. Usted declara y
   garantiza: que usted es el propietario o que, de otro modo, tiene el
   control sobre todos los derechos relativos a Su Contenido, incluidos
   todos los derechos de autor; que Su Contenido es exacto y no infringe
   ni se apropia indebidamente de los derechos de propiedad intelectual de
   ningún tercero, incluidos los derechos de publicidad y privacidad; y
   que el uso de Su Contenido no infringe las presentes Condiciones de Uso
   ni la Política de privacidad y no causará ningún daño a ninguna persona
   ni entidad. No asumimos ningún tipo de responsabilidad respecto de
   ningún contenido ni otros materiales enviados o publicados por medio de
   los Servicios, ya sea por usted o por un tercero. En la medida en que
   Su Contenido incluya imágenes, usted declara y garantiza asimismo que
   cada una de las personas que aparecen en tales imágenes, si
   corresponde, ha dado su consentimiento para el uso de las imágenes, tal
   y como se dispone en las presentes Condiciones de Uso.

   NOS RESERVAMOS EL DERECHO DE PRESELECCIONAR, RECHAZAR, MODIFICAR O
   ELIMINAR CUALQUIER CONTENIDO O MATERIAL EN LOS SERVICIOS POR CUALQUIER
   MOTIVO, LO CUAL INCLUYE LOS CASOS EN QUE DETERMINEMOS, A NUESTRA
   EXCLUSIVA DISCRECIÓN, que dicho contenido O MATERIAL INFRINGE ALGUNA
   LEY O DERECHO DE ALGUNA PERSONA, que INFRINGE LOS DERECHOS DE ALGUNA
   PERSONA O que NO ES APROPIADO, POR ALGÚN OTRO MOTIVO,  PARA SU
   PUBLICACIÓN EN LOS SERVICIOS.

Acceso desde fuera de los Estados Unidos

   Nosotros, desde nuestras oficinas situadas en Estados Unidos, llevamos
   el control y operamos los Servicios. No realizamos ninguna declaración
   en el sentido de que los Servicios son adecuados o están disponibles
   para su Uso en otras zonas geográficas, y se prohíbe el acceso a los
   mismos desde territorios donde su contenido es ilegal.  Quienes decidan
   Usar los Servicios desde otras zonas geográficas lo hacen por
   iniciativa propia y son responsables del cumplimiento de las leyes
   locales aplicables. Si usted Usa los Servicios desde otras zonas
   geográficas, usted es responsable del cumplimiento de las leyes locales
   aplicables, incluidas las normas de exportación e importación de otros
   países. Usted reconoce que algunos o todos los Servicios, con inclusión
   de los materiales incluidos en los mismos, pueden estar sujetos a las
   Leyes y Reglamentos sobre Administración de Exportaciones de los
   Estados Unidos, los Reglamentos sobre Sanciones Económicas de la
   Oficina de Control de Activos Extranjeros (OFAC, por sus siglas en
   inglés) del Departamento del Tesoro de los Estados Unidos, así como a
   leyes sobre exportaciones de otros países y que queda prohibido el
   desvío de los Servicios en contravención de la legislación de los
   Estados Unidos o de otros países aplicables. Usted conviene en que
   ninguno de los Servicios ni ningún producto directo derivado de los
   mismos se está adquiriendo o será adquirido con el fin de enviarlo,
   transferirlo, exportarlo o reexportarlo, directa o indirectamente, a
   países embargados o proscritos o a sus ciudadanos, y que los mismos no
   se usarán con fines de actividades nucleares ni proyectos de armas
   químicas o biológicas o de misiles, salvo que así esté autorizado
   específicamente por el gobierno de los Estados Unidos (u otro gobierno
   pertinente) con tales fines. Al acceder al sitio web, usted declara y
   garantiza que usted no es ciudadano ni residente, y que no tiene su
   residencia habitual, en ningún país o región que esté sujeta a embargo
   por el gobierno de los Estados Unidos, y que usted no figura como parte
   sancionada en la lista de ciudadanos especialmente designados y
   personas bloqueadas mantenida por la OFAC. Usted acuerda cumplir
   estrictamente con todas las leyes sobre exportaciones, reexportaciones
   e importaciones y asume la totalidad de la responsabilidad respecto de
   la obtención de licencias para la exportación, reexportación o
   importación, según se le exija.

Enlaces a Sitios y Aplicaciones de Terceros

   Los Servicios pueden incluir enlaces a sitios web o aplicaciones de
   terceros. Sin embargo, tenga en cuenta que no somos responsables
   respecto de estos sitios web o aplicaciones, y que no tenemos control
   sobre los mismos. Western Digital no realiza ninguna declaración
   respecto de ningún otro sitio web o aplicación a la que usted acceda a
   través de los Servicios. Cuando acceda a un sitio web o una aplicación
   de un tercero, aunque en ellos aparezca el logo de la empresa Western
   Digital, a usted corresponderá tomar precauciones para asegurarse de
   que está de acuerdo con las condiciones de uso de tal sitio web o
   aplicación y que tal sitio web o aplicación no contienen virus,
   gusanos, troyanos, ni otros  elementos de naturaleza destructiva.
   Usted acuerda que, en ninguna circunstancia y de ninguna forma, se
   considerará que Western Digital es responsable respecto de ningún sitio
   web o aplicación de terceros.

Limitación de la Responsabilidad

   EN LA MAYOR MEDIDA PERMITIDA POR LA LEGISLACIÓN APLICABLE, NOSOTROS Y
   NUESTROS ADMINISTRADORES, DIRECTIVOS, EMPLEADOS Y CONSULTORES
   (CONJUNTAMENTE, «LAS PARTES DE WESTERN DIGITAL») NO ASUMIREMOS
   RESPONSABILIDAD ALGUNA RESPECTO A NINGÚN TIPO DE DAÑOS SUFRIDOS COMO
   CONSECUENCIA DEL USO, MODIFICACIÓN, CONTRIBUCIÓN, COPIA, DISTRIBUCIÓN O
   DESCARGA DE LOS SERVICIOS O POR LA INCAPACIDAD DE LLEVAR A CABO LO
   ANTES DESCRITO. EN NINGÚN CASO SE CONSIDERARÁ QUE LAS PARTES DE WESTERN
   DIGITAL SON RESPONSABLES RESPECTO DE NINGÚN TIPO DE DAÑOS Y PERJUICIOS
   INDIRECTOS, EXTRAORDINARIOS, EJEMPLARES, PUNITIVOS, CUANTIFICABLES,
   SUPLEMENTARIOS O EMERGENTES (INCLUIDA LA PÉRDIDA DE DATOS, BENEFICIOS,
   INGRESOS, USO O DE OTRA VENTAJA ECONÓMICA), SIN IMPORTAR LA FORMA EN
   QUE HAYAN SURGIDO, YA SEA POR INCUMPLIMIENTO CONTRACTUAL O COMO UN ACTO
   ILÍCITO CIVIL, AUN CUANDO SE HAYA AVISADO A LAS PARTES DE WESTERN
   DIGITAL CON ANTERIORIDAD SOBRE LA POSIBILIDAD DE DICHOS DAÑOS Y
   PERJUICIOS.

   USTED ACUERDA QUE USTED ASUME LA TOTALIDAD DE LA RESPONSABILIDAD
   RESPECTO DE LA PROTECCIÓN ADECUADA Y DE LA REALIZACIÓN DE COPIAS DE
   SEGURIDAD DE LOS DATOS Y/O LOS EQUIPOS USADOS EN RELACIÓN CON LOS
   SERVICIOS Y QUE NO PRESENTARÁ NINGUNA RECLAMACIÓN CONTRA LAS PARTES DE
   WESTERN DIGITAL POR DATOS PERDIDOS, RESULTADOS INEXACTOS, DEMORAS EN
   TRABAJOS, O PÉRDIDA DE BENEFICIOS DIMANANTES DEL USO DE LOS SERVICIOS,
   O DE LA IMPOSIBILIDAD DE USAR TALES SERVICIOS.

   USTED CONVIENE EN MANTENER A LAS PARTES DE WESTERN DIGITAL PLENAMENTE
   EXENTAS DE CUALESQUIER RECLAMACIONES, Y SE COMPROMETE A NO DEMANDAR A
   LAS PARTES DE WESTERN DIGITAL, RESPECTO DE CUALESQUIER RECLAMACIONES
   RELACIONADAS CON LOS SERVICIOS. SI TIENE ALGÚN FUNDAMENTO PARA
   RECUPERAR DAÑOS Y PERJUICIOS (INCLUIDO EL INCUMPLIMIENTO DE LAS
   PRESENTES CONDICIONES DE USO) DE CUALESQUIER PARTES DE WESTERN DIGITAL
   EN RELACIÓN CON LOS SERVICIOS O LAS PRESENTES CONDICIONES DE USO, USTED
   CONVIENE EN QUE SU RECURSO JURÍDICO EXCLUSIVO ES RECUPERAR DAÑOS Y
   PERJUICIOS DE LAS PARTES DE WESTERN DIGITAL POR UNA CUANTÍA MÁXIMA
   EQUIVALENTE A LA TARIFA POR LOS SERVICIOS CORRESPONDIENTE AL MES EN EL
   QUE OCURRIÓ EL INCUMPLIMIENTO (O POR UNA CUANTÍA MÁXIMA DE 100,00 USD
   SI LAS DEMANDAS ESTÁN RELACIONADAS CON SERVICIOS GRATUITOS).

   ESTAS LIMITACIONES DE LA RESPONSABILIDAD DE LAS PARTES DE WESTERN
   DIGITAL SE APLICARÁN INDEPENDIENTEMENTE DE QUE SE HAYA ASESORADO A
   WESTERN DIGITAL, O DE QUE WESTERN DIGITAL TUVIERA QUE HABER TENIDO
   CONOCIMIENTO SOBRE LA POSIBILIDAD DE TALES PÉRDIDAS. ALGUNOS ESTADOS NO
   PERMITEN LA EXCLUSIÓN O LIMITACIÓN DE DAÑOS Y PERJUICIOS CUANTIFICABLES
   O SUPLEMENTARIOS, POR TANTO, CABE LA POSIBILIDAD DE QUE LAS EXCLUSIONES
   ANTES DESCRITAS NO SE LE APLIQUEN.

Declaración de exención de responsabilidad

   USTED RECONOCE EXPRESAMENTE QUE USTED CORRE CON EL RIESGO DEL USO DE
   LOS SERVICIOS Y QUE A USTED LE CORRESPONDE ASUMIR LA TOTALIDAD DEL
   RIESGO EN RELACIÓN CON LA CALIDAD SATISFACTORIA, EL RENDIMIENTO, LA
   EXACTITUD Y EL ESFUERZO. TODAS LAS PARTES DE LOS SERVICIOS SON
   PROPORCIONADAS POR WESTERN DIGITAL EXCLUSIVAMENTE CONFORME A LAS
   SIGUIENTES DESCRIPCIONES: «TAL CUAL ESTÁ», «CON TODOS LOS DEFECTOS» Y
   «SEGÚN ESTÁ DISPONIBLE», CON TODOS LOS DEFECTOS Y SIN NINGÚN TIPO DE
   GARANTÍA. WESTERN DIGITAL POR EL PRESENTE RECHAZA CUALESQUIER
   DECLARACIONES, GARANTÍAS, Y CONDICIONES CON RESPECTO A LOS SERVICIOS
   (INCLUIDO EL USO, FUNCIONAMIENTO Y SOPORTE DE LOS MISMOS), YA SEAN
   EXPLÍCITAS O IMPLÍCITAS, LEGALES O DE OTRO TIPO, INCLUIDAS CUALESQUIER
   GARANTÍAS IMPLÍCITAS DE IDONEIDAD PARA UN FIN PARTICULAR,
   COMERCIABILIDAD, TÍTULO Y NO INCUMPLIMIENTO. WESTERN DIGITAL NO REALIZA
   DECLARACIONES DE GARANTÍA CON RESPECTO A LA EXACTITUD DE LOS RESULTADOS
   NI DE LOS PRODUCTOS OBTENIDOS DE LOS SERVICIOS.

Política de Derechos de Autor y Demandas por Infracción de Derechos de Autor
en virtud de DMCA

   De conformidad con el título 17, artículo 512(c), del Código de los
   Estados Unidos, la política de Western Digital consiste en responder a
   notificaciones sobre presuntas infracciones que cumplen con la Ley
   «Digital Millennium Copyright Act» y otras leyes de propiedad
   intelectual aplicables. Respetamos la propiedad intelectual de los
   demás. Si usted cree que su trabajo se ha copiado de una manera que
   representa una violación de los derechos de autor, siga los pasos
   establecidos en nuestra Política de derechos de autor.

Política de Uso de Marcas Comerciales

   Las marcas comerciales, logos, y marcas de servicio (conjuntamente, las
   «Marcas») que se muestran cuando se suministran nuestros bienes y
   servicios son propiedad de Western Digital o de terceros. Las Marcas de
   Western Digital podrán utilizarse solamente en circunstancias limitadas
   y con la autorización previa por escrito de Western Digital. Las
   autorizaciones se proporcionan caso por caso. Todos los usos
   autorizados deben observar estrictamente nuestras Directrices de Uso de
   Marcas Comerciales y Logos.  Haga clic aquí para obtener una lista no
   exhaustiva de las Marcas de Western Digital.

Derechos Restringidos del Gobierno de los Estados Unidos

   Los Servicios se suministran con «DERECHOS RESTRINGIDOS». El Uso, la
   duplicación o la divulgación por el gobierno de los Estados Unidos
   están sujetos a restricciones tal y como se establece en FAR52.227-14 y
   DFAR252.227-7013 et seq., su(s) sucesora(s), o cualesquier otras leyes
   y reglamentos aplicables. El Uso de los Servicios por parte del
   gobierno de los Estados Unidos constituye el reconocimiento de nuestros
   derechos de propiedad exclusiva sobre los mismos.

Derecho Elegido; Divisibilidad

   Cualquier reclamación dimanante de los Servicios o relacionada con los
   Servicios, incluido el Uso de (o la imposibilidad de Usar) los
   Servicios, estará regida por las leyes del Estado de California, sin
   tener en cuenta los principios sobre conflictos de leyes.  Usted
   acuerda someterse a la jurisdicción exclusiva del estado y los
   tribunales federales situados en el Condado de Santa Clara, California,
   para la resolución de todas y cualesquier controversias derivadas del
   Uso de los Servicios o relacionadas con los mismos. Si se determina que
   alguna disposición de las presentes Condiciones de Uso es inválida,
   nula o inexigible por cualquier motivo, tal disposición se considerará
   divisible del resto y no afectará la validez y exigibilidad de las
   demás disposiciones de las presentes Condiciones de Uso.

   Los usuarios de los Servicios con sede en California tienen derecho a
   recibir la siguiente notificación sobre derechos de consumidores
   específicos: Se puede contactar por escrito con la Unidad de Asistencia
   en caso de Quejas (Complaint Assistance Unit) de la División de
   Servicios a los Consumidores (Division of Consumer Services) del
   Departamento de California para Asuntos de Consumidores (California
   Department of Consumer Affairs) en 1625 North Market Blvd., Suite N
   112, Sacramento, CA 95834, o por teléfono: (800) 952-5210.

Declaraciones con Miras al Futuro

   Cierta información recogida en nuestros Servicios, incluidos nuestros
   sitios web, tales como investor.wdc.com, pueden contener declaraciones
   con miras al futuro según se definen en las leyes federales sobre
   valores; esto incluye declaraciones sobre acontecimientos futuros,
   nuestros planes o rendimiento operativo o financiero futuro, nuestro
   crecimiento anticipado, tendencias en nuestras actividades comerciales
   y los mercados en los que operamos y otras caracterizaciones de eventos
   o circunstancias de futuro. Todas las declaraciones que no son hechos
   históricos se basan en nuestras expectativas actuales y están sujetas a
   una serie de riesgos e incertidumbres que pueden hacer que los
   resultados reales difieran significativamente de aquellos expresados
   explícita o implícitamente en las declaraciones con miras al futuro. Se
   puede obtener más información sobre los riesgos e incertidumbres que
   pueden afectar a nuestras actividades comerciales en los informes que
   hemos presentado ante la Comisión Oficial del Mercado de Valores de
   Estados Unidos (Securities and Exchange Commission o «SEC») que están
   disponibles en el sitio web de la SEC, www.sec.gov. Estos informes
   incluyen nuestro informe periódico más recientemente presentado, al
   cual le remitimos específicamente. No debe basarse excesivamente en
   estas declaraciones con miras al futuro. No asumimos ninguna obligación
   de actualizar ni de revisar públicamente cualquier declaración con
   miras al futuro, ya sea como consecuencia de información nueva,
   desarrollos futuros o por otros motivos, salvo que la ley así lo exija.

Modificaciones a los Servicios

   Western Digital se reserva el derecho de cambiar o interrumpir, de
   forma temporal o permanente, los Servicios (o cualquier parte de los
   mismos), o los productos o servicios descritos en los mismos, en
   cualquier momento, sin previo aviso. Tras la terminación de los
   Servicios o de cualquier parte de los mismos, Western Digital no tendrá
   ninguna obligación de mantener ni de proporcionar Su Contenido ni otros
   datos.

Contacto

   Si tiene alguna pregunta, queja o comentario sobre las presentes
   Condiciones de Uso, si desea obtener más información sobre los
   Servicios o si quiere ponerse en contacto con Western Digital por algún
   otro motivo, póngase en contacto con nosotros por medio de la
   información que aparece en nuestra página de Contacto con Western
   Digital.

     * {{unescape(item.title)}}
          + {{anchor.title}}

   最后更新于2018年5月28日。

   这些使用条款（“使用条款”）针对您使用（见下述定义）Western Digital
   Technologies，Inc.和/或其关联方（统称“Western
   Digital”、“我们”或“我们的”）提供的网站以及此类网站的内容、功能、资料、软件和相关文档及可用服务（统称为“服务”）的行为进行监管。

   重要 - 请仔细阅读 - 如果您不同意使用条款，则您无权使用服务。

   为帮助您浏览和查阅使用条款的特定部分，请参考下面的目录：

接受使用条款

   通过使用（见下文定义）服务：您声明并保证，您至少处于您所在辖区规定的成年年龄，并且拥有签订和接受使用条款的所有权力、权限和许可；您承认，您已阅
   读并理解使用条款，并同意受其约束；同时，您同意遵守与您使用服务相关的所有适用法律和法规。

   如果您代表公司、组织或其他实体使用服务，则：“您”包括您和该实体；您声明并保证，您是该实体的授权代表并有权使该实体受到使用条款的约束，而且您能
   够代表该实体接受使用条款；此外，您同意，该实体对您使用服务的行为以及该实体其他关联方（包括任何雇员、代理商或承包商）使用您的用户帐户（见下文定
   义）的行为承担法律和财务责任。

解释

   就使用条款而言：大写动词“使用”指访问、浏览、创建用户帐户（见下文定义）、上传内容或资料、下载内容或资料或以其他方式使用服务（而且，名词“使用
   ”和术语“使用”将具有对应含义）；术语“您”和“您的”指您作为使用服务的用户本人；并且本文所有“包括”都被视为“包括但不限于”。

修改使用条款

   我们可以随时自行决定通过更新本页面来修改使用条款。如果您在该修改后继续使用服务，那么您将受到此类修改的约束。因此，您应该定期访问本页面查阅使用
   条款。如果您不接受修改，您不得继续使用服务。

额外条款

   我们提供广泛的产品和服务，包括软件产品和服务。我们网站上提供的某些产品或服务可能需要遵守其他或额外的条款和条件（“额外条款”）。此类额外条款将
   与相关产品或服务一起提供，例如，直接在这些产品或服务的网站上发布，或在您购买、下载、访问、浏览或使用这些产品或服务时作为单独的一组条款和条件显
   示。如果使用条款适用于此类产品或服务（例如，因为我们的网站上提供此类产品或服务），但与适用于此类产品或服务的额外条款不一致，那么额外条款将取代
   使用条款中的不一致部分，并将对此类产品或服务具备约束力。

所有权

   服务，包括服务中包含的“外观和感受”（例如，文本、图形、图像和标识）、专有内容、信息和其他资料，均受法律（包括美国知识产权法、版权法、商标法及
   其他法律和国际条约）保护。您承认Western
   Digital和/或我们的许可人拥有服务之中及与服务相关的所有权利、所有权和权益（包括任何和所有专利、版权、商业机密、商标、展示方法和专有技术
   ，以及任何和所有在该等专利、版权、商业机密、商标、展示方法和专有技术之中或与其相关的其他知识产权）。您同意不采取与此类所有权权益不符的任何行动
   。

使用限制

   除非本文有明确授权，否则未经我们的事先书面许可或版权所有人的事先书面许可，您不得以任何形式或通过任何方式（包括电子、机械、影印、录制或其他方式
   ）复制、转载、分发、重新发表、下载、展示、发布或传播任何服务。在您遵守使用条款的前提下，Western
   Digital特此授予您一项有限的非专有权利，以访问和使用服务中包含的资料并在任何情况下仅供个人、非商业化使用；但前提是，您不得修改、再销售或
   商业化此类资料。如果您违反任何使用条款，该权限将自动终止。终止后，您必须立即销毁从服务中获得的所有资料。

   您同意不会：删除或更改服务中包含或包括的任何版权或其他专有权利声明或限制性权利标志；对任何服务、任何更新或其任何部分进行反编译、反汇编、逆向编
   译、逆向汇编或以其他方式进行反向工程（除非且仅在适用法律禁止任何上述限制时除外）；使用任何方式取得任何服务部分的机密源代码；或规避任何控制访问
   或以其他方式保护服务的措施。

   您进一步同意不通过使用服务来以任何方式骚扰、滥用、追踪、威胁、诽谤、侵犯或以其他方式妨碍任何其他方的权利，或上传、发布、以电子邮件发送、传播或
   以其他方式提供任何非法、有害、威胁性、辱骂性、骚扰性、不正当、中伤性、粗俗、淫秽、诽谤性、侵犯他人隐私、仇恨性或种族性、民族性或其他令人反感的
   内容。您同意Western
   Digital对您的任何上述使用以及因使用服务而可能收到的任何骚扰性、威胁性、中伤性、冒犯性或非法性信息或传播不负任何责任。您同意不会有意或无
   意地违反任何与您使用服务有关的适用法律。如果您违反上述任何规定，您可能受到起诉并承担损害赔偿。

   您承认，除非本文有明确规定，否则使用条款中的任何内容都不应被视为通过禁止反言、默示或其他方式向您授予我们或我们的任何许可方的专利或其他知识产权
   的许可；您同意对通过单独的书面协议获得此类许可承担全部责任。未经授权使用任何服务的行为可能违反版权法、商标法、隐私和公示法以及通讯条例和法规。

账户注册和订阅

   我们可能要求您注册帐户来使用服务的某些功能或部分（“用户帐户”）。您可以通过完成服务中相关部分规定的注册过程来创建用户帐户。您有责任提供准确和
   最新的帐户信息。

   您是用户帐户的唯一授权用户。您有责任保持自身或Western
   Digital为您使用服务而设置或提供的任何密码和帐号的机密性。您对自身用户帐户下发生的所有活动负完全责任。Western
   Digital可能无法控制您或其他用户之用户帐户的使用情况，且Western Digital明确表示不承担任何由此引起的责任。

隐私惯例

   您对服务的使用也受我们的隐私声明的约束。您可以点击这里查看隐私声明（“隐私声明”）。请查看隐私声明以了解我们的隐私惯例。

用户内容授权许可

   作为您使用服务的条件，当您通过服务来发布、上传、发表、提交、展示或传输任何内容或其他资料（“您的内容”）时，您特此授予Western
   Digital一项非独占、永久性、不可撤销、免版税、全球性、可转让、完全可再许可（包括向服务的其他用户进行再许可）的许可，以便后者为任何和所有
   商业或非商业目的而访问、使用、转载、传输、展示、发表、分发、公开展演、公开展示、修改或改编您的内容，或基于该内容创建衍生作品并将您的内容纳入任
   何格式或媒介的其他作品中。您声明并保证：您拥有或以其他方式控制有关您的内容的所有权利，包括所有版权；您的内容准确无误并且不侵犯或盗用任何第三方
   的知识产权，包括公开权和隐私权；并且使用您的内容不违反使用条款或隐私声明，且不会对任何个人或实体造成伤害。对于您或任何第三方通过服务提交或发布
   的任何内容或其他资料，我们不承担任何责任。如果您的内容包含任何图像，则您进一步声明并保证该图像中的每个人（如有）已同意您根据使用条款的规定使用
   图像。

   我们保留以任何理由预先屏蔽、拒绝、修改或删除服务上的任何内容或资料的权利，包括我们自行判断后认为此类内容或资料违反任何法律或任何人的权利、侵犯
   任何人的权利或者不适宜在服务上发布。

从美国境外访问

   服务由我们在美国境内的办事处进行控制和运营。我们对服务是否适合或可用于其他地区不做陈述，而且您不得在服务内容被视为非法的地区访问它们。您自行选
   择是否从其他地区使用服务，并负责遵守适用的当地法律。如果您从其他地区使用服务，您有责任遵守适用的当地法律，包括其他国家的进出口条例。您承认，部
   分或全部服务（包括其中包含的资料）可能受美国出口管理法律和法规、美国财政部外国资产管理办公室（“OFAC”）的《经济制裁条例》（Economi
   c Sanctions
   Regulations）和其他国家的出口法律监管，而且您不得违反美国或其他适用国家的法律来使用服务。您同意，服务及其直接产品目前并未或未来不会
   直接或间接地由被禁止国家或禁运国家或其国民收购，或向其转让、出口或再出口，不得用于核活动、化学生物武器或导弹项目，除非美国政府（或其他有关政府
   ）为此类目的做出特别授权。通过访问网站，您声明并保证，您不是美国政府禁运的任何国家或地区的公民或居民，也并非此类国家或地区的常住人士，并且您不
   在OFAC特别指定国民和被禁人员的名单上。您同意严格遵守所有出口、再出口和进口法律，并承担根据需要获得出口、再出口或进口许可的全部责任。

指向第三方网站和应用程序的链接

   服务可能包含指向第三方网站或应用程序的链接。但请注意，我们对此类网站或应用程序不承担责任也无法做出控制。Western
   Digital对您可能通过服务访问的任何其他网站或应用程序不做任何陈述。当您访问第三方网站或应用程序（即使其中可能显示Western
   Digital标识）时，您需要预先采取措施以确保您同意该网站或应用程序的使用条款，并确保该网站或应用程序并无病毒、蠕虫、特洛伊木马和其他破坏性
   项目。您同意，Western Digital在任何情况下都不会以任何方式对任何第三方网站或应用程序承担责任。

责任限制

   在适用法律允许的最大范围内，我们及我们的董事、高级管理人员、雇员和顾问（统称为“Western
   Digital各方”）不对由于使用、修改、提供、复制、分发或下载服务或无法执行上述任何一项活动导致的损害赔偿承担责任。在任何情况下，Weste
   rn
   Digital均不对任何间接性、特别性、示范性，惩罚性、特殊性、附带性或后果性损害赔偿（包括数据、收入、利润、使用或其他经济利益的丢失或损失）
   负责，无论此类损害如何发生或是否因违约或侵权行为出现，即使Western Digital事先已被告知此类损害的可能性。

   您同意，您有责任对与服务相关的数据和/或设备进行充分的保护和备份，并且不会因您使用或无法使用服务导致的数据丢失、输出不准确、工作延迟或利润损失
   对Western Digital提出任何性质的索赔要求。

   针对有关服务的索赔，您同意使Western Digital各方免受损害，且不会为此起诉Western
   Digital各方。如果您有权从Western
   Digital各方获得有关服务或使用条款的损害赔偿（包括因违反使用条款引起的损害赔偿），您同意您的唯一补偿金额不超过从Western
   Digital各方追回的违约所在月份的服务费（如果索赔与免费服务有关，则最高为100.00美元）。

   无论Western Digital是否已被告知或应该知道此类损失的可能性，Western
   Digital各方的责任限制均适用。某些州不允许免除或限制附带或间接性损害赔偿，因此上述免除或限制条款可能不适用于您。

免责声明

   您明确承认，您将自行承担使用服务的风险，并且有关服务质量、性能、准确性和措施是否适当的全部风险均由您承担。服务的所有部分均由Western
   Digital按“原样”、“不保证无瑕疵”和在“可用”的基础上提供，而且服务包含瑕疵且Western
   Digital不提供任何形式的担保。Western
   Digital在此明确不做出任何明示、默示、法定或其他性质的有关服务（包括其使用、性能和支持功能）的任何陈述、保证和条件，包括服务适用于特定用
   途、适销性、所有权和非侵权的任何默示保证。Western Digital对于服务中衍生的结果或输出的准确性不做任何保证。

版权政策和DMCA版权侵权索赔

   根据美国法典第17篇第512（c）条，Western Digital将对根据《数字千年版权法》（Digital Millennium
   Copyright
   Act）和其他适用的知识产权法做出的涉嫌侵权的通知做出回应。我们尊重他人的知识产权。如果您认为对您作品的任何复制构成版权侵权，请使用我们“版权
   政策” 所述的程序。

商标使用政策

   在提供我们的商品和服务时显示的商标、标识和服务标志（统称为“标志”）是Western Digital或第三方的财产。Western
   Digital的标志只能在有限的情况下使用，并且必须事先获得Western Digital的书面批准。Western
   Digital根据具体情况决定是否批准。所有获准的使用必须严格遵守我们的“商标和标识使用准则”。点击这里查看Western
   Digital的部分标志列表。

美国政府的限制性权利

   服务涉及“限制性权利”。美国政府对服务的使用、复制或披露受FAR52.227-14和DFAR252.227-7013等条例、其后续条款或任何其
   他适用法律和法规的限制。美国政府对服务的使用意味着其承认我们拥有服务的所有权。

法律选择；可分割性

   任何由服务（包括使用（或无法使用）服务）所引起或与之相关的索赔均受加利福尼亚州的法律监管，但法律冲突原则不适用。您同意接受位于加利福尼亚州圣克
   拉拉县（Santa Clara
   County）的州和联邦法院的专属管辖权，以解决因您使用服务而引起或与之相关的任何和所有争议。如果使用条款的任何内容应被视为无效、失效或因任何
   原因无法执行，则该条款应被视为可分割，并且不得影响使用条款的任何其他内容的有效性和可执行性。

   我们服务的加利福尼亚用户有权获得以下的特定消费者权利声明：您可以通过以下方式联系加利福尼亚州消费者事务部消费者服务分部的投诉援助处：信件邮寄至
   1625 North Market Blvd., Suite N 112, Sacramento, CA，或致电（800）952-5210。

前瞻性陈述

   我们服务中的部分信息（包括我们的网站，例如investor.wdc.com）可能包含联邦证券法所述的前瞻性声明，其中涉及未来事件、未来经营或财
   务计划或业绩、预期增长、业务和所在市场的趋势以及未来事件或环境的其他特征等。所有非历史事实的陈述均基于我们目前的预期做出，并受到一系列风险和不
   确定因素的影响。这些风险和不确定性可能导致实际结果与前瞻性陈述中明示或默示的结果大不相同。有关潜在业务风险和不确定因素的更多信息已在我们向美国
   证券交易委员会（“SEC”）提交的文件中列出，并可在SEC网站（www.sec.gov）上查阅，包括我们最近提交的周期报告。请根据需要自行查阅
   。您不应该过分依赖这些前瞻性陈述。除法律要求外，我们并无义务基于新的信息、未来发展或其他因素来公开更新或修改任何前瞻性陈述。

对服务的更改

   Western
   Digital保留随时暂时性或永久性更改或停止服务（或其任何部分）或其中所述产品或服务的权利，恕不另行通知。在服务或其任何部分终止后，West
   ern Digital并无义务维护或提供您的内容或其他数据。

联系我们

   如果您有关于使用条款的问题、投诉或评论，如果您希望收到有关服务的进一步信息，或者您希望因其他原因联系Western
   Digital，请通过联系Western Digital页面联络我们。

     * {{unescape(item.title)}}
          + {{anchor.title}}

   Última actualización realizada el 28 de mayo de 2018.

   Estas Condiciones de uso (las presentes «Condiciones de Uso») regulan
   su Uso (tal y como se define a continuación) de los sitios web
   ofrecidos por Western Digital Technologies, Inc. y/o sus afiliadas
   (conjuntamente denominadas «Western Digital», «nosotros» o «nuestro») y
   todo el contenido, las funcionalidades, los materiales, el software y
   la documentación relacionada, así como los servicios disponibles en
   tales sitios web (se hará referencia de forma colectiva a tales sitios
   web, contenido, funcionalidades, materiales, software y documentación
   relacionada, así como a los servicios, como los «Servicios»).

   IMPORTANTE: SE RUEGA LEER CON ATENCIÓN. Si no está de acuerdo con lo
   establecido en las presentes Condiciones de Uso, no tiene autorización
   para Usar los Servicios.

   Para ayudarle a navegar en el documento y encontrar secciones
   específicas de las presentes Condiciones de Uso, le remitimos al índice
   que figura a continuación:

Aceptación de las Condiciones de Uso

   Mediante el Uso (tal y como se define a continuación) de los Servicios,
   usted declara y garantiza que es, al menos, mayor de edad en su
   jurisdicción y que tiene todas las facultades, autorizaciones y
   permisos necesarios para suscribir y obligarse en virtud de las
   presentes Condiciones de Uso; usted reconoce que ha leído y comprendido
   las presentes Condiciones de Uso y acuerda obligarse en virtud de las
   mismas; y usted acuerda cumplir con todas las leyes y los reglamentos
   aplicables en relación con su Uso de los Servicios.

   Si usted Usa los Servicios en nombre de una empresa, organización u
   otra entidad, por «usted» se entenderá que se incluye usted y dicha
   entidad; usted declara y garantiza que es un representante autorizado
   de la entidad con autorización para obligar a la entidad en virtud de
   las presentes Condiciones de Uso y que acepta las presentes Condiciones
   de Uso en nombre de la entidad; y acuerda asimismo que dicha entidad es
   responsable, desde un punto de vista legal y financiero, de su Uso de
   los Servicios, así como del uso de su Cuenta de Usuario (tal y como se
   define a continuación) por parte de otros afiliados a su entidad,
   incluidos cualesquier empleados, agentes o contratistas.

Interpretación

   A los efectos de las presentes Condiciones de Uso, el verbo «Usar» en
   mayúsculas significa acceder, navegar, crear una Cuenta de Usuario (tal
   y como se define a continuación) en los Servicios, así como subir
   contenido o material, descargar contenido o material o de otro modo
   usar los Servicios (y el sustantivo «Uso» y el gerundio «Usando»
   tendrán significados semejantes); los términos «usted» y «suyo» hacen
   referencia a usted como usuario que Usa los Servicios; y se entenderá
   que las palabras «incluye», «incluido» o «incluyendo» van siempre
   seguidas de las palabras «a modo no limitativo».

Enmiendas a las presentes Condiciones de Uso

   PODREMOS, A NUESTRA TOTAL DISCRECIÓN, ENMENDAR LAS PRESENTES
   CONDICIONES de uso EN CUALQUIER MOMENTO MEDIANTE LA ACTUALIZACIÓN DE
   ESTA PÁGINA. SI USTED CONTINÚA USANDO LOS SERVICIOS TRAS UNA ENMIENDA
   DE ESTE TIPO, QUEDARÁ OBLIGADO EN VIRTUD DE tal enmienda. POR TANTO,
   DEBE VISITAR LA PÁGINA PERIÓDICAMENTE PARA VERIFICAR LAS PRESENTES
   CONDICIONES DE USO. SI ALGUNO DE LOS CAMBIOS LE RESULTA INACEPTABLE, NO
   SE LE PERMITE CONTINUAR USANDO LOS SERVICIOS.

Condiciones adicionales

   Ofrecemos una amplia gama de productos y servicios, incluidos productos
   y servicios de software. Algunos productos o servicios disponibles en
   nuestros sitios web pueden estar sujetos a otras condiciones o a
   condiciones adicionales («Condiciones Adicionales»). Se pondrán a
   disposición tales Condiciones Adicionales con los productos o servicios
   pertinentes, ya sea publicándose directamente en el sitio web de dichos
   productos o servicios o presentándose como un conjunto de condiciones
   independientes en el momento de la compra, descarga, el acceso, la
   navegación o el uso de tales productos o servicios. En la medida en que
   las presentes Condiciones de Uso se apliquen a tales productos o
   servicios (p. ej., porque se ponen a disposición en nuestros sitios
   web) pero sean incoherentes con las Condiciones Adicionales aplicables
   a dichos productos o servicios, tales Condiciones Adicionales
   prevalecerán sobre las disposiciones incoherentes de las presentes
   Condiciones de Uso y se aplicarán respecto a tales productos o
   servicios.

Propiedad

   Los Servicios, incluido su «aspecto general» (look and feel) (p. ej.,
   el texto, los gráficos, las imágenes y los logos), el contenido de
   propiedad exclusiva, la información y otros materiales contenidos en
   los Servicios están protegidos por ley, incluidas las leyes de Estados
   Unidos sobre propiedad intelectual, derechos de autor, marcas
   comerciales y otras leyes, así como por las disposiciones de tratados
   internacionales. Usted reconoce que Western Digital y/o nuestros
   otorgantes de licencias son los propietarios de todos los derechos y la
   titularidad en relación con los Servicios (con inclusión de la
   totalidad de las patentes, derechos de autor, secretos comerciales,
   marcas comerciales, demostraciones técnicas (show-how), y conocimientos
   técnicos (know-how), y todos y cualesquier otros derechos de propiedad
   intelectual inherentes a los mismos o relacionados con los mismos), y
   usted acuerda no tomar ninguna medida que resulte incoherente con tales
   derechos relativos a la propiedad.

Restricciones del Uso

   Salvo autorización expresa en el presente, ninguno de los Servicios
   podrá someterse a copia, reproducción, distribución, nueva publicación,
   descarga, exhibición, publicación, o transmisión de ninguna forma ni
   por ningún medio, incluidos medios electrónicos y mecánicos, ni
   mediante fotocopia, grabación ni de ningún otro modo, sin la
   autorización previa por escrito emitida por nosotros o por el
   propietario de los derechos de autor. Con sujeción a que usted cumpla
   con las presentes Condiciones de Uso, Western Digital, por el presente,
   le concede un derecho limitado no exclusivo de acceder y usar los
   materiales incluidos en los Servicios, en cada caso para uso personal y
   no comercial exclusivamente, y siempre que usted no modifique, revenda
   ni dé ningún uso comercial a dichos materiales. Este permiso terminará
   automáticamente si usted incumple cualquiera de las presentes
   Condiciones de Uso. Tras la terminación, usted debe destruir
   inmediatamente todos los materiales obtenidos de los Servicios.

   Usted acuerda que no quitará ni modificará ninguna notificación o
   leyenda sobre la restricción de derechos en relación con derechos de
   autor o derechos de propiedad exclusiva incluidas en los Servicios; que
   no descompilará ni desensamblará, ni compilará ni ensamblará de manera
   inversa, ni aplicará ninguna otra técnica de ingeniería inversa a
   ninguno de los Servicios, ninguna actualización de los mismos ni
   ninguna parte de los mismos (salvo y únicamente en la medida en que
   cualquiera de las restricciones antes mencionadas esté prohibida por
   ley); que no usará ningún medio para averiguar ningún tipo de código
   fuente confidencial de ninguna porción de los Servicios; y que no
   eludirá ninguna funcionalidad que controle el acceso a los Servicios o
   que proteja los Servicios de alguna otra manera.

   Usted también conviene en que no Usará los Servicios de ningún modo con
   el fin de hostigar, acosar, molestar, amenazar, difamar, infringir ni
   de otro modo violar los derechos de cualquier otra parte, ni subir,
   publicar, enviar por correo electrónico, transmitir ni de otro modo
   permitir el acceso a cualquier contenido que sea ilegítimo, peligroso,
   amenazador, abusivo, atormentador, enrevesado, difamatorio, vulgar,
   obsceno, calumniante, invasivo de la privacidad de otra persona, que
   incite al odio u objetable desde un punto de vista de origen racial,
   étnico o de otro. Usted conviene en que Western Digital no asume
   ninguna responsabilidad respecto de su Uso de los Servicios del modo
   antes descrito, ni respecto de ningún tipo de mensajes o transmisiones
   atormentadores, amenazadores, difamatorios, ofensivos o ilegales que
   usted pudiera recibir como consecuencia de su Uso de los Servicios.
   Usted acuerda que no infringirá, de forma intencional o no intencional,
   ninguna ley aplicable en relación con su Uso de los Servicios. Si
   incumple alguna de las disposiciones precedentes, podrá tener que
   responder en tribunales y pagar daños y perjuicios.

   Usted reconoce que, salvo en la medida aquí expresamente establecida,
   nada de lo dispuesto en las presentes Condiciones de Uso se
   interpretará como que le otorga a usted una licencia respecto de
   patentes u otros derechos de propiedad intelectual nuestros o de
   nuestros otorgantes de licencias, ya sea en virtud del principio de
   estoppel (impedimento), por inferencia, o de otro modo, y usted acuerda
   que usted asume la totalidad de la responsabilidad para la obtención de
   tales licencias mediante un acuerdo por escrito por separado. El Uso no
   autorizado de cualquiera de los Servicios puede infringir las leyes de
   derechos de autor, las leyes sobre marcas comerciales, las leyes sobre
   privacidad y publicidad, y las normas y disposiciones legales sobre
   comunicaciones.

Registro de Cuenta y Suscripciones

   Es posible que le solicitemos que registre una cuenta para Usar
   determinadas funcionalidades o secciones de los Servicios (una «Cuenta
   de Usuario»). Puede crear una Cuenta de Usuario completando el proceso
   de registro establecido en la sección aplicable de los Servicios. Usted
   tiene la responsabilidad de que la información sobre la cuenta que
   facilite sea exacta y esté actualizada.

   Usted es el único usuario autorizado de su Cuenta de Usuario. Usted
   tiene la responsabilidad de mantener la confidencialidad de cualquier
   contraseña y número de cuenta proporcionado por usted o por Western
   Digital para el Uso de los Servicios.  Usted asume la responsabilidad
   exclusiva respecto de todas las actividades realizadas con su Cuenta de
   Usuario. Es posible que Western Digital no tenga control sobre el uso
   de su Cuenta de Usuario o de la Cuenta de Usuario de cualquier otro
   usuario, y Western Digital expresamente rechaza cualquier
   responsabilidad derivada de tales usos.

Prácticas de Privacidad

   El Uso, por su parte, de los Servicios también está sujeto a nuestra
   Política de Privacidad, que está disponible para consulta si se hace
   clic aquí (la «Política de privacidad»). Le rogamos que lea
   detenidamente la Política de privacidad para obtener más información
   sobre nuestras prácticas de privacidad.

Concesión de Licencia respecto al Contenido de Usuario

   Como condición para el Uso, por parte de usted, de los Servicios, al
   publicar, subir, compartir, enviar, exhibir, o transmitir cualquier
   contenido u otros materiales a través de los Servicios («Su
   Contenido»), usted concede a Western Digital una licencia no exclusiva,
   a perpetuidad, irrevocable, libre de regalías, aplicable a nivel
   internacional, transferible y plenamente sublicenciable (lo cual
   incluye para otros usuarios de los Servicios) para acceder, utilizar,
   reproducir, transmitir, exhibir, publicar, distribuir, presentar en
   público, modificar, adaptar y crear obras derivadas de Su Contenido y
   para incorporar Su Contenido en otras obras en cualquier formato o
   medio conocido en el presente o que se cree en el futuro con todos y
   cualesquier fines comerciales o no comerciales. Usted declara y
   garantiza: que usted es el propietario o que, de otro modo, tiene el
   control sobre todos los derechos relativos a Su Contenido, incluidos
   todos los derechos de autor; que Su Contenido es exacto y no infringe
   ni se apropia indebidamente de los derechos de propiedad intelectual de
   ningún tercero, incluidos los derechos de publicidad y privacidad; y
   que el uso de Su Contenido no infringe las presentes Condiciones de Uso
   ni la Política de privacidad y no causará ningún daño a ninguna persona
   ni entidad. No asumimos ningún tipo de responsabilidad respecto de
   ningún contenido ni otros materiales enviados o publicados por medio de
   los Servicios, ya sea por usted o por un tercero. En la medida en que
   Su Contenido incluya imágenes, usted declara y garantiza asimismo que
   cada una de las personas que aparecen en tales imágenes, si
   corresponde, ha dado su consentimiento para el uso de las imágenes, tal
   y como se dispone en las presentes Condiciones de Uso.

   NOS RESERVAMOS EL DERECHO DE PRESELECCIONAR, RECHAZAR, MODIFICAR O
   ELIMINAR CUALQUIER CONTENIDO O MATERIAL EN LOS SERVICIOS POR CUALQUIER
   MOTIVO, LO CUAL INCLUYE LOS CASOS EN QUE DETERMINEMOS, A NUESTRA
   EXCLUSIVA DISCRECIÓN, que dicho contenido O MATERIAL INFRINGE ALGUNA
   LEY O DERECHO DE ALGUNA PERSONA, que INFRINGE LOS DERECHOS DE ALGUNA
   PERSONA O que NO ES APROPIADO, POR ALGÚN OTRO MOTIVO,  PARA SU
   PUBLICACIÓN EN LOS SERVICIOS.

Acceso desde fuera de los Estados Unidos

   Nosotros, desde nuestras oficinas situadas en Estados Unidos, llevamos
   el control y operamos los Servicios. No realizamos ninguna declaración
   en el sentido de que los Servicios son adecuados o están disponibles
   para su Uso en otras zonas geográficas, y se prohíbe el acceso a los
   mismos desde territorios donde su contenido es ilegal.  Quienes decidan
   Usar los Servicios desde otras zonas geográficas lo hacen por
   iniciativa propia y son responsables del cumplimiento de las leyes
   locales aplicables. Si usted Usa los Servicios desde otras zonas
   geográficas, usted es responsable del cumplimiento de las leyes locales
   aplicables, incluidas las normas de exportación e importación de otros
   países. Usted reconoce que algunos o todos los Servicios, con inclusión
   de los materiales incluidos en los mismos, pueden estar sujetos a las
   Leyes y Reglamentos sobre Administración de Exportaciones de los
   Estados Unidos, los Reglamentos sobre Sanciones Económicas de la
   Oficina de Control de Activos Extranjeros (OFAC, por sus siglas en
   inglés) del Departamento del Tesoro de los Estados Unidos, así como a
   leyes sobre exportaciones de otros países y que queda prohibido el
   desvío de los Servicios en contravención de la legislación de los
   Estados Unidos o de otros países aplicables. Usted conviene en que
   ninguno de los Servicios ni ningún producto directo derivado de los
   mismos se está adquiriendo o será adquirido con el fin de enviarlo,
   transferirlo, exportarlo o reexportarlo, directa o indirectamente, a
   países embargados o proscritos o a sus ciudadanos, y que los mismos no
   se usarán con fines de actividades nucleares ni proyectos de armas
   químicas o biológicas o de misiles, salvo que así esté autorizado
   específicamente por el gobierno de los Estados Unidos (u otro gobierno
   pertinente) con tales fines. Al acceder al sitio web, usted declara y
   garantiza que usted no es ciudadano ni residente, y que no tiene su
   residencia habitual, en ningún país o región que esté sujeta a embargo
   por el gobierno de los Estados Unidos, y que usted no figura como parte
   sancionada en la lista de ciudadanos especialmente designados y
   personas bloqueadas mantenida por la OFAC. Usted acuerda cumplir
   estrictamente con todas las leyes sobre exportaciones, reexportaciones
   e importaciones y asume la totalidad de la responsabilidad respecto de
   la obtención de licencias para la exportación, reexportación o
   importación, según se le exija.

Enlaces a Sitios y Aplicaciones de Terceros

   Los Servicios pueden incluir enlaces a sitios web o aplicaciones de
   terceros. Sin embargo, tenga en cuenta que no somos responsables
   respecto de estos sitios web o aplicaciones, y que no tenemos control
   sobre los mismos. Western Digital no realiza ninguna declaración
   respecto de ningún otro sitio web o aplicación a la que usted acceda a
   través de los Servicios. Cuando acceda a un sitio web o una aplicación
   de un tercero, aunque en ellos aparezca el logo de la empresa Western
   Digital, a usted corresponderá tomar precauciones para asegurarse de
   que está de acuerdo con las condiciones de uso de tal sitio web o
   aplicación y que tal sitio web o aplicación no contienen virus,
   gusanos, troyanos, ni otros  elementos de naturaleza destructiva.
   Usted acuerda que, en ninguna circunstancia y de ninguna forma, se
   considerará que Western Digital es responsable respecto de ningún sitio
   web o aplicación de terceros.

Limitación de la Responsabilidad

   EN LA MAYOR MEDIDA PERMITIDA POR LA LEGISLACIÓN APLICABLE, NOSOTROS Y
   NUESTROS ADMINISTRADORES, DIRECTIVOS, EMPLEADOS Y CONSULTORES
   (CONJUNTAMENTE, «LAS PARTES DE WESTERN DIGITAL»)NO ASUMIREMOS
   RESPONSABILIDAD ALGUNA RESPECTO ANINGÚN TIPO DE DAÑOS SUFRIDOS COMO
   CONSECUENCIA DEL USO, MODIFICACIÓN, CONTRIBUCIÓN, COPIA,DISTRIBUCIÓN O
   DESCARGA DE LOS SERVICIOS O POR LA INCAPACIDAD DE LLEVAR A CABO LO
   ANTES DESCRITO. EN NINGÚN CASO SE CONSIDERARÁ QUE LAS PARTES DE WESTERN
   DIGITAL SON RESPONSABLES RESPECTO DE NINGÚN TIPO DE DAÑOS Y PERJUICIOS
   INDIRECTOS, EXTRAORDINARIOS, EJEMPLARES,PUNITIVOS, CUANTIFICABLES,
   SUPLEMENTARIOS O EMERGENTES (INCLUIDA LAPÉRDIDA DE DATOS, BENEFICIOS,
   INGRESOS, USO O DE OTRA VENTAJA ECONÓMICA), SIN IMPORTAR LA FORMA ENQUE
   HAYAN SURGIDO, YA SEA POR INCUMPLIMIENTO CONTRACTUAL O COMO UN ACTO
   ILÍCITO CIVIL, AUN CUANDO SE HAYA AVISADO A LAS PARTES DE WESTERN
   DIGITAL CON ANTERIORIDAD SOBRE LA POSIBILIDAD DE DICHOS DAÑOS Y
   PERJUICIOS.

   USTED ACUERDA QUE USTED ASUME LA TOTALIDAD DE LA RESPONSABILIDAD
   RESPECTO DE LA PROTECCIÓN ADECUADA Y DE LA REALIZACIÓN DE COPIAS DE
   SEGURIDAD DE LOS DATOS Y/O LOS EQUIPOS USADOS EN RELACIÓNCON LOS
   SERVICIOS Y QUE NO PRESENTARÁ NINGUNA RECLAMACIÓN CONTRALAS PARTES DE
   WESTERN DIGITAL POR DATOS PERDIDOS, RESULTADOSINEXACTOS, DEMORAS EN
   TRABAJOS, O PÉRDIDA DE BENEFICIOS DIMANANTES DEL USO DE LOS SERVICIOS,
   O DE LA IMPOSIBILIDAD DE USAR TALES SERVICIOS.

   USTED CONVIENE EN MANTENER A LAS PARTES DE WESTERN DIGITAL PLENAMENTE
   EXENTAS DE CUALESQUIER RECLAMACIONES, Y SE COMPROMETE A NO DEMANDAR A
   LAS PARTES DEWESTERN DIGITAL, RESPECTO DE CUALESQUIER RECLAMACIONES
   RELACIONADAS CONLOS SERVICIOS.SI TIENE ALGÚN FUNDAMENTO PARA
   RECUPERARDAÑOS Y PERJUICIOS (INCLUIDOEL INCUMPLIMIENTO DELAS PRESENTES
   CONDICIONES DE USO) DE CUALESQUIER PARTES DE WESTERN DIGITALEN RELACIÓN
   CON LOS SERVICIOS O LAS PRESENTES CONDICIONES DE USO, USTED CONVIENE EN
   QUE SU RECURSO JURÍDICO EXCLUSIVO ES RECUPERAR DAÑOS Y PERJUICIOS DE
   LAS PARTES DE WESTERN DIGITAL POR UNA CUANTÍA MÁXIMA EQUIVALENTE A LA
   TARIFA POR LOS SERVICIOS CORRESPONDIENTE AL MES EN EL QUE OCURRIÓEL
   INCUMPLIMIENTO (O POR UNA CUANTÍA MÁXIMA DE 100,00 USDSI LAS DEMANDAS
   ESTÁN RELACIONADAS CON SERVICIOS GRATUITOS).

   ESTAS LIMITACIONES DE LA RESPONSABILIDAD DE LAS PARTES DE WESTERN
   DIGITAL SE APLICARÁNINDEPENDIENTEMENTE DE QUE SE HAYA ASESORADO A
   WESTERN DIGITAL, ODE QUE WESTERN DIGITAL TUVIERA QUE HABER TENIDO
   CONOCIMIENTO SOBRE LA POSIBILIDADDE TALES PÉRDIDAS. ALGUNOS ESTADOS NO
   PERMITEN LA EXCLUSIÓN O LIMITACIÓN DE DAÑOS Y PERJUICIOS CUANTIFICABLES
   O SUPLEMENTARIOS, POR TANTO, CABE LA POSIBILIDAD DE QUE LAS EXCLUSIONES
   ANTESDESCRITAS NO SE LE APLIQUEN.

Declaración de exención de responsabilidad

   USTED RECONOCE EXPRESAMENTE QUE USTED CORRE CON EL RIESGO DEL USO DE
   LOS SERVICIOSY QUE A USTED LE CORRESPONDE ASUMIR LA TOTALIDAD DEL
   RIESGOEN RELACIÓN CON LA CALIDAD SATISFACTORIA, EL RENDIMIENTO, LA
   EXACTITUD Y EL ESFUERZO.TODAS LAS PARTES DE LOS SERVICIOS SON
   PROPORCIONADASPOR WESTERN DIGITAL EXCLUSIVAMENTE CONFORMEA LAS
   SIGUIENTES DESCRIPCIONES: «TAL CUAL ESTÁ», «CON TODOS LOS DEFECTOS» Y
   «SEGÚN ESTÁ DISPONIBLE», CON TODOS LOS DEFECTOS Y SIN NINGÚN TIPODE
   GARANTÍA. WESTERNDIGITAL POR EL PRESENTE RECHAZA CUALESQUIER
   DECLARACIONES, GARANTÍAS, Y CONDICIONES CON RESPECTO A LOS
   SERVICIOS(INCLUIDO EL USO, FUNCIONAMIENTO Y SOPORTE DE LOS MISMOS), YA
   SEAN EXPLÍCITAS O IMPLÍCITAS, LEGALES O DE OTROTIPO, INCLUIDAS
   CUALESQUIER GARANTÍAS IMPLÍCITAS DE IDONEIDAD PARA UN FIN PARTICULAR,
   COMERCIABILIDAD, TÍTULO Y NO INCUMPLIMIENTO.WESTERN DIGITAL NO REALIZA
   DECLARACIONES DE GARANTÍA CON RESPECTO ALA EXACTITUD DE LOS RESULTADOS
   NI DE LOSPRODUCTOS OBTENIDOS DE LOS SERVICIOS.

Política de Derechos de Autor y Demandas por Infracción de Derechos de Autor
en virtud de DMCA

   De conformidad con el título 17, artículo 512(c), del Código de los
   Estados Unidos, la política de Western Digital consiste en responder a
   notificaciones sobre presuntas infracciones que cumplen con la Ley
   «Digital Millennium Copyright Act» y otras leyes de propiedad
   intelectual aplicables. Respetamos la propiedad intelectual de los
   demás. Si usted cree que su trabajo se ha copiado de una manera que
   representa una violación de los derechos de autor, siga los pasos
   establecidos en nuestra Política de derechos de autor.

Política de Uso de Marcas Comerciales

   Las marcas comerciales, logos, y marcas de servicio (conjuntamente, las
   «Marcas») que se muestran cuando se suministran nuestros bienes y
   servicios son propiedad de Western Digital o de terceros. Las Marcas de
   Western Digital podrán utilizarse solamente en circunstancias limitadas
   y con la autorización previa por escrito de Western Digital. Las
   autorizaciones se proporcionan caso por caso. Todos los usos
   autorizados deben observar estrictamente nuestras Directrices de Uso de
   Marcas Comerciales y Logos.  Haga clic aquí para obtener una lista no
   exhaustiva de las Marcas de Western Digital.

Derechos Restringidos del Gobierno de los Estados Unidos

   Los Servicios se suministran con «DERECHOS RESTRINGIDOS». El Uso, la
   duplicación o la divulgación por el gobierno de los Estados Unidos
   están sujetos a restricciones tal y como se establece en FAR52.227-14 y
   DFAR252.227-7013 et seq., su(s) sucesora(s), o cualesquier otras leyes
   y reglamentos aplicables. El Uso de los Servicios por parte del
   gobierno de los Estados Unidos constituye el reconocimiento de nuestros
   derechos de propiedad exclusiva sobre los mismos.

Derecho Elegido; Divisibilidad

   Cualquier reclamación dimanante de los Servicios o relacionada con los
   Servicios, incluido el Uso de (o la imposibilidad de Usar) los
   Servicios, estará regida por las leyes del Estado de California, sin
   tener en cuenta los principios sobre conflictos de leyes.  Usted
   acuerda someterse a la jurisdicción exclusiva del estado y los
   tribunales federales situados en el Condado de Santa Clara, California,
   para la resolución de todas y cualesquier controversias derivadas del
   Uso de los Servicios o relacionadas con los mismos. Si se determina que
   alguna disposición de las presentes Condiciones de Uso es inválida,
   nula o inexigible por cualquier motivo, tal disposición se considerará
   divisible del resto y no afectará la validez y exigibilidad de las
   demás disposiciones de las presentes Condiciones de Uso.

   Los usuarios de los Servicios con sede en California tienen derecho a
   recibir la siguiente notificación sobre derechos de consumidores
   específicos: Se puede contactar por escrito con la Unidad de Asistencia
   en caso de Quejas (Complaint Assistance Unit) de la División de
   Servicios a los Consumidores (Division of Consumer Services) del
   Departamento de California para Asuntos de Consumidores (California
   Department of Consumer Affairs) en 1625 North Market Blvd., Suite N
   112, Sacramento, CA 95834, o por teléfono: (800) 952-5210.

Declaraciones con Miras al Futuro

   Cierta información recogida en nuestros Servicios, incluidos nuestros
   sitios web, tales como investor.wdc.com, pueden contener declaraciones
   con miras al futuro según se definen en las leyes federales sobre
   valores; esto incluye declaraciones sobre acontecimientos futuros,
   nuestros planes o rendimiento operativo o financiero futuro, nuestro
   crecimiento anticipado, tendencias en nuestras actividades comerciales
   y los mercados en los que operamos y otras caracterizaciones de eventos
   o circunstancias de futuro. Todas las declaraciones que no son hechos
   históricos se basan en nuestras expectativas actuales y están sujetas a
   una serie de riesgos e incertidumbres que pueden hacer que los
   resultados reales difieran significativamente de aquellos expresados
   explícita o implícitamente en las declaraciones con miras al futuro. Se
   puede obtener más información sobre los riesgos e incertidumbres que
   pueden afectar a nuestras actividades comerciales en los informes que
   hemos presentado ante la Comisión Oficial del Mercado de Valores de
   Estados Unidos (Securities and Exchange Commission o «SEC») que están
   disponibles en el sitio web de la SEC, www.sec.gov. Estos informes
   incluyen nuestro informe periódico más recientemente presentado, al
   cual le remitimos específicamente. No debe basarse excesivamente en
   estas declaraciones con miras al futuro. No asumimos ninguna obligación
   de actualizar ni de revisar públicamente cualquier declaración con
   miras al futuro, ya sea como consecuencia de información nueva,
   desarrollos futuros o por otros motivos, salvo que la ley así lo exija.

Modificaciones a los Servicios

   Western Digital se reserva el derecho de cambiar o interrumpir, de
   forma temporal o permanente, los Servicios (o cualquier parte de los
   mismos), o los productos o servicios descritos en los mismos, en
   cualquier momento, sin previo aviso. Tras la terminación de los
   Servicios o de cualquier parte de los mismos, Western Digital no tendrá
   ninguna obligación de mantener ni de proporcionar Su Contenido ni otros
   datos.

Contacto

   Si tiene alguna pregunta, queja o comentario sobre las presentes
   Condiciones de Uso, si desea obtener más información sobre los
   Servicios o si quiere ponerse en contacto con Western Digital por algún
   otro motivo, póngase en contacto con nosotros por medio de la
   información que aparece en nuestra página de Contacto con Western
   Digital.

     * {{unescape(item.title)}}
          + {{anchor.title}}

   Τελευταία ενημέρωση στις 28 Μαΐου 2018.

   Οι παρόντες Όροι Χρήσης (οι παρόντες «Όροι Χρήσης») διέπουν τη δική σας
   Χρήση (όπως ορίζεται στη συνέχεια) των διαδικτυακών τοποθεσιών που
   παρέχουν η Western Digital Technologies, Inc. ή/και οι συγγενείς
   εταιρείες της (συλλήβδην, «Western Digital», «εμείς», «η εταιρεία μας»
   ή «μας») και το περιεχόμενο, τα χαρακτηριστικά, το υλικό, τα λογισμικό
   και τη σχετική τεκμηρίωση, καθώς και τις υπηρεσίες που διατίθενται στις
   εν λόγω διαδικτυακές τοποθεσίες (οι εν λόγω διαδικτυακές τοποθεσίες, το
   περιεχόμενο, τα χαρακτηριστικά, το υλικό, το λογισμικό και η σχετική
   τεκμηρίωση και οι υπηρεσίες καλούνται στο εξής συλλήβδην, οι
   «Υπηρεσίες»).

   ΣΗΜΑΝΤΙΚΟ – ΠΑΡΑΚΑΛΟΥΜΕ ΔΙΑΒΑΣΤΕ ΠΡΟΣΕΚΤΙΚΑ. Εάν δεν συμφωνείτε με τους
   παρόντες Όρους Χρήσης, απαγορεύεται να χρησιμοποιήσετε τις Υπηρεσίες.

   Για να μπορέσετε να περιηγηθείτε πιο εύκολα και να εντοπίζετε
   συγκεκριμένες ενότητες των παρόντων Όρων Χρήσης, ανατρέξτε στον
   ακόλουθο πίνακα περιεχομένων:

Αποδοχή των Παρόντων Όρων Χρήσης

   Με τη Χρήση (όπως ορίζεται στη συνέχεια) των Υπηρεσιών: δηλώνετε και
   εγγυάστε ότι είστε τουλάχιστον ενήλικος στη δικαιοδοσία σας και
   διαθέτετε κάθε απαραίτητη εξουσία, αρμοδιότητα και άδεια προκειμένου να
   συνάψετε και να δεσμευτείτε από τους παρόντες Όρους Χρήσης,
   αναγνωρίζετε ότι διαβάσατε, κατανοήσατε και συμφωνείτε με το γεγονός
   ότι δεσμεύεστε από τους παρόντες Όρους Χρήσης και συμφωνείτε να
   συμμορφώνεστε με όλους τους ισχύοντες νόμους και κανονισμούς σε σχέση
   με τη Χρήση των Υπηρεσιών από εσάς.

   Εάν Χρησιμοποιείτε τις Υπηρεσίες για λογαριασμό εταιρείας, οργανισμού ή
   άλλης οντότητας, τότε:  ο όρος «εσείς/σας» περιλαμβάνει εσάς και την εν
   λόγω οντότητα. Εσείς δηλώνετε και εγγυάστε ότι είστε εξουσιοδοτημένος
   εκπρόσωπος της οντότητας με την αρμοδιότητα να δεσμεύσετε την οντότητα
   με τους παρόντες Όρους Χρήσης και ότι συμφωνείτε με τους παρόντες Όρους
   Χρήσης για λογαριασμό της οντότητας, και συμφωνείτε ότι η εν λόγω
   οντότητα είναι νομικά και οικονομικά υπεύθυνη για τη δική σας Χρήση των
   Υπηρεσιών καθώς και για τη χρήση του δικού σας Λογαριασμού Χρήστη (όπως
   ορίζεται στη συνέχεια) από τρίτα πρόσωπα που συνδέονται με την οντότητά
   σας, συμπεριλαμβανομένων εργαζομένων, εκπροσώπων ή εξωτερικών
   συνεργατών.

Ερμηνεία

   Για τους σκοπούς των παρόντων Όρων Χρήσης: το ρήμα Χρησιμοποιώ, με
   κεφαλαίο «Χ», σημαίνει την πρόσβαση, αναζήτηση σε, δημιουργία
   Λογαριασμού Χρήστη (όπως ορίζεται στη συνέχεια) σε, αποστολή
   περιεχομένου ή υλικού σε, λήψη περιεχομένου ή υλικού από, ή άλλη χρήση
   των Υπηρεσιών (και το ουσιαστικό «Χρήση», καθώς και η φράση «κάνω
   Χρήση» θα έχουν συνεπακόλουθο νόημα), ενώ οι όροι «εσείς» και «σας»
   αναφέρονται σε εσάς ως χρήστη που Χρησιμοποιεί τις Υπηρεσίες και κάθε
   αναφορά στις λέξεις «περιλαμβάνει», «συμπεριλαμβάνει»,
   «συμπεριλαμβανομένου» θα θεωρείται ότι συνοδεύεται από τον όρο
   «ενδεικτικά».

Αλλαγές στους Παρόντες Όρους Χρήσης

   ΜΠΟΡΟΥΜΕ, ΚΑΤΑ ΤΗΝ ΑΠΟΚΛΕΙΣΤΙΚΗ ΔΙΑΚΡΙΤΙΚΗ ΜΑΣ ΕΥΧΕΡΕΙΑ, ΝΑ ΑΛΛΑΞΟΥΜΕ
   ΤΟΥΣ ΠΑΡΟΝΤΕΣ ΟΡΟΥΣ ΧΡΗΣΗΣ ΑΝΑ ΠΑΣΑ ΣΤΙΓΜΗ ΕΝΗΜΕΡΩΝΟΝΤΑΣ ΤΗ ΣΕΛΙΔΑ
   ΑΥΤΗ.  ΕΑΝ ΣΥΝΕΧΙΣΕΤΕ ΝΑ ΧΡΗΣΙΜΟΠΟΙΕΙΤΕ ΤΙΣ ΥΠΗΡΕΣΙΕΣ ΜΕΤΑ ΑΠΟ
   ΟΠΟΙΑΔΗΠΟΤΕ ΣΧΕΤΙΚΗ ΑΛΛΑΓΗ, ΔΕΣΜΕΥΕΣΤΕ ΑΠΟ ΤΗΝ ΕΝ ΛΟΓΩ ΑΛΛΑΓΗ.
   ΕΠΟΜΕΝΩΣ, ΘΑ ΠΡΕΠΕΙ ΝΑ ΕΠΙΣΚΕΠΤΕΣΤΕ ΑΥΤΗ ΤΗ ΣΕΛΙΔΑ ΤΑΚΤΙΚΑ ΓΙΑ ΝΑ
   ΕΛΕΓΧΕΤΕ ΤΟΥΣ ΠΑΡΟΝΤΕΣ ΟΡΟΥΣ ΧΡΗΣΗΣ.  ΕΑΝ ΔΙΑΦΩΝΕΙΤΕ ΜΕ ΟΠΟΙΑΔΗΠΟΤΕ
   ΑΛΛΑΓΗ, ΑΠΑΓΟΡΕΥΕΤΑΙ ΝΑ ΣΥΝΕΧΙΣΕΤΕ ΝΑ ΧΡΗΣΙΜΟΠΟΙΕΙΤΕ ΤΙΣ ΥΠΗΡΕΣΙΕΣ.

Πρόσθετοι Όροι

   Προσφέρουμε ένα ευρύ φάσμα προϊόντων και υπηρεσιών, συμπεριλαμβανομένων
   προϊόντων και υπηρεσιών λογισμικού.  Ορισμένα προϊόντα ή υπηρεσίες που
   διατίθενται στις διαδικτυακές μας τοποθεσίες ενδέχεται να υπόκεινται σε
   άλλους ή πρόσθετους όρους και προϋποθέσεις («Πρόσθετοι Όροι»).  Αυτοί
   οι Πρόσθετοι Όροι θα είναι διαθέσιμοι μαζί με τα σχετικά προϊόντα ή
   υπηρεσίες, όπως με την ανάρτησή τους απευθείας στη διαδικτυακή
   τοποθεσία των εν λόγω προϊόντων ή υπηρεσιών ή μέσω παρουσίασης ως
   χωριστών όρων και προϋποθέσεων κατά την ώρα της αγοράς, λήψης,
   πρόσβασης, περιήγησης ή χρήσης των συγκεκριμένων προϊόντων ή
   υπηρεσιών.  Στο βαθμό που οι παρόντες Όροι Χρήσης ισχύουν για τα εν
   λόγω προϊόντα ή υπηρεσίες (π.χ., επειδή διατίθενται στις διαδικτυακές
   μας τοποθεσίες) αλλά δεν συμφωνούν με τους Πρόσθετους Όρους που ισχύουν
   για αυτά τα προϊόντα ή τις υπηρεσίες, οι εν λόγω Πρόσθετοι Όροι θα
   υπερισχύουν σε σχέση με τις ασυνεπείς διατάξεις των παρόντων Όρων
   Χρήσης και θα διέπουν τα εν λόγω προϊόντα ή υπηρεσίες.

Κυριότητα

   Οι Υπηρεσίες, συμπεριλαμβανομένων της «όψης και αίσθησης» (π.χ.,
   κείμενο, γραφικά, εικόνες και λογότυπα), αποκλειστικού περιεχομένου,
   πληροφοριών και άλλων υλικών που περιέχονται στις Υπηρεσίες,
   προστατεύονται από το νόμο, συμπεριλαμβανομένων της νομοθεσίας των
   Ηνωμένων Πολιτειών για την πνευματική ιδιοκτησία, τα πνευματικά
   δικαιώματα, τα εμπορικά σήματα και άλλων νόμων και διεθνών συνθηκών.
   Αναγνωρίζετε ότι η Western Digital ή/και οι δικαιοπάροχοί μας διατηρούν
   την κυριότητα κάθε δικαιώματος, τίτλου και συμφέροντος στις Υπηρεσίες
   (συμπεριλαμβανομένων κάθε πατέντας, πνευματικού δικαιώματος, εμπορικού
   μυστικού, εμπορικού σήματος, επίδειξης και τεχνογνωσίας και κάθε άλλου
   δικαιώματος πνευματικής ιδιοκτησίας σε αυτά ή που σχετίζονται με αυτά)
   και συμφωνείτε να μην προβείτε σε καμία ενέργεια η οποία θα αντιβαίνει
   στα προαναφερθέντα δικαιώματα ιδιοκτησίας.

Περιορισμοί Χρήσης

   Εκτός από όσα ρητώς αναφέρονται στο παρόν, καμία από τις Υπηρεσίες δεν
   μπορεί να αντιγραφεί, αναπαραχθεί, διανεμηθεί, αναδημοσιευτεί, ληφθεί,
   προβληθεί, αναρτηθεί ή μεταδοθεί με οποιοδήποτε τρόπο ή από οποιοδήποτε
   μέσο, συμπεριλαμβανομένων ηλεκτρονικών, μηχανικών, φωτοαντιγραφής,
   καταγραφής ή άλλων, χωρίς την προηγούμενη γραπτή άδειά μας ή χωρίς την
   προηγούμενη γραπτή άδεια του κατόχου των πνευματικών δικαιωμάτων. Με
   την προϋπόθεση της συμμόρφωσής σας με τους παρόντες Όρους Χρήσης, η
   Western Digital με το παρόν σας παρέχει περιορισμένο και μη
   αποκλειστικό δικαίωμα πρόσβασης και χρήσης του υλικού που περιέχεται
   στις Υπηρεσίες, το οποίο, σε κάθε περίπτωση, είναι προσωπικό και
   αποκλειστικά για μη εμπορική χρήση, και υπό την προϋπόθεση ότι δεν θα
   τροποποιήσετε, επαναπωλήσετε και δεν θα κάνετε εμπορική χρήση των εν
   λόγω υλικών. Η άδεια αυτή παύει αυτόματα να ισχύει σε περίπτωση που
   παραβιάσετε οποιονδήποτε από τους παρόντες Όρους Χρήσης. Κατά την παύση
   ισχύος, πρέπει αμέσως να καταστρέψετε τυχόν υλικό που λάβατε από τις
   Υπηρεσίες.

   Συμφωνείτε ότι δεν θα προβείτε στις ακόλουθες ενέργειες: δεν θα
   αφαιρέσετε ούτε θα μεταβάλλετε καμία ειδοποίηση αναφορικά με πνευματικά
   δικαιώματα ή άλλα αποκλειστικά δικαιώματα ή υπόμνημα περιορισμού
   δικαιωμάτων τα οποία περιέχονται ή περιλαμβάνονται στις Υπηρεσίες, δεν
   θα προβείτε σε ανακατασκευή ή αποσυμπίληση του πηγαίου κώδικα ούτε σε
   ανάστροφη μηχανίκευση με άλλον τρόπο για καμία από τις Υπηρεσίες, τυχόν
   ενημερώσεις ή οποιοδήποτε μέρος τους (εκτός εάν και αποκλειστικά στο
   βαθμό που κάποιος από τους παραπάνω περιορισμούς απαγορεύεται από την
   ισχύουσα νομοθεσία), δεν θα χρησιμοποιήσετε κανένα μέσο προκειμένου να
   ανακαλύψετε οποιοδήποτε τμήμα του εμπιστευτικού πηγαίου κώδικα των
   Υπηρεσιών, και δεν θα παρακάμψετε καμιά λειτουργικότητα που ελέγχει την
   πρόσβαση σε ή προστατεύει με οποιοδήποτε τρόπο της Υπηρεσίες.

   Συμφωνείτε επίσης ότι δεν θα Χρησιμοποιείτε τις Υπηρεσίες με κανένα
   τρόπο προκειμένου να παρενοχλήσετε, να κακοποιήσετε, να κατασκοπεύσετε,
   να απειλήσετε, να συκοφαντήσετε, να παραβιάσετε ή να παραβείτε με άλλο
   τρόπο τα δικαιώματα οποιουδήποτε τρίτου ούτε για να αποστείλετε,
   αναρτήσετε, στείλετε μέσω email, μεταδώσετε ή να διαθέσετε με άλλο
   τρόπο τυχόν υλικό το οποίο να είναι παράνομο, επιζήμιο, απειλητικό,
   υβριστικό, ενοχλητικό, ύπουλο, δυσφημιστικό, χυδαίο, άσεμνο,
   συκοφαντικό, να επεμβαίνει στην ιδιωτική ζωή άλλων, να εκφράζει μίσος ή
   να είναι ανάρμοστο από φυλετική ή εθνολογική άποψη. Συμφωνείτε ότι η
   Western Digital δεν ευθύνεται με κανένα τρόπο για καμία τέτοια Χρήση
   από εσάς, ούτε για οποιοδήποτε μήνυμα ή μετάδοση που ενδέχεται να
   λάβετε ως αποτέλεσμα της Χρήσης των Υπηρεσιών και το οποίο θα συνιστά
   παρενόχληση, απειλή, συκοφάντηση, προσβολή ή θα είναι παράνομο.
   Συμφωνείτε ότι δεν θα παραβιάσετε σκοπίμως ή άθελά σας κανέναν ισχύοντα
   νόμο που συνδέεται με τη Χρήση των Υπηρεσιών από εσάς. Εάν παραβιάσετε
   οποιονδήποτε από τους παραπάνω όρους, ενδέχεται να διωχθείτε ποινικά
   και να επιβληθούν αποζημιώσεις.

   Αναγνωρίζετε ότι, εκτός από όσα ρητώς αναφέρονται στο παρόν, τίποτα
   στους παρόντες Όρους Χρήσης δεν θα ερμηνεύεται ως παραχώρηση άδειας
   προς εσάς για τις δικές μας πατέντες ή τις πατέντες οποιουδήποτε
   δικαιοπαρόχου μας ή για άλλα δικαιώματα πνευματικής ιδιοκτησίας, είτε
   βάσει της αρχής του estoppel είτε βάσει υπαινιγμών ή με οποιονδήποτε
   άλλο τρόπο, και συμφωνείτε ότι έχετε την αποκλειστική ευθύνη για τη
   λήψη των εν λόγω αδειών δυνάμει χωριστών έγγραφων συμφωνητικών. Μη
   εξουσιοδοτημένη Χρήση οποιασδήποτε από τις Υπηρεσίες μπορεί να
   παραβιάσει νόμους πνευματικών δικαιωμάτων, νόμους εμπορικών σημάτων,
   νόμους ιδιωτικού απορρήτου και δημοσιότητας, καθώς και κανονισμούς
   επικοινωνίας και καταστατικά.

Εγγραφή Λογαριασμού και Συνδρομές

   Είναι πιθανόν να σας ζητήσουμε να κάνετε εγγραφή σε λογαριασμό
   προκειμένου να μπορείτε να Χρησιμοποιείτε ορισμένες δυνατότητες ή
   ενότητες των Υπηρεσιών (έναν «Λογαριασμό Χρήστη»). Μπορείτε να
   δημιουργήσετε έναν Λογαριασμό Χρήστη ολοκληρώνοντας της διαδικασία
   εγγραφής που περιγράφεται στην αντίστοιχη ενότητα των Υπηρεσιών. Είστε
   υπεύθυνοι να παρέχετε ακριβείς και ενημερωμένες πληροφορίες
   λογαριασμού.

   Είστε ο μοναδικός εξουσιοδοτημένος χρήστης του Λογαριασμού Χρήστη σας.
   Είστε υπεύθυνοι για τη διατήρηση της εμπιστευτικότητας όσον αφορά
   οποιονδήποτε κωδικό πρόσβασης και αριθμό λογαριασμού παρέχετε εσείς ή η
   Western Digital για να κάνετε Χρήση των Υπηρεσιών. Φέρετε την
   αποκλειστική ευθύνη για κάθε δραστηριότητα που πραγματοποιείται στο
   Λογαριασμό Χρήστη σας. Η Western Digital ενδέχεται να μην μπορεί να
   ελέγξει τη χρήση του δικού σας ή οποιουδήποτε άλλου Λογαριασμού Χρήστη,
   και η Western Digital αποποιείται ρητά οποιαδήποτε ευθύνη προκύπτει εξ
   αυτού.

Πρακτικές Ιδιωτικού Απορρήτου

   Η Χρήση των Υπηρεσιών από Εσάς υπόκειται επίσης στην Δήλωση Ιδιωτικού
   Απορρήτου μας, η οποία είναι διαθέσιμη κάνοντας κλικ εδώ (η «Δήλωση
   Ιδιωτικού Απορρήτου»). Διαβάστε τη Δήλωση Ιδιωτικού Απορρήτου για να
   μάθετε σχετικά με τις πρακτικές ιδιωτικού απορρήτου που ακολουθούμε.

Χορήγηση Άδειας Χρήσης Περιεχομένου στον Χρήστη

   Ως προϋπόθεση της Χρήσης των Υπηρεσιών από εσάς, με την ανάρτηση,
   αποστολή, δημοσίευση, υποβολή, προβολή ή μετάδοση οποιουδήποτε
   περιεχομένου ή άλλου υλικού μέσω των Υπηρεσιών («το Υλικό Σας»),
   χορηγείτε διά του παρόντος στη Western Digital μη αποκλειστική,
   απεριόριστη, αμετάκλητη, άνευ υποχρέωσης καταβολής αποζημίωσης για
   πνευματικά δικαιώματα, παγκόσμια, μεταβιβάσιμη, πλήρως υποαδειοδοτήσιμη
   (συμπεριλαμβανομένων άλλων χρηστών των Υπηρεσιών) άδεια πρόσβασης,
   χρήσης, αναπαραγωγής, μετάδοσης, προβολής, δημοσίευσης, διανομής,
   δημόσιας εκτέλεσης, δημόσιας προβολής, τροποποίησης, προσαρμογής και
   δημιουργίας παράγωγων έργων από το Περιεχόμενό Σας και ενσωμάτωσης του
   Περιεχομένου Σας σε άλλα έργα σε οποιαδήποτε μορφή ή με οποιοδήποτε
   μέσο είτε είναι γνωστό σήμερα είτε αναπτυχθεί στο μέλλον για κάθε
   εμπορικό ή μη εμπορικό σκοπό.  Δηλώνετε και εγγυάστε: ότι έχετε στην
   κατοχή σας ή ελέγχετε με άλλο τρόπο το σύνολο των δικαιωμάτων επί του
   Περιεχομένου Σας, συμπεριλαμβανομένων όλων των δικαιωμάτων πνευματικής
   ιδιοκτησίας, ότι το Περιεχόμενό Σας είναι ακριβές και δεν παραβιάζει ή
   καταχράται τα δικαιώματα πνευματικής ιδιοκτησίας τρίτων,
   συμπεριλαμβανομένων των δικαιωμάτων δημοσιοποίησης και ιδιωτικού
   απορρήτου, και ότι η χρήση του Περιεχομένου Σας δεν παραβιάζει τους
   παρόντες Όρους Χρήσης ούτε τη Δήλωση Ιδιωτικού Απορρήτου και δεν θα
   προκαλέσει βλάβη σε κανένα φυσικό ή νομικό πρόσωπο.  Δεν φέρουμε καμία
   ευθύνη και δεν αναλαμβάνουμε καμία υποχρέωση για κανένα περιεχόμενο ή
   άλλο υλικό που υποβάλλεται ή αναρτάται μέσω των Υπηρεσιών από εσάς ή
   τυχόν τρίτους.  Στο βαθμό που το Περιεχόμενο Σας περιέχει εικόνες,
   δηλώνετε και εγγυάστε επίσης ότι κάθε πρόσωπο που απεικονίζεται στις εν
   λόγω εικόνες, εφόσον ισχύει, έχει δώσει τη συγκατάθεσή του για τη χρήση
   των εικόνων όπως ορίζεται στους παρόντες Όρους Χρήσης.

   ΔΙΑΤΗΡΟΥΜΕ ΤΟ ΔΙΚΑΙΩΜΑ ΝΑ ΕΛΕΓΧΟΥΜΕ ΠΡΟΚΑΤΑΡΚΤΙΚΑ, ΝΑ ΑΠΟΡΡΙΠΤΟΥΜΕ, ΝΑ
   ΤΡΟΠΟΠΟΙΟΥΜΕ Ή ΝΑ ΑΦΑΙΡΟΥΜΕ ΠΕΡΙΕΧΟΜΕΝΟ Ή ΥΛΙΚΟ ΑΠΟ ΤΙΣ ΥΠΗΡΕΣΙΕΣ ΓΙΑ
   ΟΠΟΙΟΝΔΗΠΟΤΕ ΛΟΓΟ, ΣΥΜΠΕΡΙΛΑΜΒΑΝΟΜΕΝΟΥ ΕΑΝ ΚΡΙΝΟΥΜΕ ΚΑΤΑ ΤΗΝ
   ΑΠΟΚΛΕΙΣΤΙΚΗ ΜΑΣ ΔΙΑΚΡΙΤΙΚΗ ΕΥΧΕΡΕΙΑ ΟΤΙ ΤΟ ΕΝ ΛΟΓΩ ΠΕΡΙΕΧΟΜΕΝΟ Ή ΥΛΙΚΟ
   ΠΑΡΑΒΙΑΖΕΙ ΟΠΟΙΟΝΔΗΠΟΤΕ ΝΟΜΟ Ή ΔΙΚΑΙΩΜΑ ΟΠΟΙΟΥΔΗΠΟΤΕ ΑΝΘΡΩΠΟΥ Ή ΕΙΝΑΙ
   ΜΕ ΟΠΟΙΟΝΔΗΠΟΤΕ ΑΛΛΟΝ ΤΡΟΠΟ ΑΚΑΤΑΛΛΗΛΟ ΓΙΑ ΑΝΑΡΤΗΣΗ ΣΤΙΣ ΥΠΗΡΕΣΙΕΣ.

Πρόσβαση από περιοχές εκτός των Ηνωμένων Πολιτειών

   Οι Υπηρεσίες τελούν υπό τον έλεγχο και τη διαχείρισή μας από τα γραφεία
   μας στις Ηνωμένες Πολιτείες. Δεν κάνουμε καμία δήλωση ότι οι Υπηρεσίες
   είναι κατάλληλες ή διαθέσιμες για Χρήση σε άλλες τοποθεσίες και
   απαγορεύεται η πρόσβαση σε αυτές από εδάφη όπου τα περιεχόμενά τους
   είναι παράνομα. Όσοι επιλέγουν να Χρησιμοποιήσουν τις Υπηρεσίες από
   άλλες τοποθεσίες το κάνουν με δική τους πρωτοβουλία και είναι υπεύθυνοι
   για τη συμμόρφωση με την ισχύουσα τοπική νομοθεσία. Εάν Χρησιμοποιείτε
   τις Υπηρεσίες από άλλες τοποθεσίες, είστε υπεύθυνοι για τη συμμόρφωση
   με την ισχύουσα τοπική νομοθεσία, συμπεριλαμβανομένων των κανονισμών
   εισαγωγών-εξαγωγών άλλων χωρών. Αναγνωρίζετε ότι μέρος ή το σύνολο των
   Υπηρεσιών, συμπεριλαμβανομένων των υλικών που περιέχονται σε αυτές,
   ενδέχεται να υπόκειται στους Νόμους και τους Κανονισμούς Διαχείρισης
   Εξαγωγών των Η.Π.Α., στους Κανονισμούς Οικονομικών Κυρώσεων του
   Γραφείου Ελέγχου Αλλοδαπών Περιουσιακών Στοιχείων (Office of Foreign
   Assets Control – «OFAC») των Η.Π.Α., καθώς και στους νόμους περί
   εξαγωγών άλλων χωρών, και ότι απαγορεύεται η παραποίηση των Υπηρεσιών
   κατά παράβαση του δικαίου των Η.Π.Α. ή του δικαίου άλλων σχετικών
   χωρών. Συμφωνείτε ότι καμία από τις Υπηρεσίες και κανένα από τα άμεσα
   προϊόντα τους δεν αποκτάται από, αποστέλλεται, μεταφέρεται, εξάγεται ή
   επανεξάγεται άμεσα ή έμμεσα τώρα ή στο μέλλον σε χώρες ή υπηκόους χωρών
   στις οποίες οι Η.Π.Α. έχουν επιβάλει εμπορικό εμπάργκο, ούτε θα
   Χρησιμοποιείται για πυρηνικές δραστηριότητες, χημικά ή βιολογικά όπλα ή
   πυραυλικά προγράμματα, εκτός εάν έχει δοθεί ειδική εξουσιοδότηση από
   την κυβέρνηση των Η.Π.Α. (ή από άλλη σχετική κυβέρνηση) για ανάλογους
   σκοπούς. Με την πρόσβασή σας στη διαδικτυακή τοποθεσία, δηλώνετε και
   εγγυάστε ότι δεν είστε πολίτης ή κάτοικος, και δεν κατοικείτε συνήθως
   σε καμία χώρα ή περιοχή στην οποία η κυβέρνηση των Η.Π.Α. έχει επιβάλει
   εμπορικό εμπάργκο και ότι δεν περιλαμβάνεστε ως πρόσωπο στο οποίο έχουν
   επιβληθεί κυρώσεις στην ειδική λίστα πολιτών που διατηρεί το OFAC.
   Συμφωνείτε να συμμορφώνεστε αυστηρά με όλους τους νόμους περί εξαγωγών,
   επανεξαγωγών και εισαγωγών και αναλαμβάνετε αποκλειστικά την ευθύνη για
   την απόκτηση αδειών εξαγωγών, επανεξαγωγών και εισαγωγών που
   ενδεχομένως απαιτούνται.

Σύνδεσμοι προς Τοποθεσίες και Εφαρμογές Τρίτων

   Οι Υπηρεσίες ενδέχεται να περιέχουν συνδέσεις προς διαδικτυακές
   τοποθεσίες ή εφαρμογές τρίτων μερών. Ωστόσο, έχετε υπ’ όψιν ότι δεν
   ευθυνόμαστε ούτε ελέγχουμε με οποιονδήποτε τρόπο αυτές τις διαδικτυακές
   τοποθεσίες ή τις εφαρμογές. Η Western Digital δεν προβαίνει σε καμία
   απολύτως δήλωση για καμία άλλη διαδικτυακή τοποθεσία ή εφαρμογή που
   ενδέχεται να προσπελάσετε μέσω των Υπηρεσιών. Όταν προσπελάζετε μια
   διαδικτυακή τοποθεσία ή εφαρμογή τρίτων, ακόμα και αν αυτή εμφανίζει
   λογότυπο της Western Digital, είστε υπεύθυνοι για τη λήψη προληπτικών
   μέτρων προκειμένου να διασφαλίσετε ότι συμφωνείτε με τους όρους χρήσης
   της συγκεκριμένης τοποθεσίας ή εφαρμογής και ότι η τοποθεσία ή η
   εφαρμογή δεν περιέχει ιούς, ιούς τύπου worm, δούρειους ίππους και άλλα
   στοιχεία με καταστροφικές συνέπειες. Συμφωνείτε ότι η Western Digital
   δεν θα είναι υπεύθυνη σε καμία περίπτωση για καμία διαδικτυακή
   τοποθεσία ή εφαρμογή τρίτων.

Περιορισμός ευθύνης

   ΣΤΟ ΜΕΓΙΣΤΟ ΒΑΘΜΟ ΠΟΥ ΕΠΙΤΡΕΠΕΤΑΙ ΑΠΟ ΤΗΝ ΙΣΧΥΟΥΣΑ ΝΟΜΟΘΕΣΙΑ, ΕΜΕΙΣ ΚΑΙ
   ΟΙ ΔΙΕΥΘΥΝΤΕΣ, ΣΤΕΛΕΧΗ, ΕΡΓΑΖΟΜΕΝΟΙ ΚΑΙ ΟΙ ΣΥΜΒΟΥΛΟΙ ΜΑΣ (ΣΥΛΛΗΒΔΗΝ,
   «ΤΑ ΜΕΡΗ ΤΗΣ WESTERN DIGITAL») ΔΕΝ ΘΑ ΦΕΡΟΥΜΕ ΕΥΘΥΝΗ ΓΙΑ ΚΑΜΙΑ ΖΗΜΙΑ ΩΣ
   ΑΠΟΤΕΛΕΣΜΑ ΤΗΣ ΧΡΗΣΗΣ, ΤΡΟΠΟΠΟΙΗΣΗΣ, ΣΥΝΕΙΣΦΟΡΑΣ, ΑΝΤΙΓΡΑΦΗΣ, ΔΙΑΝΟΜΗΣ
   Ή ΛΗΨΗΣ ΤΩΝ ΥΠΗΡΕΣΙΩΝ Ή ΛΟΓΩ ΑΔΥΝΑΜΙΑΣ ΕΚΤΕΛΕΣΗΣ ΟΠΟΙΟΥΔΗΠΟΤΕ ΑΠΟ ΤΑ
   ΠΑΡΑΠΑΝΩ. ΤΑ ΜΕΡΗ ΤΗΣ WESTERN DIGITAL ΔΕΝ ΘΑ ΦΕΡΟΥΝ ΚΑΜΙΑ ΕΥΘΥΝΗ ΓΙΑ
   ΟΠΟΙΕΣΔΗΠΟΤΕ ΕΜΜΕΣΕΣ, ΕΚΤΑΚΤΕΣ, ΥΠΟΔΕΙΓΜΑΤΙΚΕΣ, ΚΥΡΩΤΙΚΕΣ, ΕΙΔΙΚΕΣ,
   ΣΥΜΠΤΩΜΑΤΙΚΕΣ Ή ΠΑΡΕΠΟΜΕΝΕΣ ΖΗΜΙΕΣ (ΣΥΜΠΕΡΙΛΑΜΒΑΝΟΜΕΝΗΣ ΤΗΣ ΑΠΩΛΕΙΑΣ
   ΔΕΔΟΜΕΝΩΝ, ΕΣΟΔΩΝ, ΚΕΡΔΩΝ, ΧΡΗΣΗΣ Ή ΑΛΛΟΥ ΟΙΚΟΝΟΜΙΚΟΥ ΠΛΕΟΝΕΚΤΗΜΑΤΟΣ)
   ΟΠΩΣ ΚΑΙ ΑΝ ΠΡΟΚΥΨΕΙ, ΕΙΤΕ ΑΦΟΡΑ ΑΘΕΤΗΣΗ ΕΙΤΕ ΑΔΙΚΟΠΡΑΞΙΑ, ΑΚΟΜΑ ΚΙ ΑΝ
   ΤΑ ΜΕΡΗ ΤΗΣ WESTERN DIGITAL ΕΧΟΥΝ ΕΝΗΜΕΡΩΘΕΙ ΠΡΟΗΓΟΥΜΕΝΩΣ ΓΙΑ ΤΟ
   ΕΝΔΕΧΟΜΕΝΟ ΤΕΤΟΙΩΝ ΖΗΜΙΩΝ.

   ΣΥΜΦΩΝΕΙΤΕ ΟΤΙ ΕΧΕΤΕ ΑΠΟΚΛΕΙΣΤΙΚΗ ΕΥΘΥΝΗ ΓΙΑ ΤΗΝ ΕΠΑΡΚΗ ΠΡΟΣΤΑΣΙΑ ΚΑΙ
   ΔΗΜΙΟΥΡΓΙΑ ΑΝΤΙΓΡΑΦΩΝ ΑΣΦΑΛΕΙΑΣ ΤΩΝ ΔΕΔΟΜΕΝΩΝ Ή/ΚΑΙ ΤΟΥ ΕΞΟΠΛΙΣΜΟΥ ΠΟΥ
   ΧΡΗΣΙΜΟΠΟΙΕΙΤΑΙ ΣΕ ΣΧΕΣΗ ΜΕ ΤΙΣ ΥΠΗΡΕΣΙΕΣ ΚΑΙ ΔΕΝ ΘΑ ΕΓΕΙΡΕΤΕ ΚΑΜΙΑ
   ΑΞΙΩΣΗ ΟΠΟΙΑΣΔΗΠΟΤΕ ΦΥΣΕΩΣ ΚΑΤΑ ΤΩΝ ΜΕΡΩΝ ΤΗΣ WESTERN DIGITAL ΓΙΑ
   ΑΠΩΛΕΙΑ ΔΕΔΟΜΕΝΩΝ, ΑΝΑΚΡΙΒΗ ΑΠΟΤΕΛΕΣΜΑΤΑ, ΚΑΘΥΣΤΕΡΗΣΕΙΣ ΕΡΓΑΣΙΩΝ Ή
   ΑΠΩΛΕΙΑ ΚΕΡΔΩΝ ΠΟΥ ΠΡΟΚΥΠΤΕΙ ΑΠΟ ΤΗ ΧΡΗΣΗ Ή ΤΗΝ ΑΔΥΝΑΜΙΑ ΧΡΗΣΗΣ ΤΩΝ
   ΥΠΗΡΕΣΙΩΝ.

   ΣΥΜΦΩΝΕΙΤΕ ΟΤΙ ΘΑ ΑΠΑΛΛΑΞΕΤΕ ΑΠΟΛΥΤΩΣ ΤΑ ΜΕΡΗ ΤΗΣ WESTERN DIGITAL ΑΠΟ,
   ΚΑΙ ΔΕΣΜΕΥΕΣΤΕ ΝΑ ΜΗΝ ΜΗΝΥΣΕΤΕ ΤΑ ΜΕΡΗ ΤΗΣ WESTERN DIGITAL ΓΙΑ, ΤΥΧΟΝ
   ΑΞΙΩΣΕΙΣ ΠΟΥ ΣΧΕΤΙΖΟΝΤΑΙ ΜΕ ΤΙΣ ΥΠΗΡΕΣΙΕΣ. ΕΑΝ ΕΧΕΤΕ ΟΠΟΙΑΔΗΠΟΤΕ ΒΑΣΗ
   ΓΙΑ ΕΙΣΠΡΑΞΗ ΑΠΟΖΗΜΙΩΣΗΣ (ΣΥΜΠΕΡΙΛΑΜΒΑΝΟΜΕΝΗΣ ΤΗΣ ΠΑΡΑΒΙΑΣΗΣ ΤΩΝ
   ΠΑΡΟΝΤΩΝ ΟΡΩΝ ΧΡΗΣΗΣ) ΑΠΟ ΟΠΟΙΟΔΗΠΟΤΕ ΑΠΟ ΤΑ ΜΕΡΗ ΤΗΣ WESTERN DIGITAL
   ΣΕ ΣΧΕΣΗ ΜΕ ΤΙΣ ΥΠΗΡΕΣΙΕΣ Ή ΤΟΥΣ ΠΑΡΟΝΤΕΣ ΟΡΟΥΣ ΧΡΗΣΗΣ, ΣΥΜΦΩΝΕΙΤΕ ΟΤΙ
   Η ΑΠΟΚΛΕΙΣΤΙΚΗ ΑΠΟΖΗΜΙΩΣΗ ΣΑΣ ΕΙΝΑΙ ΝΑ ΕΙΣΠΡΑΞΕΤΕ ΑΠΟ ΤΑ ΜΕΡΗ ΤΗΣ
   WESTERN DIGITAL ΑΠΟΖΗΜΙΩΣΗ ΠΟΥ ΘΑ ΙΣΟΥΤΑΙ ΜΕ ΤΟ ΠΟΣΟ ΤΗΣ ΑΜΟΙΒΗΣ ΤΩΝ
   ΥΠΗΡΕΣΙΩΝ ΓΙΑ ΤΟΝ ΜΗΝΑ ΚΑΤΑ ΤΟΝ ΟΠΟΙΟ ΠΡΟΕΚΥΨΕ Η ΠΑΡΑΒΙΑΣΗ (Ή ΕΩΣ 100
   ΔΟΛΑΡΙΑ Η.Π.Α. ΕΑΝ Η ΑΞΙΩΣΗ ΑΦΟΡΑ ΤΥΧΟΝ ΥΠΗΡΕΣΙΕΣ ΠΟΥ ΠΑΡΕΧΟΝΤΑΙ
   ΔΩΡΕΑΝ).

   ΑΥΤΟΙ ΟΙ ΠΕΡΙΟΡΙΣΜΟΙ ΠΟΥ ΑΦΟΡΟΥΝ ΤΗΝ ΕΥΘΥΝΗ ΤΩΝ ΜΕΡΩΝ ΤΗΣ WESTERN
   DIGITAL ΘΑ ΙΣΧΥΟΥΝ ΑΝΕΞΑΡΤΗΤΑ ΑΠΟ ΤΟ ΕΑΝ Η WESTERN DIGITAL ΕΧΕΙ
   ΕΝΗΜΕΡΩΘΕΙ ΓΙΑ Ή ΟΦΕΙΛΕ ΝΑ ΕΙΝΑΙ ΕΝΗΜΕΡΗ ΓΙΑ ΤΗΝ ΠΙΘΑΝΟΤΗΤΑ ΠΙΘΑΝΩΝ
   ΑΠΩΛΕΙΩΝ ΑΥΤΟΥ ΤΟΥ ΕΙΔΟΥΣ. ΟΡΙΣΜΕΝΕΣ ΠΟΛΙΤΕΙΕΣ ΔΕΝ ΕΠΙΤΡΕΠΟΥΝ ΤΗΝ
   ΕΞΑΙΡΕΣΗ Ή ΤΟΝ ΠΕΡΙΟΡΙΣΜΟ ΤΩΝ ΣΥΜΠΤΩΜΑΤΙΚΩΝ Ή ΠΑΡΕΠΟΜΕΝΩΝ ΖΗΜΙΩΝ ΚΑΙ,
   ΕΠΟΜΕΝΩΣ, ΟΙ ΠΑΡΑΠΑΝΩ ΕΞΑΙΡΕΣΕΙΣ Ή ΠΕΡΙΟΡΙΣΜΟΙ ΕΝΔΕΧΕΤΑΙ ΝΑ ΜΗΝ ΙΣΧΥΟΥΝ
   ΓΙΑ ΕΣΑΣ.

Δήλωση αποποίησης

   ΑΝΑΓΝΩΡΙΖΕΤΕ ΡΗΤΑ ΟΤΙ Η ΧΡΗΣΗ ΤΩΝ ΥΠΗΡΕΣΙΩΝ ΠΡΑΓΜΑΤΟΠΟΙΕΙΤΑΙ ΚΑΤΑ ΤΗΝ
   ΑΠΟΚΛΕΙΣΤΙΚΗ ΣΑΣ ΕΥΘΥΝΗ ΚΑΙ ΟΤΙ ΑΝΑΛΑΜΒΑΝΕΤΕ ΕΞ ΟΛΟΚΛΗΡΟΥ ΤΟΝ ΚΙΝΔΥΝΟ
   ΩΣ ΠΡΟΣ ΤΗΝ ΙΚΑΝΟΠΟΙΗΤΙΚΗ ΠΟΙΟΤΗΤΑ, ΕΚΤΕΛΕΣΗ, ΑΚΡΙΒΕΙΑ ΚΑΙ ΠΡΟΣΠΑΘΕΙΑ.
   ΟΛΑ ΤΑ ΜΕΡΗ ΤΩΝ ΥΠΗΡΕΣΙΩΝ ΠΑΡΕΧΟΝΤΑΙ ΑΠΟ ΤΗΝ WESTERN DIGITAL
   ΑΠΟΚΛΕΙΣΤΙΚΑ «ΩΣ ΕΧΟΥΝ», «ΜΕ ΟΛΑ ΤΑ ΕΛΑΤΤΩΜΑΤΑ» ΚΑΙ «ΟΠΩΣ ΔΙΑΤΙΘΕΝΤΑΙ»,
   ΜΕ ΟΛΑ ΤΑ ΕΛΑΤΤΩΜΑΤΑ ΚΑΙ ΧΩΡΙΣ ΚΑΝΕΝΟΣ ΕΙΔΟΥΣ ΕΓΓΥΗΣΗ. Η WESTERN
   DIGITAL ΔΙΑ ΤΟΥ ΠΑΡΟΝΤΟΣ ΑΠΟΠΟΙΕΙΤΑΙ ΡΗΤΑ ΟΛΕΣ ΤΙΣ ΔΗΛΩΣΕΙΣ, ΕΓΓΥΗΣΕΙΣ
   ΚΑΙ ΠΡΟΫΠΟΘΕΣΕΙΣ ΣΕ ΣΧΕΣΗ ΜΕ ΤΙΣ ΥΠΗΡΕΣΙΕΣ (ΣΥΜΠΕΡΙΛΑΜΒΑΝΟΜΕΝΗΣ ΤΗΣ
   ΧΡΗΣΗΣ, ΤΗΣ ΕΚΤΕΛΕΣΗΣ ΚΑΙ ΤΗΣ ΥΠΟΣΤΗΡΙΞΗΣ ΤΟΥΣ), ΕΙΤΕ ΕΙΝΑΙ ΡΗΤΕΣ ΕΙΤΕ
   ΕΜΜΕΣΕΣ Ή ΠΡΟΒΛΕΠΟΜΕΝΕΣ ΑΠΟ ΤΟ ΝΟΜΟ Ή ΑΛΛΕΣ, ΣΥΜΠΕΡΙΛΑΜΒΑΝΟΜΕΝΩΝ ΤΥΧΟΝ
   ΕΜΜΕΣΩΝ ΕΓΓΥΗΣΕΩΝ ΚΑΤΑΛΛΗΛΟΤΗΤΑΣ ΓΙΑ ΣΥΓΚΕΚΡΙΜΕΝΟ ΣΚΟΠΟ,
   ΕΜΠΟΡΕΥΣΙΜΟΤΗΤΑΣ, ΚΥΡΙΟΤΗΤΑΣ ΚΑΙ ΜΗ ΠΑΡΑΒΙΑΣΗΣ ΔΙΚΑΙΩΜΑΤΩΝ. Η WESTERN
   DIGITAL ΔΕΝ ΠΑΡΕΧΕΙ ΚΑΜΙΑ ΔΙΑΣΦΑΛΙΣΗ ΣΧΕΤΙΚΑ ΜΕ ΤΗΝ ΑΚΡΙΒΕΙΑ ΤΩΝ
   ΑΠΟΤΕΛΕΣΜΑΤΩΝ ΠΟΥ ΠΡΟΚΥΠΤΕΙ ΑΠΟ ΤΙΣ ΥΠΗΡΕΣΙΕΣ.

Πολιτική Πνευματικών Δικαιωμάτων και Αξιώσεις Παραβίασης Πνευματικών
Δικαιωμάτων βάσει του νόμου DMCA

   Σύμφωνα με τον Τίτλο 17, του Κώδικα των Ηνωμένων Πολιτειών, Ενότητα
   512(c), αποτελεί πολιτική της Western Digital να αποκρίνεται σε
   ειδοποιήσεις πιθανολογούμενης παραβίασης που συμμορφώνονται με τον νόμο
   Digital Millennium Copyright Act (Νόμος περί Ψηφιακών Πνευματικών
   Δικαιωμάτων της Χιλιετίας) και άλλους ισχύοντες νόμους πνευματικής
   ιδιοκτησίας. Σεβόμαστε την πνευματική ιδιοκτησία των άλλων. Εάν
   πιστεύετε ότι το έργο σας έχει αντιγραφεί με τρόπο που συνιστά
   παραβίαση πνευματικών δικαιωμάτων, χρησιμοποιήστε τις διαδικασίες όπως
   αναφέρονται στην Πολιτική Πνευματικών Δικαιωμάτων της εταιρείας μας.

Πολιτική Χρήσης Εμπορικών Σημάτων

   Τα εμπορικά σήματα, τα λογότυπα και τα σήματα υπηρεσιών (συλλήβδην,
   «Σήματα») που εμφανίζονται με την παροχή των προϊόντων και των
   υπηρεσιών μας αποτελούν ιδιοκτησία της Western Digital ή τρίτων μερών Η
   χρήση των Σημάτων της Western Digital είναι δυνατή μόνον σε
   περιορισμένες περιπτώσεις και κατόπιν προηγούμενης γραπτής έγκρισης από
   την Western Digital. Οι εγκρίσεις παρέχονται κατά περίπτωση. Όλες οι
   εγκεκριμένες χρήσεις πρέπει να συμμορφώνονται αυστηρά με τις
   Κατευθυντήριες Οδηγίες για τη Χρήση Εμπορικών Σημάτων και Λογοτύπων.
   Κάντε κλικ εδώ για μια μη εξαντλητική λίστα Σημάτων της Western
   Digital.

Περιορισμένα Δικαιώματα της Κυβέρνησης των Η.Π.Α.

   Οι Υπηρεσίες παρέχονται με «ΠΕΡΙΟΡΙΣΜΕΝΑ ΔΙΚΑΙΩΜΑΤΑ». Η χρήση, η
   αντιγραφή ή η κοινοποίηση από την κυβέρνηση των Ηνωμένων Πολιτειών
   υπόκειται σε περιορισμούς όπως ορίζονται στα FAR52.227-14 και
   DFAR252.227-7013 και επόμ., σε διάδοχες νομοθετικές διατάξεις και σε
   άλλους ισχύοντες νόμους και κανονισμούς. Η Χρήση των Υπηρεσιών από την
   κυβέρνηση των Ηνωμένων Πολιτειών αποτελεί αναγνώριση των αποκλειστικών
   μας δικαιωμάτων σε αυτές.

Εφαρμοστέο Δίκαιο, Δυνατότητα Διαχωρισμού

   Τυχόν αξίωση που προκύπτει από ή σχετίζεται με τις Υπηρεσίες,
   συμπεριλαμβανομένης της Χρήσης (ή της αδυναμίας Χρήσης) των Υπηρεσιών,
   διέπεται από τη νομοθεσία της Πολιτείας της Καλιφόρνιας, χωρίς αναφορά
   στις αρχές των συγκρούσεων νόμων. Συμφωνείτε ότι υπόκειστε στην
   αποκλειστική δικαιοδοσία των πολιτειακών και ομοσπονδιακών δικαστηρίων
   που βρίσκονται στην Κομητεία Santa Clara της Καλιφόρνιας των Η.Π.Α. για
   την επίλυση τυχόν διαφοράς που θα προκύψει από ή σε σχέση με τη Χρήση
   των Υπηρεσιών. Εάν οποιαδήποτε διάταξη αυτών των Όρων Χρήσης θεωρηθεί
   άκυρη, ανίσχυρη ή για οποιονδήποτε λόγο μη εκτελεστή, η πρόβλεψη αυτή
   θα θεωρείται διαχωριστέα και δεν θα επηρεάζει την εγκυρότητα και την
   εφαρμοσιμότητα των υπόλοιπων διατάξεων αυτών των Όρων Χρήσης.

   Οι χρήστες των Υπηρεσιών στην Καλιφόρνια δικαιούνται να λαμβάνουν την
   ακόλουθη ειδική ειδοποίηση για τα δικαιώματα των καταναλωτών: Μπορείτε
   να επικοινωνείτε γραπτώς με τη Μονάδα Αρωγής Παραπόνων της Διεύθυνσης
   Υπηρεσιών Καταναλωτή του Τμήματος Θεμάτων Καταναλωτή της Καλιφόρνιας
   στη διεύθυνση 1625 North Market Blvd., Suite N 112, Sacramento, CA
   95834, ή τηλεφωνικώς στον αριθμό (800) 952-5210.

Δηλώσεις πρόβλεψης

   Ορισμένες από τις πληροφορίες στις Υπηρεσίες μας, συμπεριλαμβανομένων
   των διαδικτυακών μας τοποθεσιών, όπως η investor.wdc.com, ενδέχεται να
   περιέχουν δηλώσεις πρόβλεψης κατά την έννοια των ομοσπονδιακών νόμων
   περί χρεογράφων, συμπεριλαμβανομένων δηλώσεων σχετικά με μελλοντικά
   γεγονότα, τα μελλοντικά μας λειτουργικά σχέδια ή τη μελλοντική μας
   οικονομική απόδοση, την αναμενόμενη ανάπτυξή μας, τις τάσεις του κλάδου
   μας και των αγορών στις οποίες δραστηριοποιούμαστε και άλλους
   χαρακτηρισμούς μελλοντικών γεγονότων ή συνθηκών. Όλες οι δηλώσεις που
   δεν αποτελούν ιστορικά δεδομένα βασίζονται στις τρέχουσες προσδοκίες
   μας και υπόκεινται σε διάφορους κινδύνους και αβεβαιότητες που
   ενδέχεται να έχουν ως αποτέλεσμα τα πραγματικά δεδομένα να διαφέρουν
   σημαντικά από εκείνα που εκφράζονται ή υπαινίσσονται στις δηλώσεις
   πρόβλεψης. Περισσότερες πληροφορίες για τους κινδύνους και τις
   αβεβαιότητες που μπορεί να επηρεάσουν την επιχειρηματική μας
   δραστηριότητα αναφέρονται στα έγγραφα που έχουμε καταθέσει στην
   Επιτροπή Κεφαλαιαγοράς των Η.Π.Α. (Securities and Exchange Commission –
   «SEC») και διατίθενται στη διαδικτυακή τοποθεσία της Επιτροπής στη
   διεύθυνση www.sec.gov, συμπεριλαμβανομένης της πιο πρόσφατης περιοδικής
   μας έκθεσης, στην οποία εφιστούμε την προσοχή σας. Συνιστάται στους
   αναγνώστες να μην βασίζονται σε υπερβολικό βαθμό σε αυτές τις δηλώσεις
   πρόβλεψης. Δεν αναλαμβάνουμε καμία υποχρέωση να ενημερώσουμε δημόσια ή
   να διορθώσουμε καμία δήλωση πρόβλεψης είτε λόγω νέων δεδομένων και
   μελλοντικών εξελίξεων είτε με οποιοδήποτε άλλο τρόπο, εκτός εάν
   απαιτείται από το νόμο.

Αλλαγές στις Υπηρεσίες

   Η Western Digital διατηρεί το δικαίωμα να αλλάξει ή να διακόψει,
   προσωρινά ή μόνιμα, τις Υπηρεσίες (ή οποιοδήποτε μέρος τους), ή τα
   προϊόντα ή τις υπηρεσίες που περιγράφονται στο παρόν, ανά πάσα στιγμή
   χωρίς ειδοποίηση. Από την παύση των Υπηρεσιών ή οποιουδήποτε μέρους
   τους, η Western Digital δεν οφείλει να διατηρεί ή να παρέχει το
   Περιεχόμενό Σας ή άλλα δεδομένα.

Επικοινωνία

   Εάν έχετε ερωτήσεις, παράπονα ή σχόλια σχετικά με τους παρόντες Όρους
   Χρήσης, εάν θέλετε να λάβετε περαιτέρω πληροφορίες σχετικά με τις
   Υπηρεσίες ή εάν θέλετε να επικοινωνήσετε για οποιοδήποτε λόγο με την
   Western Digital, επικοινωνήστε μαζί μας στα στοιχεία που θα βρείτε στη
   σελίδα Επικοινωνία με την Western Digital.

     * {{unescape(item.title)}}
          + {{anchor.title}}

   Ultimo aggiornamento il 28 maggio 2018.

   Le presenti Condizioni d’Uso (queste “Condizioni d’uso”) disciplinano
   il tuo Utilizzo (come definito di seguito) dei siti Web offerti da
   Western Digital Technologies, Inc. e/o dalle sue affiliate
   (collettivamente, “Western Digital”, “noi” o “nostro”) e il contenuto,
   le caratteristiche, i materiali, il software e la relativa
   documentazione e i servizi disponibili su tali siti Web (tali siti Web,
   contenuti, caratteristiche, materiali, software e la relativa
   documentazione e servizi, di seguito sono collettivamente denominati i
   "Servizi ").

   IMPORTANTE - SI PREGA DI LEGGERE ATTENTAMENTE - Se non accetti i
   termini di queste Condizioni d’Uso non avrai l’autorizzazione ad usare
   i Servizi.

   Per aiutarti a navigare e trovare sezioni specifiche di queste
   Condizioni d’Uso, fai riferimento alla tabella che trovi di seguito:

Accettazione di queste Condizioni d’Uso

   Utilizzando (come definito di seguito) i Servizi, dichiari e garantisci
   di essere maggiorenne secondo quanto previsto nella tua giurisdizione
   di appartenenza e di disporre della facoltà, dei diritti e delle
   autorizzazioni necessari per stipulare ed essere vincolato dalle
   presenti Condizioni d’Uso; riconosci di aver letto e compreso e accetti
   di rispettare tali Condizioni d’Uso; inoltre, accetti di rispettare
   tutte le leggi e i regolamenti applicabili in relazione al tuo Utilizzo
   dei Servizi.

   Nel caso in cui Utilizzi i Servizi per conto di una società,
   organizzazione o altra entità. fai riferimento a quanto segue:  “tu”
   include te e quell’entità; dichiari e garantisci di essere un
   rappresentante autorizzato dell’ente con l’autorità di vincolarlo alle
   presenti Condizioni d’Uso e di accettare le presenti Condizioni d’Uso
   per conto dell’entità; inoltre, accetti che tale entità sia legalmente
   e finanziariamente responsabile per l’Uso dei Servizi e per l’uso del
   tuo Account Utente (come definito di seguito) da parte di altri
   affiliati alla tua entità, inclusi dipendenti, agenti o appaltatori.

Interpretazione

   Ai fini delle presenti Condizioni d’Uso: il verbo in maiuscolo “Usare”
   indica l’accesso, la navigazione, la creazione di un Account Utente
   (come definito di seguito), il caricamento di contenuti o materiale, il
   download di contenuti o materiale, o altrimenti l’utilizzo dei Servizi
   (e il nome “Uso” e il termine “Utilizzo” avranno significati
   corollari); i termini “tu” e “tuo” si riferiscono a te come utente che
   utilizza i Servizi; e tutti i riferimenti alle parole “include”,
   “incluso” o “che include” sono considerati seguiti dalle parole "senza
   limitazione".

Modifiche a queste Condizioni d’Uso

   ABBIAMO LA FACOLTÀ, A NOSTRA ESCLUSIVA DISCREZIONE, DI MODIFICARE
   QUESTI TERMINI D’USO IN QUALSIASI MOMENTO AGGIORNANDO QUESTA PAGINA.
   SE CONTINUERAI A UTILIZZARE I SERVIZI DOPO OGNUNA DELLE MODIFICHE,
   SARAI VINCOLATO DA TALE CAMBIAMENTO.  PERTANTO, È NECESSARIO CHE VISITI
   QUESTA PAGINA PERIODICAMENTE PER RIESAMINARE TALI CONDIZIONI D’USO.  SE
   NON ACCETTI OGNUNA DI QUESTE MODIFICHE NON TI SARÀ PIÙ PERMESSO USARE I
   SERVIZI.

Condizioni Aggiuntive

   Offriamo un'ampia gamma di prodotti e servizi, inclusi prodotti e
   servizi software.  Alcuni prodotti o servizi disponibili sui nostri
   siti Web potrebbero essere soggetti ad altri termini e condizioni
   aggiuntivi (”Condizioni Aggiuntive").  Tali Condizioni Aggiuntive
   saranno rese disponibili con i relativi prodotti o servizi; verranno,
   ad esempio, pubblicati direttamente sul sito Web di tali prodotti o
   servizi o presentati come una serie separata di termini e condizioni al
   momento dell'acquisto, del download, dell’accesso, della navigazione, o
   dell’utilizzo di tali prodotti o servizi.  Nella misura in cui le
   presenti Condizioni d’uso siano applicate a tali prodotti o servizi (ad
   esempio , siano rese disponibili sui nostri siti Web) ma non siano
   coerenti con le Condizioni Aggiuntive applicabili a tali prodotti o
   servizi, tali Condizioni Aggiuntive sostituiranno le disposizioni
   incoerenti in queste Condizioni d’uso e prevarranno in relazione a tali
   prodotti o servizi.

Proprietà

   I Servizi, incluso il loro “aspetto grafico” (ad es. testo, grafica,
   immagini e loghi), contenuto proprietario, informazioni e altri
   materiali contenuti nei Servizi, sono protetti dalla legge, compresi le
   leggi sulla proprietà intellettuale, i copyright, i marchi commerciali,
   e le altre leggi degli Stati Uniti, e i trattati internazionali.
   Riconosci che Western Digital e/o i nostri licenzianti possiedono tutti
   i diritti, la titolarità e gli interessi riguardanti i Servizi (inclusi
   tutti i brevetti, i copyright, i segreti commerciali, i marchi, lo
   show-how, il know-how e tutti gli altri diritti di proprietà
   intellettuale in essi contenuti o correlati) e accetti di non
   intraprendere alcuna azione incoerente con tali interessi di proprietà.

Restrizioni all’Uso

   Ad eccezione di quanto espressamente autorizzato nel presente
   documento, nessuno dei Servizi può essere copiato, riprodotto,
   distribuito, ripubblicato, scaricato, visualizzato, pubblicato o
   trasmesso in qualsiasi forma o con qualsiasi mezzo, sia esso
   elettronico, meccanico, una fotocopiato, una registrazione o altro,
   senza la nostra previa autorizzazione scritta o la previa
   autorizzazione scritta del proprietario del copyright.  Subject to your
   compliance with these Terms of Use, Western Digital hereby grants you a
   limited non-exclusive right to access and use the materials contained
   on the Services, in each case for personal, non-commercial use only,
   and provided you do not modify, re-sell, or make commercial use of such
   materials.Fermo restando il rispetto delle presenti Condizioni d’Uso,
   Western Digital ti concede un diritto limitato, non esclusivo, di
   accedere e utilizzare il materiale contenuto nei Servizi, in ogni caso
   esclusivamente per uso personale e non commerciale, purché tu non lo
   modifichi, non lo rivenda o ne faccia un uso commerciale.  Questa
   autorizzazione termina automaticamente in caso di violazione di una
   qualsiasi delle presenti Condizioni d’Uso.  In caso di sua cessazione,
   è necessario che tu distrugga immediatamente tutto il materiale
   ottenuto tramite i Servizi.

   Accetti di non compiere le seguenti azioni: rimuovere o alterare nessun
   avviso sui diritti d'autore, su altri diritti di proprietà o sulla
   legenda dei diritti restrittivi contenuti o inclusi nei Servizi;
   decompilare, disassemblare, invertire la compilazione, invertire il
   montaggio o decodificare in qualsiasi altro modo uno dei Servizi, uno
   degli aggiornamenti o parte di essi (fatto salvo e solo nei limiti in
   cui le suddette restrizioni siano proibite dalla legge applicabile);
   utilizzare alcun tipo di mezzo per scoprire un codice sorgente
   confidenziale di una qualsiasi delle parti dei Servizi; eludere alcuna
   funzionalità che controlli l'accesso o in altro modo protegga i
   Servizi.

   Accetti inoltre di non utilizzare i Servizi in alcun modo per
   molestare, abusare, perseguitare, minacciare, diffamare, ledere o
   violare in altro modo i diritti di una qualsiasi delle altre parti, o
   per caricare, pubblicare, inviare e-mail, trasmettere o rendere
   disponibile in qualsiasi altro modo contenuto che sia illegale,
   dannoso, minaccioso, offensivo, molesto, deviante, diffamatorio,
   volgare, osceno, calunnioso, invasivo della privacy altrui, odioso, che
   sottintenda discriminazioni razziali, etniche o di altro tipo.  Accetti
   che Western Digital non sia in alcun modo responsabile per tale
   utilizzo da parte tua, né per eventuali messaggi o trasmissioni
   molesti, minacciosi, diffamatori, offensivi o illegali che potresti
   ricevere a seguito dell'utilizzo dei Servizi.  Accetti di non violare
   intenzionalmente o involontariamente nessuna legge applicabile in
   relazione al tuo Utilizzo dei Servizi.  In caso di violazione da parte
   tua di quanto sopra, potrai essere soggetto a procedimento giudiziario
   e passibile di risarcimento dei danni.

   Riconosci che, salvo quanto espressamente stabilito nel presente
   documento, nulla in queste Condizioni d’Uso può essere interpretato
   come conferimento di alcuna licenza, basata su preclusioni,
   implicazioni o altro, relativamente ai brevetti o ad altri diritti di
   proprietà intellettuale nostri, o dei nostri licenzianti, e accetti di
   avere la responsabilità esclusiva di ottenere tali licenze mediante un
   accordo scritto separato  L'Uso non autorizzato di uno qualsiasi dei
   Servizi può violare le leggi sul copyright, le leggi sui marchi
   commerciali, le leggi sulla privacy e la pubblicità, nonché i
   regolamenti e gli statuti sulle comunicazioni.

Iscrizioni e Registrazione dell’Account

   Potremmo chiederti di registrare un account per l'Uso di determinate
   funzionalità o sezioni dei Servizi (un "Account Utente").  Puoi creare
   un Account Utente completando la procedura di registrazione indicata
   nella relativa sezione dei Servizi.  È tua responsabilità fornire
   informazioni accurate e aggiornate sull’account.

   Sei la sola persona autorizzata ad usare il tuo Account Utente.  È tua
   responsabilità mantenere riservate tutte le password e il numero di
   account utilizzati da te o forniti da Western Digital per l'Utilizzo
   dei Servizi.  Sei pienamente responsabile per tutte le attività svolte
   utilizzando il tuo Account Utente.  Western Digital potrebbe non avere
   il controllo e declina espressamente ogni responsabilità relativamente
   all'utilizzo del tuo Account Utente o di qualsiasi altro utente.

Prassi sulla Privacy

   L’utilizzo dei Servizi è soggetto anche alla nostra Normativa sulla
   privacy, disponibile cliccando qui (la “Normativa sulla Privacy”).  Si
   prega di esaminare la Normativa sulla Privacy per conoscere le nostre
   pratiche al riguardo.

Concessione della Licenza per l’Uso dei Contenuti dell’Utente

   Come condizione per l’Utilizzo dei Servizi, postando, caricando,
   pubblicando, inviando, visualizzando o trasmettendo qualsiasi contenuto
   o altro materiale tramite i Servizi (”Contenuto dell’Utente”), con la
   presente concedi a Western Digital una licenza non esclusiva, perpetua,
   irrevocabile, esente da diritti, in tutto il mondo, trasferibile,
   completamente sublicenziabile (anche ad altri utenti dei Servizi) di
   accesso, uso, riproduzione, trasmissione, visualizzazione,
   pubblicazione, distribuzione, esibizione pubblica, visualizzazione
   pubblica, modifica, adattamento e creazione di opere derivate dal tuo
   Contenuto dell’Utente e di poter incorporare il tuo Contenuto
   dell’Utente in altre opere in qualsiasi formato o supporto già noti o
   sviluppati in futuro, per qualsiasi scopo commerciale o non
   commerciale.  Dichiari e garantisci quanto segue: che possiedi o
   altrimenti controlli tutti i diritti sul Contenuto dell'Utente,
   compresi tutti i diritti d'autore; che il Contenuto dell'Utente è
   accurato e non viola o non si appropria indebitamente dei diritti di
   proprietà intellettuale di terze parti, compresi i diritti di
   pubblicità e privacy; che l'utilizzo del Contenuto dell'Utente non
   costituisce una violazione delle presenti Condizioni d'Uso o della
   Normativa sulla privacy e che non causerà danni a persone o entità.
   Non ci assumiamo alcuna responsabilità per nessun contenuto o altro
   materiale inviato o pubblicato tramite i Servizi da te o da terze
   parti.  Nella misura in cui il Contenuto dell’Utente contenga immagini,
   dichiari e garantisci che ogni persona eventualmente raffigurata in
   tali immagini ha fornito il proprio consenso al loro utilizzo come
   stabilito in queste Condizioni d'Uso.

   CI RISERVIAMO IL DIRITTO DI ESAMINARE PREVENTIVAMENTE, RIFIUTARE,
   MODIFICARE O RIMUOVERE QUALSIASI CONTENUTO O MATERIALE SUI SERVIZI PER
   QUALSIASI MOTIVO, COMPRESO IL CASO IN CUI DOVESSIMO STABILIRE, A NOSTRA
   ESCLUSIVA DISCREZIONE, CHE TALE CONTENUTO O MATERIALE COSTITUISCE
   VIOLAZIONE DI UNA QUALSIASI LEGGE O DEL DIRITTO DI QUALSIASI PERSONA, O
   CHE NON È APPROPIATO PER LA PUBBLICAZIONE NEI SERVIZI.

Accesso al di fuori degli Stati Uniti

   I Servizi sono controllati e gestiti da noi nei nostri uffici negli
   Stati Uniti.  Non garantiamo che i Servizi siano appropriati o
   disponibili per l’Uso in altre località e l’accesso ad essi da
   territori in cui i loro contenuti siano considerati illegali è
   proibito.  Coloro che scelgono di utilizzare i Servizi da altre
   località lo fanno di propria iniziativa e hanno la responsabilità di
   conformarsi alle leggi locali applicabili.  Se Utilizzi i Servizi da
   altre località, hai la responsabilità di conformarti alle leggi locali
   applicabili, incluse le normative di altri paesi sull'esportazione e
   l'importazione.  Riconosci e accetti che i Servizi, inclusa senza
   limitazioni qualsiasi informazione o tecnologia sottostante, possono
   essere soggetti alle Leggi e ai Regolamenti sull’Amministrazione delle
   Esportazioni degli Stati Uniti, al Regolamento delle Sanzioni
   Economiche per il Controllo delle Attività Estere del Dipartimento del
   Tesoro degli Stati Uniti (”OFAC”), nonché alle leggi sulle esportazioni
   di altri paesi, e che tale diversione dei Servizi in contrasto con la
   legge degli Stati Uniti o la legge di altri paesi in questione è
   vietata.  Accetti che nessuna parte dei Servizi, né alcun loro prodotto
   diretto, vengano o verranno acquisiti spediti, trasferiti, esportati o
   riesportati, direttamente o indirettamente, verso paesi proscritti o
   sottoposti a embargo o ai loro cittadini, e che non sia Utilizzati per
   attività nucleari, armi chimiche o biologiche o progetti missilistici,
   a meno che non ci sia specifica autorizzazione da parte del governo
   degli Stati Uniti (o da altro governo pertinente) per tali scopi.
   Accedendo al sito Web, dichiari e garantisci di non essere un cittadino
   o un residente, o che non risiedi abitualmente, in uno qualsiasi dei
   paesi o delle regioni soggetti a un embargo da parte del governo degli
   Stati Uniti e che tu non fai parte della lista stilata dall'OFAC di
   persone sanzionate, messe all’indice e indesiderate.  Accetti di
   rispettare rigorosamente tutte le leggi sull'esportazione,
   riesportazione e importazione e ti assumi la responsabilità esclusiva
   di ottenere le licenze per l'esportazione, la riesportazione o
   l'importazione che potrebbero essere necessarie.

Link a Siti e Applicazioni di Terze Parti

   I Servizi possono contenere collegamenti a siti Web o applicazioni di
   terzi.  Tuttavia, tieni presente che non siamo responsabili e non
   controlliamo tali siti Web o applicazioni.  Western Digital non
   rilascia alcuna dichiarazione o garanzia in merito a qualsiasi altro
   sito Web o applicazione a cui è possibile accedere tramite i Servizi.
   Quando accedi a un sito Web o a un’applicazione di terze parti, anche
   se in essi compare un logo aziendale Western Digital, spetta a te
   prendere precauzioni che garantiscano la tua accettazione delle
   condizioni d’uso di quel sito Web o applicazione e che essi siano privi
   di virus, worm, trojan e altri elementi di natura distruttiva.  Accetti
   che in nessun caso Western Digital sia responsabile in qualche modo per
   siti Web o applicazioni di terzi.

Limitazione di Responsabilità

   NELLA MISURA MASSIMA CONSENTITA DALLA LEGGE APPLICABILE, NOI, I NOSTRI
   DIRETTORI, FUNZIONARI, DIEPENDENTI E CONSULENTI (COLLETTIVAMENTE, “I
   MEMBRI DI WESTERN DIGITAL”) NON SAREMO RESPONSABILI PER ALCUN DANNO
   SUBITO A CAUSA DI UTILIZZO, MODIFICA, CONTRIBUTO, COPIA, DISTRIBUZIONE
   O DOWNLOAD DEI SERVIZI O DALL’IMPOSSIBILITÀ DI COMPIERE QUALSIASI
   AZIONE DI CUI SOPRA.  IN NESSUN CASO I MEMBRI DI WESTERN DIGITAL
   SARANNO RESPONSABILI DI ALCUN DANNO INDIRETTO, STRAORDINARIO,
   ESEMPLARE, PUNITIVO, SPECIALE, INCIDENTALE O CONSEQUENZIALE (COMPRESA
   LA PERDITA DI DATI, ENTRATE, PROFITTI, UTILIZZO O ALTRI VANTAGGI
   ECONOMICI), COMUNQUE DERIVANTI, ANCHE IN CASO DI VIOLAZIONE O ATTO
   ILLECITO, O SE I MEMBRI DI WESTERN DIGITAL SONO STATI PRECEDENTEMENTE
   AVVISATI DELLA POSSIBILITÀ DI TALI DANNI.

   ACCETTI DI ESSERE IL SOLO RESPONSABILE DI UNA PROTEZIONE ADEGUATA E DEL
   BACKUP DEI DATI E/O DELLE APPARECCHIATURE UTILIZZATE IN RELAZIONE AI
   SERVIZI E NON AVANZERAI PRETESE DI ALCUNA NATURA CONTRO I MEMBRI DI
   WESTERN DIGITAL PER PERDITA DI DATI, MANCATE PRESTAZIONI, RITARDI NEL
   LAVORO, O PERDITA DI PROFITTI DERIVANTI DALL’USO O DALL’IMPOSSIBILITÀ
   DI UTILIZZO DEI SERVIZI.

   ACCETTI DI TENERE I MEMBRI DI DIGITAL WESTERN COMPLETAMENTE INDENNI E
   DI NON CITARLI IN GIUDIZIO PER I RECLAMI RELATIVI AI SERVIZI.  SE
   ESISTONO I PRESUPPOSTI PER CUI POTRESTI OTTENERE UN RISARCIMENTO PER I
   DANNI SUBITI (INCLUSA LA VIOLAZIONE DI QUESTI TERMINI DI UTILIZZO) DA
   QUALSIASI MEMBRO DI WESTERN DIGITAL IN CONNESSIONE CON I SERVIZI O CON
   QUESTE CONDIZIONI D’USO, ACCETTI COME RIMEDIO ESCLUSIVO IL RISARCIMENTO
   PARZIALE DA PARTE DI WESTERN DIGITAL FINO A UN IMPORTO PARI A QUANTO DA
   TE PAGATO PER I SERVIZI DEL MESE DURANTE IL QUALE LA VIOLAZIONE SI È
   VERIFICATA (O FINO A 100,00 USD SE I RECLAMI SI RIFERISCONO A UN
   QUALSIASI SERVIZIO GRATUITO).

   QUESTE LIMITAZIONI RELATIVE ALLA RESPONSABILITÀ DEI MEMBRI DI WESTERN
   DIGITAL SI APPLICANO INDIPENDENTEMENTE DAL FATTO CHE WESTERN DIGITAL
   SIA STATA O MENO INFORMATA O AVREBBE DOVUTO ESSERE A CONOSCENZA DELLA
   POSSIBILITÀ DI TALI EVENTUALI PERDITE.  SOME STATES DO NOT ALLOW THE
   EXCLUSION OR LIMITATION OF INCIDENTAL OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES, SO THE
   ABOVE EXCLUSIONS OR LIMITATIONS MAY NOT APPLY TO YOU.POICHÉ ALCUNE
   GIURISDIZIONI NON CONSENTONO L’ESCLUSIONE O LA LIMITAZIONE DELLA
   RESPONSABILITÀ PER DANNI CONSEQUENZIALI O ACCIDENTALI, LA LIMITAZIONE
   DI CUI SOPRA PUÒ NON ESSERE APPLICABILE A TE.

Dichiarazione di Esclusione di Responsabilità

   RICONOSCI ESPRESSAMENTE CHE L’UTILIZZO DEI SERVIZI È A TUO ESCLUSIVO
   RISCHIO E CHE L’INTERO RISCHIO RELATIVO ALLA QUALITÀ SODDISFACENTE,
   ALLE PRESTAZIONI, ALL'ACCURATEZZA E ALLO SVOLGIMENTO DEL LAVORO È A TUO
   CARICO.  TUTTE LE PARTI DEI SERVIZI SONO FORNITE DA WESTERN DIGITAL
   SOLO SU BASE "COSÌ COM'È", "CON TUTTI I DIFETTI" E "COME DISPONIBILI",
   CON TUTTI I DIFETTI E SENZA GARANZIA DI ALCUN TIPO.  CON IL PRESENTE
   ACCORDO, WESTERN DIGITAL ESCLUDE ESPRESSAMENTE TUTTE LE DICHIARAZIONI,
   GARANZIE E CONDIZIONI RELATIVE AI SERVIZI (INCLUSI L’USO, LE
   PRESTAZIONI E IL SUPPORTO), ESPLICITE, IMPLICITE, LEGALI O DI ALTRO
   TIPO, INCLUSE EVENTUALI GARANZIE IMPLICITE DI IDONEITÀ PER UN
   PARTICOLARE SCOPO, COMMERCIABILITÀ, TITOLO E NON‑VIOLAZIONE.  WESTERN
   DIGITAL NON FORNISCE ALCUNA GARANZIA PER QUANTO RIGUARDA LA PRECISIONE
   DEI RISULTATI O L’OUTPUT CHE DERIVANO DAI SERVIZI.

Politica sul Copyright e Reclami per Violazione del Copyright DMCA

   Ai sensi del Titolo 17, Codice degli Stati Uniti, Sezione 512 (c), è
   prassi di Western Digital rispondere alle notifiche di presunte
   violazioni conformi al Digital Millennium Copyright Act e ad altre
   leggi applicabili sulla proprietà intellettuale.  Rispettiamo la
   proprietà intellettuale degli altri.  Se ritieni che il tuo lavoro sia
   stato copiato in modo tale da costituire una violazione del copyright,
   utilizza le procedure indicate nella nostra Politica sul Copyright.

Politica di Utilizzo del Marchio

   I marchi, i loghi e i marchi di servizio (collettivamente, “Marchi”)
   che appaiono nei nostri beni e servizi sono di proprietà di Western
   Digital o di terze parti.  I Marchi di Western Digital possono essere
   utilizzati solo in circostanze limitate e previa approvazione scritta
   di Western Digital.  Le approvazioni sono fornite caso per caso.  Tutti
   gli usi approvati devono essere strettamente conformi alle nostre Linee
   guida sull’Uso del Marchio e del Logo.  Clicca qui per un elenco non
   esaustivo dei Marchi di Western Digital.

Diritti Limitati del Governo degli Stati Uniti

   I Servizi sono forniti con "DIRITTI LIMITATI".  L'uso, la duplicazione
   o la divulgazione da parte del governo degli Stati Uniti sono soggetti
   a restrizioni come stabilito nelle norme FAR52.227-14 e
   DFAR252.227-7013 e successive, la/le legge/i successive o qualsiasi
   altra legge e regolamento applicabile.  L’uso dei Servizi da parte del
   governo degli Stati Uniti costituisce un riconoscimento dei nostri
   diritti di proprietà su di essi.

Scelta della legge; Separabilità

   Qualsiasi reclamo derivante da o relativo ai Servizi, incluso l’uso (o
   l’impossibilità di utilizzo) dei Servizi, è regolato dalle leggi dello
   Stato della California, indipendentemente da eventuali conflitti fra
   disposizioni di legge.  Accetti di sottoporti alla giurisdizione
   esclusiva dei tribunali statali e federali situati nella contea di
   Santa Clara, in California, per la risoluzione di qualsiasi
   controversia derivante da o relativa al tuo utilizzo dei servizi.  Se
   una qualsiasi disposizione delle presenti Condizioni d’Uso risultasse
   non valida, nulla, o per qualsiasi motivo inapplicabile, tale
   disposizione sarà ritenuta separabile e non pregiudicherà la validità e
   l’applicabilità delle restanti disposizioni delle presenti Condizioni
   d’Uso.

   Gli utenti della California che utilizzano i Servizi hanno diritto a
   ricevere i seguenti avvisi specifici sui diritti dei consumatori:
   L’Unità di Assistenza per i Reclami della Divisione Servizi per i
   Consumatori del Dipartimento per i Consumatori della California può
   essere contattata per iscritto al 1625 North Market Blvd., Suite N 112,
   Sacramento, CA 95834, o telefonicamente al numero (800) 952-5210.

Dichiarazioni Previsionali

   Alcune delle informazioni sui nostri Servizi, inclusi i nostri siti Web
   come investor.wdc.com, possono contenere dichiarazioni previsionali ai
   sensi delle leggi federali sui titoli, incluse dichiarazioni
   riguardanti eventi futuri, i nostri piani operativi o finanziari futuri
   o le nostre prestazioni, la crescita prevista, l’andamento della nostra
   attività e dei mercati in cui operiamo, e altre caratterizzazioni di
   eventi o circostanze futuri.  Tutte le affermazioni che non sono fatti
   storici si basano sulle nostre attuali aspettative e sono soggette a
   una serie di rischi e incertezze che possono far sì che i risultati
   effettivi differiscano in misura rilevante da quelli espressi o
   impliciti nelle dichiarazioni previsionali.  Ulteriori informazioni sui
   rischi e le incertezze che potrebbero influire sulla nostra attività
   sono elencate nei nostri documenti depositati presso la Securities and
   Exchange Commission degli Stati Uniti (la “SEC”) e sono disponibili sul
   sito Web della SEC all’indirizzo www.sec.gov, incluso il nostro ultimo
   report periodico in archivio, a cui puoi far riferimento.  Non dovresti
   fare eccessivo affidamento su queste dichiarazioni previsionali.  Non
   ci assumiamo alcun obbligo di aggiornare o rivedere pubblicamente
   nessuna dichiarazione a carattere previsionale, sia come risultato di
   nuove informazioni, sviluppi futuri o altro, eccetto quanto richiesto
   dalla legge.

Modifiche al Servizio

   Western Digital si riserva il diritto di modificare o interrompere,
   temporaneamente o permanentemente, i Servizi (o parte di essi) o i
   prodotti o servizi ivi descritti, in qualsiasi momento senza
   preavviso.  In caso di risoluzione dei Servizi o parte di essi, Western
   Digital ha l'obbligo di conservare o fornire il Contenuto dell’Utente o
   altri dati.

Contattaci

   In caso di domande, reclami o commenti su queste Condizioni d’uso, se
   si desidera ricevere ulteriori informazioni sui Servizi o contattare in
   altro modo Western Digital di prega di contattarci ai recapiti che si
   trovano sulla nostra pagina Contact Western Digital page.

     * {{unescape(item.title)}}
          + {{anchor.title}}

   Última actualización realizada el 28 de mayo de 2018.

   Estas Condiciones de uso (las presentes «Condiciones de Uso») regulan
   su Uso (tal y como se define a continuación) de los sitios web
   ofrecidos por Western Digital Technologies, Inc. y/o sus afiliadas
   (conjuntamente denominadas «Western Digital», «nosotros» o «nuestro») y
   todo el contenido, las funcionalidades, los materiales, el software y
   la documentación relacionada, así como los servicios disponibles en
   tales sitios web (se hará referencia de forma colectiva a tales sitios
   web, contenido, funcionalidades, materiales, software y documentación
   relacionada, así como a los servicios, como los «Servicios»).

   IMPORTANTE: SE RUEGA LEER CON ATENCIÓN. Si no está de acuerdo con lo
   establecido en las presentes Condiciones de Uso, no tiene autorización
   para Usar los Servicios.

   Para ayudarle a navegar en el documento y encontrar secciones
   específicas de las presentes Condiciones de Uso, le remitimos al índice
   que figura a continuación:

Aceptación de las Condiciones de Uso

   Mediante el Uso (tal y como se define a continuación) de los Servicios,
   usted declara y garantiza que es, al menos, mayor de edad en su
   jurisdicción y que tiene todas las facultades, autorizaciones y
   permisos necesarios para suscribir y obligarse en virtud de las
   presentes Condiciones de Uso; usted reconoce que ha leído y comprendido
   las presentes Condiciones de Uso y acuerda obligarse en virtud de las
   mismas; y usted acuerda cumplir con todas las leyes y los reglamentos
   aplicables en relación con su Uso de los Servicios.

   Si usted Usa los Servicios en nombre de una empresa, organización u
   otra entidad, por «usted» se entenderá que se incluye usted y dicha
   entidad; usted declara y garantiza que es un representante autorizado
   de la entidad con autorización para obligar a la entidad en virtud de
   las presentes Condiciones de Uso y que acepta las presentes Condiciones
   de Uso en nombre de la entidad; y acuerda asimismo que dicha entidad es
   responsable, desde un punto de vista legal y financiero, de su Uso de
   los Servicios, así como del uso de su Cuenta de Usuario (tal y como se
   define a continuación) por parte de otros afiliados a su entidad,
   incluidos cualesquier empleados, agentes o contratistas.

Interpretación

   A los efectos de las presentes Condiciones de Uso, el verbo «Usar» en
   mayúsculas significa acceder, navegar, crear una Cuenta de Usuario (tal
   y como se define a continuación) en los Servicios, así como subir
   contenido o material, descargar contenido o material o de otro modo
   usar los Servicios (y el sustantivo «Uso» y el gerundio «Usando»
   tendrán significados semejantes); los términos «usted» y «suyo» hacen
   referencia a usted como usuario que Usa los Servicios; y se entenderá
   que las palabras «incluye», «incluido» o «incluyendo» van siempre
   seguidas de las palabras «a modo no limitativo».

Enmiendas a las presentes Condiciones de Uso

   PODREMOS, A NUESTRA TOTAL DISCRECIÓN, ENMENDAR LAS PRESENTES
   CONDICIONES de uso EN CUALQUIER MOMENTO MEDIANTE LA ACTUALIZACIÓN DE
   ESTA PÁGINA. SI USTED CONTINÚA USANDO LOS SERVICIOS TRAS UNA ENMIENDA
   DE ESTE TIPO, QUEDARÁ OBLIGADO EN VIRTUD DE tal enmienda. POR TANTO,
   DEBE VISITAR LA PÁGINA PERIÓDICAMENTE PARA VERIFICAR LAS PRESENTES
   CONDICIONES DE USO. SI ALGUNO DE LOS CAMBIOS LE RESULTA INACEPTABLE, no
   se le permite continuar Usando LOS SERVICIOS.

Condiciones adicionales

   Ofrecemos una amplia gama de productos y servicios, incluidos productos
   y servicios de software. Algunos productos o servicios disponibles en
   nuestros sitios web pueden estar sujetos a otras condiciones o a
   condiciones adicionales («Condiciones Adicionales»). Se pondrán a
   disposición tales Condiciones Adicionales con los productos o servicios
   pertinentes, ya sea publicándose directamente en el sitio web de dichos
   productos o servicios o presentándose como un conjunto de condiciones
   independientes en el momento de la compra, descarga, el acceso, la
   navegación o el uso de tales productos o servicios. En la medida en que
   las presentes Condiciones de Uso se apliquen a tales productos o
   servicios (p. ej., porque se ponen a disposición en nuestros sitios
   web) pero sean incoherentes con las Condiciones Adicionales aplicables
   a dichos productos o servicios, tales Condiciones Adicionales
   prevalecerán sobre las disposiciones incoherentes de las presentes
   Condiciones de Uso y se aplicarán respecto a tales productos o
   servicios.

Propiedad

   Los Servicios, incluido su «aspecto general» (look and feel) (p. ej.,
   el texto, los gráficos, las imágenes y los logos), el contenido de
   propiedad exclusiva, la información y otros materiales contenidos en
   los Servicios están protegidos por ley, incluidas las leyes de Estados
   Unidos sobre propiedad intelectual, derechos de autor, marcas
   comerciales y otras leyes, así como por las disposiciones de tratados
   internacionales. Usted reconoce que Western Digital y/o nuestros
   otorgantes de licencias son los propietarios de todos los derechos y la
   titularidad en relación con los Servicios (con inclusión de la
   totalidad de las patentes, derechos de autor, secretos comerciales,
   marcas comerciales, demostraciones técnicas (show-how), y conocimientos
   técnicos (know-how), y todos y cualesquier otros derechos de propiedad
   intelectual inherentes a los mismos o relacionados con los mismos), y
   usted acuerda no tomar ninguna medida que resulte incoherente con tales
   derechos relativos a la propiedad.

Restricciones del Uso

   Salvo autorización expresa en el presente, ninguno de los Servicios
   podrá someterse a copia, reproducción, distribución, nueva publicación,
   descarga, exhibición, publicación, o transmisión de ninguna forma ni
   por ningún medio, incluidos medios electrónicos y mecánicos, ni
   mediante fotocopia, grabación ni de ningún otro modo, sin la
   autorización previa por escrito emitida por nosotros o por el
   propietario de los derechos de autor. Con sujeción a que usted cumpla
   con las presentes Condiciones de Uso, Western Digital, por el presente,
   le concede un derecho limitado no exclusivo de acceder y usar los
   materiales incluidos en los Servicios, en cada caso para uso personal y
   no comercial exclusivamente, y siempre que usted no modifique, revenda
   ni dé ningún uso comercial a dichos materiales. Este permiso terminará
   automáticamente si usted incumple cualquiera de las presentes
   Condiciones de Uso. Tras la terminación, usted debe destruir
   inmediatamente todos los materiales obtenidos de los Servicios.

   Usted acuerda que no quitará ni modificará ninguna notificación o
   leyenda sobre la restricción de derechos en relación con derechos de
   autor o derechos de propiedad exclusiva incluidas en los Servicios; que
   no descompilará ni desensamblará, ni compilará ni ensamblará de manera
   inversa, ni aplicará ninguna otra técnica de ingeniería inversa a
   ninguno de los Servicios, ninguna actualización de los mismos ni
   ninguna parte de los mismos (salvo y únicamente en la medida en que
   cualquiera de las restricciones antes mencionadas esté prohibida por
   ley); que no usará ningún medio para averiguar ningún tipo de código
   fuente confidencial de ninguna porción de los Servicios; y que no
   eludirá ninguna funcionalidad que controle el acceso a los Servicios o
   que proteja los Servicios de alguna otra manera.

   Usted también conviene en que no Usará los Servicios de ningún modo con
   el fin de hostigar, acosar, molestar, amenazar, difamar, infringir ni
   de otro modo violar los derechos de cualquier otra parte, ni subir,
   publicar, enviar por correo electrónico, transmitir ni de otro modo
   permitir el acceso a cualquier contenido que sea ilegítimo, peligroso,
   amenazador, abusivo, atormentador, enrevesado, difamatorio, vulgar,
   obsceno, calumniante, invasivo de la privacidad de otra persona, que
   incite al odio u objetable desde un punto de vista de origen racial,
   étnico o de otro. Usted conviene en que Western Digital no asume
   ninguna responsabilidad respecto de su Uso de los Servicios del modo
   antes descrito, ni respecto de ningún tipo de mensajes o transmisiones
   atormentadores, amenazadores, difamatorios, ofensivos o ilegales que
   usted pudiera recibir como consecuencia de su Uso de los Servicios.
   Usted acuerda que no infringirá, de forma intencional o no intencional,
   ninguna ley aplicable en relación con su Uso de los Servicios. Si
   incumple alguna de las disposiciones precedentes, podrá tener que
   responder en tribunales y pagar daños y perjuicios.

   Usted reconoce que, salvo en la medida aquí expresamente establecida,
   nada de lo dispuesto en las presentes Condiciones de Uso se
   interpretará como que le otorga a usted una licencia respecto de
   patentes u otros derechos de propiedad intelectual nuestros o de
   nuestros otorgantes de licencias, ya sea en virtud del principio de
   estoppel (impedimento), por inferencia, o de otro modo, y usted acuerda
   que usted asume la totalidad de la responsabilidad para la obtención de
   tales licencias mediante un acuerdo por escrito por separado. El Uso no
   autorizado de cualquiera de los Servicios puede infringir las leyes de
   derechos de autor, las leyes sobre marcas comerciales, las leyes sobre
   privacidad y publicidad, y las normas y disposiciones legales sobre
   comunicaciones.

Registro de Cuenta y Suscripciones

   Es posible que le solicitemos que registre una cuenta para Usar
   determinadas funcionalidades o secciones de los Servicios (una «Cuenta
   de Usuario»). Puede crear una Cuenta de Usuario completando el proceso
   de registro establecido en la sección aplicable de los Servicios. Usted
   tiene la responsabilidad de que la información sobre la cuenta que
   facilite sea exacta y esté actualizada.

   Usted es el único usuario autorizado de su Cuenta de Usuario. Usted
   tiene la responsabilidad de mantener la confidencialidad de cualquier
   contraseña y número de cuenta proporcionado por usted o por Western
   Digital para el Uso de los Servicios.  Usted asume la responsabilidad
   exclusiva respecto de todas las actividades realizadas con su Cuenta de
   Usuario. Es posible que Western Digital no tenga control sobre el uso
   de su Cuenta de Usuario o de la Cuenta de Usuario de cualquier otro
   usuario, y Western Digital expresamente rechaza cualquier
   responsabilidad derivada de tales usos.

Prácticas de Privacidad

   El Uso, por su parte, de los Servicios también está sujeto a nuestra
   Política de Privacidad, que está disponible para consulta si se hace
   clic aquí (la «Política de privacidad»). Le rogamos que lea
   detenidamente la Política de privacidad para obtener más información
   sobre nuestras prácticas de privacidad.

Concesión de Licencia respecto al Contenido de Usuario

   Como condición para el Uso, por parte de usted, de los Servicios, al
   publicar, subir, compartir, enviar, exhibir, o transmitir cualquier
   contenido u otros materiales a través de los Servicios («Su
   Contenido»), usted concede a Western Digital una licencia no exclusiva,
   a perpetuidad, irrevocable, libre de regalías, aplicable a nivel
   internacional, transferible y plenamente sublicenciable (lo cual
   incluye para otros usuarios de los Servicios) para acceder, utilizar,
   reproducir, transmitir, exhibir, publicar, distribuir, presentar en
   público, modificar, adaptar y crear obras derivadas de Su Contenido y
   para incorporar Su Contenido en otras obras en cualquier formato o
   medio conocido en el presente o que se cree en el futuro con todos y
   cualesquier fines comerciales o no comerciales. Usted declara y
   garantiza: que usted es el propietario o que, de otro modo, tiene el
   control sobre todos los derechos relativos a Su Contenido, incluidos
   todos los derechos de autor; que Su Contenido es exacto y no infringe
   ni se apropia indebidamente de los derechos de propiedad intelectual de
   ningún tercero, incluidos los derechos de publicidad y privacidad; y
   que el uso de Su Contenido no infringe las presentes Condiciones de Uso
   ni la Política de privacidad y no causará ningún daño a ninguna persona
   ni entidad. No asumimos ningún tipo de responsabilidad respecto de
   ningún contenido ni otros materiales enviados o publicados por medio de
   los Servicios, ya sea por usted o por un tercero. En la medida en que
   Su Contenido incluya imágenes, usted declara y garantiza asimismo que
   cada una de las personas que aparecen en tales imágenes, si
   corresponde, ha dado su consentimiento para el uso de las imágenes, tal
   y como se dispone en las presentes Condiciones de Uso.

   NOS RESERVAMOS EL DERECHO DE PRESELECCIONAR, RECHAZAR, MODIFICAR O
   ELIMINAR CUALQUIER CONTENIDO O MATERIAL EN LOS SERVICIOS POR CUALQUIER
   MOTIVO, LO CUAL INCLUYE LOS CASOS EN QUE DETERMINEMOS, A NUESTRA
   EXCLUSIVA DISCRECIÓN, que dicho contenido O MATERIAL INFRINGE ALGUNA
   LEY O DERECHO DE ALGUNA PERSONA, que INFRINGE LOS DERECHOS DE ALGUNA
   PERSONA O que NO ES APROPIADO, POR ALGÚN OTRO MOTIVO,  PARA SU
   PUBLICACIÓN EN LOS SERVICIOS.

Acceso desde fuera de los Estados Unidos

   Nosotros, desde nuestras oficinas situadas en Estados Unidos, llevamos
   el control y operamos los Servicios. No realizamos ninguna declaración
   en el sentido de que los Servicios son adecuados o están disponibles
   para su Uso en otras zonas geográficas, y se prohíbe el acceso a los
   mismos desde territorios donde su contenido es ilegal.  Quienes decidan
   Usar los Servicios desde otras zonas geográficas lo hacen por
   iniciativa propia y son responsables del cumplimiento de las leyes
   locales aplicables. Si usted Usa los Servicios desde otras zonas
   geográficas, usted es responsable del cumplimiento de las leyes locales
   aplicables, incluidas las normas de exportación e importación de otros
   países. Usted reconoce que algunos o todos los Servicios, con inclusión
   de los materiales incluidos en los mismos, pueden estar sujetos a las
   Leyes y Reglamentos sobre Administración de Exportaciones de los
   Estados Unidos, los Reglamentos sobre Sanciones Económicas de la
   Oficina de Control de Activos Extranjeros (OFAC, por sus siglas en
   inglés) del Departamento del Tesoro de los Estados Unidos, así como a
   leyes sobre exportaciones de otros países y que queda prohibido el
   desvío de los Servicios en contravención de la legislación de los
   Estados Unidos o de otros países aplicables. Usted conviene en que
   ninguno de los Servicios ni ningún producto directo derivado de los
   mismos se está adquiriendo o será adquirido con el fin de enviarlo,
   transferirlo, exportarlo o reexportarlo, directa o indirectamente, a
   países embargados o proscritos o a sus ciudadanos, y que los mismos no
   se usarán con fines de actividades nucleares ni proyectos de armas
   químicas o biológicas o de misiles, salvo que así esté autorizado
   específicamente por el gobierno de los Estados Unidos (u otro gobierno
   pertinente) con tales fines. Al acceder al sitio web, usted declara y
   garantiza que usted no es ciudadano ni residente, y que no tiene su
   residencia habitual, en ningún país o región que esté sujeta a embargo
   por el gobierno de los Estados Unidos, y que usted no figura como parte
   sancionada en la lista de ciudadanos especialmente designados y
   personas bloqueadas mantenida por la OFAC. Usted acuerda cumplir
   estrictamente con todas las leyes sobre exportaciones, reexportaciones
   e importaciones y asume la totalidad de la responsabilidad respecto de
   la obtención de licencias para la exportación, reexportación o
   importación, según se le exija.

Enlaces a Sitios y Aplicaciones de Terceros

   Los Servicios pueden incluir enlaces a sitios web o aplicaciones de
   terceros. Sin embargo, tenga en cuenta que no somos responsables
   respecto de estos sitios web o aplicaciones, y que no tenemos control
   sobre los mismos. Western Digital no realiza ninguna declaración
   respecto de ningún otro sitio web o aplicación a la que usted acceda a
   través de los Servicios. Cuando acceda a un sitio web o una aplicación
   de un tercero, aunque en ellos aparezca el logo de la empresa Western
   Digital, a usted corresponderá tomar precauciones para asegurarse de
   que está de acuerdo con las condiciones de uso de tal sitio web o
   aplicación y que tal sitio web o aplicación no contienen virus,
   gusanos, troyanos, ni otros  elementos de naturaleza destructiva.
   Usted acuerda que, en ninguna circunstancia y de ninguna forma, se
   considerará que Western Digital es responsable respecto de ningún sitio
   web o aplicación de terceros.

Limitación de la Responsabilidad

   EN LA MAYOR MEDIDA PERMITIDA POR LA LEGISLACIÓN APLICABLE, NOSOTROS Y
   NUESTROS ADMINISTRADORES, DIRECTIVOS, EMPLEADOS Y CONSULTORES
   (CONJUNTAMENTE, «LAS PARTES DE WESTERN DIGITAL»)NO ASUMIREMOS
   RESPONSABILIDAD ALGUNA RESPECTO ANINGÚN TIPO DE DAÑOS SUFRIDOS COMO
   CONSECUENCIA DEL USO, MODIFICACIÓN, CONTRIBUCIÓN, COPIA,DISTRIBUCIÓN O
   DESCARGA DE LOS SERVICIOS O POR LA INCAPACIDAD DE LLEVAR A CABO LO
   ANTES DESCRITO. EN NINGÚN CASO SE CONSIDERARÁ QUE LAS PARTES DE WESTERN
   DIGITAL SON RESPONSABLES RESPECTO DE NINGÚN TIPO DE DAÑOS Y PERJUICIOS
   INDIRECTOS, EXTRAORDINARIOS, EJEMPLARES,PUNITIVOS, CUANTIFICABLES,
   SUPLEMENTARIOS O EMERGENTES (INCLUIDA LAPÉRDIDA DE DATOS, BENEFICIOS,
   INGRESOS, USO O DE OTRA VENTAJA ECONÓMICA), SIN IMPORTAR LA FORMA ENQUE
   HAYAN SURGIDO, YA SEA POR INCUMPLIMIENTO CONTRACTUAL O COMO UN ACTO
   ILÍCITO CIVIL, AUN CUANDO SE HAYA AVISADO A LAS PARTES DE WESTERN
   DIGITAL CON ANTERIORIDAD SOBRE LA POSIBILIDAD DE DICHOS DAÑOS Y
   PERJUICIOS.

   USTED ACUERDA QUE USTED ASUME LA TOTALIDAD DE LA RESPONSABILIDAD
   RESPECTO DE LA PROTECCIÓN ADECUADA Y DE LA REALIZACIÓN DE COPIAS DE
   SEGURIDAD DE LOS DATOS Y/O LOS EQUIPOS USADOS EN RELACIÓNCON LOS
   SERVICIOS Y QUE NO PRESENTARÁ NINGUNA RECLAMACIÓN CONTRALAS PARTES DE
   WESTERN DIGITAL POR DATOS PERDIDOS, RESULTADOSINEXACTOS, DEMORAS EN
   TRABAJOS, O PÉRDIDA DE BENEFICIOS DIMANANTES DEL USO DE LOS SERVICIOS,
   O DE LA IMPOSIBILIDAD DE USAR TALES SERVICIOS.

   USTED CONVIENE EN MANTENER A LAS PARTES DE WESTERN DIGITAL PLENAMENTE
   EXENTAS DE CUALESQUIER RECLAMACIONES, Y SE COMPROMETE A NO DEMANDAR A
   LAS PARTES DEWESTERN DIGITAL, RESPECTO DE CUALESQUIER RECLAMACIONES
   RELACIONADAS CONLOS SERVICIOS.SI TIENE ALGÚN FUNDAMENTO PARA
   RECUPERARDAÑOS Y PERJUICIOS (INCLUIDOEL INCUMPLIMIENTO DELAS PRESENTES
   CONDICIONES DE USO) DE CUALESQUIER PARTES DE WESTERN DIGITALEN RELACIÓN
   CON LOS SERVICIOS O LAS PRESENTES CONDICIONES DE USO, USTED CONVIENE EN
   QUE SU RECURSO JURÍDICO EXCLUSIVO ES RECUPERAR DAÑOS Y PERJUICIOS DE
   LAS PARTES DE WESTERN DIGITAL POR UNA CUANTÍA MÁXIMA EQUIVALENTE A LA
   TARIFA POR LOS SERVICIOS CORRESPONDIENTE AL MES EN EL QUE OCURRIÓEL
   INCUMPLIMIENTO (O POR UNA CUANTÍA MÁXIMA DE 100,00 USDSI LAS DEMANDAS
   ESTÁN RELACIONADAS CON SERVICIOS GRATUITOS).

   ESTAS LIMITACIONES DE LA RESPONSABILIDAD DE LAS PARTES DE WESTERN
   DIGITAL SE APLICARÁNINDEPENDIENTEMENTE DE QUE SE HAYA ASESORADO A
   WESTERN DIGITAL, ODE QUE WESTERN DIGITAL TUVIERA QUE HABER TENIDO
   CONOCIMIENTO SOBRE LA POSIBILIDADDE TALES PÉRDIDAS. ALGUNOS ESTADOS NO
   PERMITEN LA EXCLUSIÓN O LIMITACIÓN DE DAÑOS Y PERJUICIOS CUANTIFICABLES
   O SUPLEMENTARIOS, POR TANTO, CABE LA POSIBILIDAD DE QUE LAS EXCLUSIONES
   ANTESDESCRITAS NO SE LE APLIQUEN.

Declaración de exención de responsabilidad

   USTED RECONOCE EXPRESAMENTE QUE USTED CORRE CON EL RIESGO DEL USO DE
   LOS SERVICIOSY QUE A USTED LE CORRESPONDE ASUMIR LA TOTALIDAD DEL
   RIESGOEN RELACIÓN CON LA CALIDAD SATISFACTORIA, EL RENDIMIENTO, LA
   EXACTITUD Y EL ESFUERZO.TODAS LAS PARTES DE LOS SERVICIOS SON
   PROPORCIONADASPOR WESTERN DIGITAL EXCLUSIVAMENTE CONFORMEA LAS
   SIGUIENTES DESCRIPCIONES: «TAL CUAL ESTÁ», «CON TODOS LOS DEFECTOS» Y
   «SEGÚN ESTÁ DISPONIBLE», CON TODOS LOS DEFECTOS Y SIN NINGÚN TIPODE
   GARANTÍA. WESTERNDIGITAL POR EL PRESENTE RECHAZA CUALESQUIER
   DECLARACIONES, GARANTÍAS, Y CONDICIONES CON RESPECTO A LOS
   SERVICIOS(INCLUIDO EL USO, FUNCIONAMIENTO Y SOPORTE DE LOS MISMOS), YA
   SEAN EXPLÍCITAS O IMPLÍCITAS, LEGALES O DE OTROTIPO, INCLUIDAS
   CUALESQUIER GARANTÍAS IMPLÍCITAS DE IDONEIDAD PARA UN FIN PARTICULAR,
   COMERCIABILIDAD, TÍTULO Y NO INCUMPLIMIENTO.WESTERN DIGITAL NO REALIZA
   DECLARACIONES DE GARANTÍA CON RESPECTO ALA EXACTITUD DE LOS RESULTADOS
   NI DE LOSPRODUCTOS OBTENIDOS DE LOS SERVICIOS.

Política de Derechos de Autor y Demandas por Infracción de Derechos de Autor
en virtud de DMCA

   De conformidad con el título 17, artículo 512(c), del Código de los
   Estados Unidos, la política de Western Digital consiste en responder a
   notificaciones sobre presuntas infracciones que cumplen con la Ley
   «Digital Millennium Copyright Act» y otras leyes de propiedad
   intelectual aplicables. Respetamos la propiedad intelectual de los
   demás. Si usted cree que su trabajo se ha copiado de una manera que
   representa una violación de los derechos de autor, siga los pasos
   establecidos en nuestra Política de derechos de autor.

Política de Uso de Marcas Comerciales

   Las marcas comerciales, logos, y marcas de servicio (conjuntamente, las
   «Marcas») que se muestran cuando se suministran nuestros bienes y
   servicios son propiedad de Western Digital o de terceros. Las Marcas de
   Western Digital podrán utilizarse solamente en circunstancias limitadas
   y con la autorización previa por escrito de Western Digital. Las
   autorizaciones se proporcionan caso por caso. Todos los usos
   autorizados deben observar estrictamente nuestras Directrices de Uso de
   Marcas Comerciales y Logos.  Haga clic aquí para obtener una lista no
   exhaustiva de las Marcas de Western Digital.

Derechos Restringidos del Gobierno de los Estados Unidos

   Los Servicios se suministran con «DERECHOS RESTRINGIDOS». El Uso, la
   duplicación o la divulgación por el gobierno de los Estados Unidos
   están sujetos a restricciones tal y como se establece en FAR52.227-14 y
   DFAR252.227-7013 et seq., su(s) sucesora(s), o cualesquier otras leyes
   y reglamentos aplicables. El Uso de los Servicios por parte del
   gobierno de los Estados Unidos constituye el reconocimiento de nuestros
   derechos de propiedad exclusiva sobre los mismos.

Derecho Elegido; Divisibilidad

   Cualquier reclamación dimanante de los Servicios o relacionada con los
   Servicios, incluido el Uso de (o la imposibilidad de Usar) los
   Servicios, estará regida por las leyes del Estado de California, sin
   tener en cuenta los principios sobre conflictos de leyes.  Usted
   acuerda someterse a la jurisdicción exclusiva del estado y los
   tribunales federales situados en el Condado de Santa Clara, California,
   para la resolución de todas y cualesquier controversias derivadas del
   Uso de los Servicios o relacionadas con los mismos. Si se determina que
   alguna disposición de las presentes Condiciones de Uso es inválida,
   nula o inexigible por cualquier motivo, tal disposición se considerará
   divisible del resto y no afectará la validez y exigibilidad de las
   demás disposiciones de las presentes Condiciones de Uso.

   Los usuarios de los Servicios con sede en California tienen derecho a
   recibir la siguiente notificación sobre derechos de consumidores
   específicos: Se puede contactar por escrito con la Unidad de Asistencia
   en caso de Quejas (Complaint Assistance Unit) de la División de
   Servicios a los Consumidores (Division of Consumer Services) del
   Departamento de California para Asuntos de Consumidores (California
   Department of Consumer Affairs) en 1625 North Market Blvd., Suite N
   112, Sacramento, CA 95834, o por teléfono: (800) 952-5210.

Declaraciones con Miras al Futuro

   Cierta información recogida en nuestros Servicios, incluidos nuestros
   sitios web, tales como investor.wdc.com, pueden contener declaraciones
   con miras al futuro según se definen en las leyes federales sobre
   valores; esto incluye declaraciones sobre acontecimientos futuros,
   nuestros planes o rendimiento operativo o financiero futuro, nuestro
   crecimiento anticipado, tendencias en nuestras actividades comerciales
   y los mercados en los que operamos y otras caracterizaciones de eventos
   o circunstancias de futuro. Todas las declaraciones que no son hechos
   históricos se basan en nuestras expectativas actuales y están sujetas a
   una serie de riesgos e incertidumbres que pueden hacer que los
   resultados reales difieran significativamente de aquellos expresados
   explícita o implícitamente en las declaraciones con miras al futuro. Se
   puede obtener más información sobre los riesgos e incertidumbres que
   pueden afectar a nuestras actividades comerciales en los informes que
   hemos presentado ante la Comisión Oficial del Mercado de Valores de
   Estados Unidos (Securities and Exchange Commission o «SEC») que están
   disponibles en el sitio web de la SEC, www.sec.gov. Estos informes
   incluyen nuestro informe periódico más recientemente presentado, al
   cual le remitimos específicamente. No debe basarse excesivamente en
   estas declaraciones con miras al futuro. No asumimos ninguna obligación
   de actualizar ni de revisar públicamente cualquier declaración con
   miras al futuro, ya sea como consecuencia de información nueva,
   desarrollos futuros o por otros motivos, salvo que la ley así lo exija.

Modificaciones a los Servicios

   Western Digital se reserva el derecho de cambiar o interrumpir, de
   forma temporal o permanente, los Servicios (o cualquier parte de los
   mismos), o los productos o servicios descritos en los mismos, en
   cualquier momento, sin previo aviso. Tras la terminación de los
   Servicios o de cualquier parte de los mismos, Western Digital no tendrá
   ninguna obligación de mantener ni de proporcionar Su Contenido ni otros
   datos.

Contacto

   Si tiene alguna pregunta, queja o comentario sobre las presentes
   Condiciones de Uso, si desea obtener más información sobre los
   Servicios o si quiere ponerse en contacto con Western Digital por algún
   otro motivo, póngase en contacto con nosotros por medio de la
   información que aparece en nuestra página de Contacto con Western
   Digital.

     * {{unescape(item.title)}}
          + {{anchor.title}}

   Ostatnia aktualizacja z dnia 28 maja 2018 r.

   Niniejsze Warunki Korzystania (dalej zwane „Warunkami Korzystania”)
   regulują sposób korzystania (zdefiniowany poniżej) ze stron
   internetowych oferowanych przez Western Digital Technologies, Inc. oraz
   jej spółki stowarzyszone (zbiorczo zwane „Western Digital,” „my,” lub
   „nasze”), a także z treści, funkcji, materiałów, oprogramowania oraz
   powiązanej dokumentacji, jak również usług dostępnych na wspomnianych
   stronach (przy czym wspomniane strony internetowe, treść, funkcje,
   materiały, oprogramowanie i powiązana dokumentacja, a także usługi
   zbiorczo zwane są „Usługami”).

   WAŻNE – NALEŻY UWAŻNIE PRZECZYTAĆ – W przypadku niewyrażenia zgody na
   niniejsze Warunki Korzystania, użytkownik nie ma uprawnień do
   korzystania z Usług.

   Aby pomóc użytkownikowi w sprawnej nawigacji i odnajdywaniu
   poszczególnych punktów niniejszych Warunków Korzystania, należy
   zapoznać się ze spisem treści zamieszczonym poniżej:

Akceptacja Warunków Korzystania

   W związku z korzystaniem z Usług (zdefiniowanym poniżej): użytkownik
   oświadcza i zapewnia, że osiągnął, co najmniej wiek pełnoletniości w
   swojej jurysdykcji oraz że dysponuje wszelkimi prawami, upoważnieniami
   oraz pozwoleniami niezbędnymi, aby przestrzegać oraz związać się
   warunkami niniejszych Warunków Korzystania; użytkownik potwierdza, że
   zapoznał się i zrozumiał, a także wyraża zgodę na związanie się
   warunkami niniejszych Warunków Korzystania; zgadza się on również
   przestrzegać wszystkich obowiązujących przepisów i regulacji związanych
   z korzystaniem z Usług.

   Jeżeli Użytkownik korzysta z Usług w imieniu firmy, organizacji lub
   innego podmiotu to:  termin „użytkownik” obejmuje użytkownika oraz
   wspomniany podmiot; użytkownik oświadcza i gwarantuje, że jest
   upoważnionym przedstawicielem podmiotu upoważnionym do wiązania
   wspomnianego podmiotu Warunkami Korzystania oraz wyraża zgodę na
   Warunki Korzystania w imieniu tego podmiotu; a także użytkownik zgadza
   się, że wspomniany podmiot jest odpowiedzialny prawnie i finansowo za
   korzystanie z Usług jak również korzystanie z Konta Użytkownika
   (zdefiniowanego poniżej) przez inne podmioty stowarzyszone, w tym ich
   pracowników, pośredników lub kontrahentów.

Interpretacja

   Dla celów związanych z niniejszymi Warunkami Korzystania: pisany wielką
   literą czasownik “Korzystać” oznacza uzyskanie dostępu, przeglądanie,
   utworzenie Konta Użytkownika (zdefiniowanego poniżej), przesyłanie
   treści lub materiałów, pobieranie treści lub materiałów lub korzystanie
   z Usług w dowolny inny sposób (przy czym rzeczownik “Użycie” i
   “Korzystanie” będą miały znaczenia wynikające z siebie); terminy
   “Użytkownika” i “należący do Użytkownika” odnoszą się do Użytkownika
   który korzysta z Usług; z kolei wszelkie odniesienia do słów
   „obejmuje”, „objęty” lub „w tym” uznaje się za słowa, po których
   następuje wyrażenie „bez ograniczeń.”

Zmiany Warunków Korzystania

   W KAŻDEJ CHWILI, WEDŁUG NASZEGO WYŁĄCZNEGO UZNANIA, MOŻEMY ZMIENIAĆ
   TREŚĆ NINIEJSZYCH WARUNKÓW KORZYSTANIA POPRZEZ DOKONYWANIE AKTUALIZACJI
   NINIEJSZEJ STRONY.  JEŻELI W DALSZYM CIĄGU UŻYTKOWNIK BĘDZIE KORZYSTAĆ
   Z USŁUG PO WPROWADZENIU WSPOMNIANYCH ZMIAN, OZNACZA TO, ŻE SĄ ONE DLA
   NIEGO WIĄŻĄCE.  W ZWIĄZKU Z TYM NALEŻY OKRESOWO WCHODZIĆ NA STRONĘ
   CELEM PONOWNEGO ZAPOZNANIA SIĘ Z WARUNKAMI KORZYSTANIA.  GDYBY
   KTÓRAKOLWIEK ZE ZMIAN OKAZAŁA SIĘ NIEAKCEPTOWALNA DLA UŻYTKOWNIKA,
   KORZYSTANIE Z USŁUG JEST ZABRONIONE.

Warunki dodatkowe

   Oferujemy szeroką gamę produktów i usług, w tym produkty oprogramowania
   i usług.  Niektóre produkty lub usługi dostępne na naszych stronach
   internetowych mogą być objęte dodatkowymi warunkami („Warunki
   dodatkowe”).  Dodatkowe zostaną udostępnione wraz ze stosownymi
   produktami lub usługami, w postaci, jaka bezpośrednio jest zamieszczona
   na stronie internetowej wspomnianych produktów i usług lub
   przedstawiona, jako oddzielny zestaw warunków i zasad w momencie
   dokonania zakupu, pobrania, uzyskania dostępu, przeglądania, lub
   korzystania z tych produktów lub usług.  W zakresie, w którym
   wspomniane Warunki Korzystania mają zastosowanie dla tych produktów lub
   usług (np. na przykład z powodu ich udostępnienia na naszych stronach
   internetowych), lecz są rozbieżne z Warunkami Dodatkowymi
   obowiązującymi dla tych produktów lub usług, wspomniane Warunki
   Dodatkowe zastąpią zapisy rozbieżne we wspomnianych Warunkach
   Korzystania i będą miały pierwszeństwo w odniesieniu do produktów i
   usług.

Własność

   Usługi, w tym ich “wygląd i funkcjonalność” (np., tekst, grafika,
   rysunki i logo), treść zastrzeżona, informacje oraz pozostałe materiały
   zawarte w Usługach są chronione prawem, w tym amerykańskimi przepisami
   dotyczącymi własności intelektualnej, praw autorskich, znaków
   towarowych, a także innymi przepisami oraz traktatami
   międzynarodowymi.  Użytkownik potwierdza zatem, że Western Digital
   i/lub nasi licencjodawcy posiadają prawo, tytuł do oraz udział w
   Usługach (w tym w szczególności wszelkich patentach, prawach
   autorskich, tajemnicach handlowych, znakach towarowych, show-how i
   know-how oraz wszystkich pozostałych zawartych w nich lub związanych z
   nimi prawach własności intelektualnej), oraz zgadza się, nie podejmować
   żadnych niezgodnych działań w odniesieniu do wspomnianych tytułów
   własności.

Ograniczenia dotyczące korzystania

   Poza przypadkami wyraźnie wyszczególnionymi w niniejszym dokumencie,
   żadna z Usług nie może być kopiowana, odtwarzana, rozpowszechniana,
   ponownie publikowana, pobierana, wyświetlana, zamieszczana lub
   przesyłana w jakiejkolwiek postaci lub jakimikolwiek środkami, w tym
   również środkami elektronicznymi, mechanicznymi oraz poprzez
   fotokopiowanie, nagrywanie lub żaden inny sposób bez naszego
   uprzedniego pisemnego pozwolenia lub bez uprzedniego pisemnego
   pozwolenia właściciela praw autorskich.  Z zastrzeżeniem przestrzegania
   przez Użytkownika niniejszych Warunków Korzystania, Western Digital
   niniejszym udziela mu ograniczonego niewyłącznego prawa do dostępu i
   korzystania z materiałów zawartych w Usługach, w każdym przypadku do
   celów osobistych, niehandlowych, oraz pod warunkiem, że wspomniane
   materiały nie zostaną zmienione, odsprzedane lub wykorzystane do celów
   handlowych.  Powyższe pozwolenie kończy się automatycznie w przypadku
   naruszenia któregokolwiek z Warunków Korzystania.  W dalszej kolejności
   wszelkie materiały uzyskane z tytułu Usług należy niezwłocznie
   zniszczyć.

   Użytkownik wyraża zgodę, że: nie usunie bądź nie zmieni informacji o
   prawach autorskich bądź też legendy dotyczącej ograniczeń praw
   zawartych lub ujętych w Usługach; nie będzie dokonywał dekompilacji,
   demontażu, wstecznej kompilacji, montażu lub jakichkolwiek innych
   działań wstecznych w odniesieniu do Usług, aktualizacji lub ich części
   (z wyjątkiem oraz tylko i wyłącznie w zakresie, w którym powyższe
   ograniczenie jest zabronione przez obowiązujące przepisy prawa); nie
   będzie wykorzystywać żadnych środków w celu odkrycia poufnego kodu
   źródłowego jakiejkolwiek części Usług; lub nie będzie próbował obejść
   żadnej z funkcjonalności, która kontroluje dostęp do Usług lub
   zabezpiecza je w jakikolwiek inny sposób.

   Ponadto Użytkownik zgadza się w żaden sposób nie wykorzystywać Usług do
   zastraszania, dokonywania nadużyć, prześladowania, grożenia,
   oczerniania, naruszania lub w jakikolwiek inny sposób łamania praw
   drugiej Strony, lub do wgrywania, zamieszczania, wysyłania pocztą
   elektroniczną, transmitowania, bądź w jakikolwiek inny sposób
   udostępniania żadnych treści, które są niezgodne z prawem, krzywdzące,
   stanowiące zagrożenie, obelżywe, szykanujące, pokrętne, zniesławiające,
   wulgarne, nieprzyzwoite, oszczercze, naruszające prywatność, szerzące
   nienawiść, lub niewłaściwe pod względem rasowym, etnicznym lub
   niestosowne w jakikolwiek inny sposób.  Użytkownik zgadza się, że
   Western Digital nie ponosi żadnej odpowiedzialności za takie
   Zastosowanie Usług, ani za jakiekolwiek nękanie, groźby, zniesławienie,
   obraźliwe lub niezgodne z prawem wiadomości lub przekazy, które
   Użytkownik może otrzymać w wyniku Korzystania z Usług.  Ponadto
   użytkownik zgadza się, że w sposób zamierzony lub zamierzony nie będzie
   naruszać obowiązującego prawa w związku z korzystaniem przez siebie z
   Usług.  W przypadku naruszenia któregokolwiek z powyższych ograniczeń
   może on podlegać odpowiedzialności karnej i odszkodowawczej.

   O ile wyraźnie nie określono inaczej, użytkownik przyjmuje do
   wiadomości, że żadnego z niniejszych Warunków Korzystania nie należy
   interpretować, jako przyznanie jakiejkolwiek licencji użytkownikowi do
   naszych patentów lub patentów naszych licencjodawców bądź innych praw
   własności intelektualnej, czy to przez zarzut, domniemanie lub w inny
   sposób i zgadza się, że ponosi wyłączną odpowiedzialność za uzyskanie
   wspomnianych licencji poprzez zawarcie oddzielnej pisemnej umowy.
   Nieuprawnione Korzystanie z Usług może stanowić naruszenie przepisów
   dotyczących praw autorskich, znaków towarowych, przepisów dotyczących
   prywatności oraz jawności oraz przepisów i regulacji prawa
   komunikacyjnego.

Rejestracja konta i subskrypcje

   Możemy wymagać, aby użytkownik dokonał rejestracji konta w celu
   Korzystania z niektórych funkcji lub sekcji Usług („Konto
   Użytkownika”).  Użytkownik może utworzyć Konto Użytkownika poprzez
   realizację procesu rejestracji określonego w odpowiedniej sekcji
   Usług.  Użytkownik ponosi odpowiedzialność za podanie dokładnych i
   bieżących informacji przy zakładaniu konta.

   Użytkownik występuje jako wyłączny uprawniony użytkownik Konta
   Użytkownika.  Ponosi on odpowiedzialność za utrzymanie w tajemnicy
   dowolnego hasła oraz numeru konta przekazanego przez niego lub Western
   Digital w celu Korzystania z Usług.  Użytkownik ponosi pełną
   odpowiedzialność za wszystkie czynności, które są dokonywane na Koncie
   Użytkownika.  Western Digital nie może sprawować kontroli nad
   użytkowaniem Konta Użytkownika lub Konta Użytkownika jakiegokolwiek
   innego użytkownika, przy czym Western Digital wyraźnie zrzeka się
   wszelkiej związanej z tym odpowiedzialności.

Praktyki dotyczące ochrony prywatności

   Korzystanie z Usług podlega również naszemu Oświadczeniu o Ochronie
   Prywatności, które jest dostępne po kliknięciu tutaj („Oświadczenie o
   Ochronie Prywatności”).  Prosimy o zapoznanie się z Oświadczeniem o
   Ochronie Prywatności w celu uzyskania informacji na temat naszych
   praktyk w zakresie ochrony prywatności.

Przyznanie licencji na treść przez Użytkownika

   Jako warunek Korzystania z Usług, zamieszczając, przesyłając,
   publikując, składając, wyświetlając lub transmitując jakiekolwiek
   treści lub inne materiały poprzez Usługi („Treść Użytkownika”),
   użytkownik niniejszym udziela firmie Western Digital niewyłącznej,
   wieczystej, niewyłącznej, nieodpłatnej, ogólnoświatowej, przenoszalnej
   licencji z możliwością udzielenia sublicencji (w szczególności
   pozostałym użytkownikom Usług) na dostęp, korzystanie, odtwarzanie,
   transmitowanie, wyświetlanie, publikowanie, rozpowszechnianie,
   publiczne wykonywanie, publiczne wyświetlanie, wprowadzanie zmian,
   adaptację i tworzenie materiałów opartych na Treści Użytkownika oraz
   włączanie jej w inne dzieła w dowolnym formacie lub na dowolnym
   nośniku, znanym obecnie lub opracowanym w późniejszym czasie do celów
   komercyjnych i niekomercyjnych.  Użytkownik oświadcza i zapewnia, że
   posiada lub w inny sposób kontroluje wszystkie prawa do własnej Treści,
   w tym wszystkie prawa autorskie; że Treść Użytkownika jest dokładna i
   nie narusza lub nie łamie praw własności intelektualnej żadnej strony
   trzeciej, w tym praw do jawności i prywatności; oraz że Treść
   Użytkownika nie narusza niniejszych Warunków Korzystania lub zapisów
   ujętych w Oświadczeniu o Zachowaniu Prywatności i nie będzie powodować
   szkód wobec żadnej osoby lub podmiotu.  Nie bierzemy i nie przyjmujemy
   odpowiedzialności za żadne treści lub materiały przekazane lub
   zamieszczone w ramach Usług przez Użytkownika ani żadną stronę
   trzecią.  W zakresie, w którym Treść Użytkownika zawiera obrazy,
   użytkownik ponadto oświadcza i zapewnia, że każda osoba przedstawiona
   na wspomnianych obrazach, jeżeli takie występują, wyraziła swoją zgodę
   na wykorzystywanie ich wizerunków zgodnie z Warunkami Korzystania.

   ZASTRZEGAMY SOBIE PRAWO DO WSTĘPNEGO PRZEGLĄDU, ODMOWY, MODYFIKACJI LUB
   USUNIĘCIA WSZELKICH TREŚCI LUB MATERIAŁÓW PRZEKAZANYCH W RAMACH USŁUG Z
   DOWOLNEJ PRZYCZYNY, W TYM RÓWNIEŻ, W PRZYPADKU GDY STWIERDZIMY WEDŁUG
   NASZEGO WYŁĄCZNEGO UZNANIA, ŻE WSPOMNIANA TREŚĆ LUB MATERIAŁ NARUSZA
   JAKIEKOKOLWIEK PRZEPISY LUB PRAWA OSÓB, BĄDŹ ŁAMIE PRAWA DOWOLNEJ OSOBY
   LUB TEŻ JEST W INNY SPOSÓB NIEODPOWIEDNI ABY MÓGŁ BYĆ ZAMIESZCZONY W
   USŁUGACH.

Dostęp spoza terytorium Stanów Zjednoczonych

   Usługi są przez nas kontrolowane i obsługiwane z naszych biur w Stanach
   Zjednoczonych.  Nie gwarantujemy, że Usługi mogą być wykorzystywane lub
   że są dostępne do użytku w innych lokalizacjach, ani dostępu do nich z
   terytoriów, gdzie ich treści są nielegalne jest zakazany.  Osoby, które
   zdecydują się Korzystać z Usług z innych lokalizacji, czynią to z
   własnej inicjatywy i są odpowiedzialne za przestrzeganie obowiązujących
   przepisów lokalnych.  W przypadku Korzystania z Usług z innych
   lokalizacji użytkownik ponosi odpowiedzialność za przestrzeganie
   obowiązujących przepisów lokalnych, w tym regulacji dotyczących
   eksportu i importu innych krajów.  Użytkownik przyjmuje do wiadomości,
   że niektóre lub wszystkie Usługi, w tym materiały w nich zawarte, mogą
   podlegać amerykańskim przepisom i regulacjom eksportowym, urzędowi
   kontroli aktywów zagranicznych (United States Treasury Department’s
   Office of Foreign Assets Control - OFAC) w ramach amerykańskiego
   departamentu skarbu, przepisom dotyczącym sankcji gospodarczych jak
   również przepisom eksportowym innych krajów, przy czym przekazywanie
   Usług niezgodnie z prawem Stanów Zjednoczonych lub innych krajów jest
   zabronione.  Użytkownik zgadza się, że żadne z Usług ani żaden ich
   bezpośredni produkt nie jest lub nie zostanie przejęty, wysłany,
   przeniesiony, wyeksportowany lub reeksportowany bezpośrednio lub
   pośrednio do krajów objętych zakazem lub embargiem lub do obywateli
   takich krajów, ani nie będzie wykorzystywany do prowadzenia badań
   związanych z wytwarzaniem materiałów jądrowych, broni chemicznej i
   biologicznej lub projektów związanych z pociskami rakietowymi, chyba że
   uzyska specjalne uprawnienia nadane przez rząd amerykański (lub inny
   właściwy rząd) do realizacji takich celów.  Uzyskując dostęp do strony
   internetowej, użytkownik oświadcza i zapewnia, że nie jest obywatelem
   lub rezydentem jakiegokolwiek kraju lub regionu, na który rząd Stanów
   Zjednoczonych nałożył embargo, jak również, że nie zamieszkuje takiego
   kraju lub regionu tymczasowo i nie figuruje, jako podmiot objęty
   sankcjami na liście specjalnie oznaczonych obywateli i osób
   zablokowanych prowadzonej przez OFAC.  Użytkownik zgadza się ściśle
   przestrzegać wszystkich przepisów dotyczących eksportu i reeksportu a
   także importu i przyjmuje wyłączną odpowiedzialność za uzyskanie
   wymaganych licencji na eksport, reeksport lub import.

Linki do stron internetowych i aplikacji stron trzecich

   Usługi mogą zawierać linki do stron internetowych lub aplikacji stron
   trzecich.  Jednakże należy mieć świadomość, że nie ponosimy
   odpowiedzialności za wspomniane strony lub aplikacje jak również nie
   podlegają one naszej kontroli.  Western Digital nie udziela
   jakichkolwiek gwarancji dotyczących którejkolwiek ze stron
   internetowych lub aplikacji, do których użytkownik może uzyskać dostęp
   poprzez Usługi.  W momencie, w którym Użytkownik uzyska dostęp do
   strony internetowej lub aplikacji strony trzeciej, nawet takiej, na
   której wyświetlać się będzie logo firmowe Western Digital, to w gestii
   użytkownika leży podjęcie odpowiednich środków ostrożności, aby upewnić
   się, że Użytkownik wyraził zgodę na warunki korzystania ze strony
   internetowej lub aplikacji oraz że strona internetowa lub aplikacja nie
   zawiera wirusów, robaków, koni trojańskich ani innych elementów
   mogących uszkodzić komputer.  Użytkownik zgadza się, że Western Digital
   nie ponosi żadnej odpowiedzialności za strony internetowe i aplikacje
   stron trzecich.

Ograniczenie odpowiedzialności

   W MAKSYMALNYM ZAKRESIE DOZWOLONYM PRZEZ PRAWO MY I NASI DYREKTORZY,
   CZŁONKOWIE KIEROWNICTWA, PRACOWNICY I KONSULTANCI (ŁĄCZNIE „STRONY
   WESTERN DIGITAL”) NIE PONOSIMY ODPOWIEDZIALNOŚCI ZA ŻADNE SZKODY
   ODNIESIONE W WYNIKU UŻYTKOWANIA, MODYFIKOWANIA, WNOSZENIA W WKŁADU,
   KOPIOWANIA, ROZPOWSZECHNIANIA LUB POBIERANIA USŁUG LUB NIEMOŻNOŚCI
   REALIZACJI KTÓREJKOLWIEK Z POWYŻSZYCH CZYNNOŚCI.  STRONY WESTERN
   DIGITAL NIE PONOSZĄ ŻADNEJ ODPOWIEDZIALNOŚCI ZA JAKIEKOLWIEK SZKODY
   POŚREDNIE, NADZWYCZAJNE, NAWIĄZKI, ZADOŚĆ UCZYNIENIA, SZKODY SPECJALNE,
   PRZYPADKOWE LUB WYNIKOWE (W TYM Z TYTUŁU UTRATY DANYCH, PRZYCHODU,
   ZYSKÓW, NIEMOŻNOŚCI UŻYTKOWANIA LUB UTRATY INNYCH KORZYŚCI
   EKONOMICZNYCH), BEZ WZGLĘDU NA SPOSÓB ICH POWSTANIA CZY TO W WYNIKU
   NARUSZENIA CZY TEŻ CZYNU NIEDOZWOLONEGO, NAWET JEŻELI STRONY WESTERN
   DIGITAL ZOSTAŁY WCZEŚNIEJ POWIADOMIONE O MOŻLIWOŚCI POWSTANIA TAKICH
   SZKÓD.

   UŻYTKOWNIK ZGADZA SIĘ, ŻE PONOSI WYŁĄCZNĄ ODPOWIEDZIALNOŚĆ ZA
   ODPOWIEDNIĄ OCHRONĘ I TWORZENIE KOPII ZAPASOWYCH DANYCH ORAZ/LUB SPRZĘT
   WYKORZYSTYWANY W ZWIĄZKU Z USŁUGAMI I NIE BĘDZIE WYSUWAĆ ROSZCZEŃ O
   JAKIMKOLWIEK CHARAKTERZE WOBEC STRON WESTERN DIGITAL Z TYTUŁU
   UTRACONYCH DANYCH, UZYSKANIA NIEPRECYZYJNYCH WYNIKÓW, OPÓŹNIEŃ W
   REALIZACJI PRAC LUB UTRACONYCH ZYSKÓW WYNIKAJĄCYCH Z KORZYSTANIA LUB
   NIEMOŻNOŚCI KORZYSTANIA Z USŁUG.

   UŻYTKOWNIK ZGADZA SIE CAŁKOWICIE ZABEZPIECZYĆ STRONY WESTERN DIGITAL
   PRZED ROSZCZENIAMI ZWIĄZANYMI Z USŁUGAMI JAK RÓWNIEŻ ZOBOWIĄZUJE SIĘ
   NIE SKŁADAĆ PRZECIW NIM POZWÓW Z TEGO TYTUŁU.  JEŻELI UŻYTKOWNIK MA
   JAKĄKOLWIEK PODSTAWĘ DO UZYSKANIA ODSZKODOWANIA (W TYM RÓWNIEŻ Z TYTUŁU
   NARUSZENIA NINIEJSZYCH WARUNKÓW KORZYSTANIA) OD STRON WESTERN DIGITAL W
   ZWIĄZKU Z USŁUGAMI LUB NINIEJSZYMI WARUNKAMI KORZYSTANIA, ZGADZA SIĘ
   ON, ŻE JEGO WYŁĄCZNYM ŚRODKIEM ZARADCZYM JEST UZYSKANIE OD STRON
   WESTERN DIGITAL ODSZKODOWANIA DO KWOTY RÓWNEJ OPŁACIE ZA USŁUGI
   UISZCZONEJ PRZEZ UŻYTKOWNIKA ZA MIESIĄC, W KTÓRYM DOSZŁO DO NARUSZENIA
   (LUB DO KWOTY $100.00, JEŻELI ROSZCZENIA ODNOSZĄ SIĘ DO USŁUG
   DARMOWYCH).

   NINIEJSZE OGRANICZENIA DOTYCZĄCE ODPOWIEDZIALNOŚCI STRON WESTERN
   DIGITAL MAJĄ ZASTOSOWANIE NIEZALEŻNIE OD TEGO CZY WESTERN DIGITAL
   ZOSTAŁ POWIADOMIONY LUB POWINIEN BYŁ MIEĆ ŚWIADOMOŚĆ MOŻLIWOŚCI
   POWSTANIA POWYŻSZYCH STRAT.  W NIEKTÓRYCH STANACH WYŁĄCZENIE LUB
   OGRANICZENIE SZKÓD PRZYPADKOWYCH LUB WYNIKOWYCH NIE JEST DOZWOLONE,
   WIĘC POWYŻSZE WYŁĄCZENIA LUB OGRANICZENIA MOGĄ NIE OBOWIĄZYWAĆ W
   STOSUNKU DO UŻYTKOWNIKA.

Disclaimer

   UŻYTKOWNIK WYRAŹNIE PRZYJMUJE DO WIADOMOŚCI, ŻE KORZYSTA Z USŁUG NA
   WŁASNE WYŁĄCZNE RYZYKO ORAZ, ŻE PONOSI CAŁE RYZYKO W ZWIĄZKU Z
   ZADOWALAJĄCĄ JAKOŚCIĄ, WYDAJNOŚCIĄ, DOKŁADNOŚCIĄ I STARANIAMI.
   WSZYSTKIE CZĘŚCI USŁUG SĄ ŚWIADCZONE PRZEZ WESTERN DIGITAL W ICH
   AKTUALNYM STANIE, ZE WSZYSTKIMI SWOIMI WADAMI ORAZ W MIARĘ DOSTĘPNOŚCI,
   BEZ JAKIEJKOLWIEK GWARANCJI.  NINIEJSZYM WESTERN DIGITAL WYRAŹNIE
   WYKLUCZA WSZELKIE OŚWIADCZENIA, GWARANCJE I WARUNKI W ODNIESIENIU DO
   USŁUG (W TYM RÓWNIEŻ KORZYSTANIA Z NICH, A TAKŻE ICH DZIAŁANIA I
   WSPARCIA), NIEZALEŻNIE OD TEGO CZY SĄ ONE WYRAŹNE, DOROZUMIANE,
   USTAWOWE CZY INNEGO RODZAJU, W TYM RÓWNIEŻ WSZELKIE DOMNIEMANE
   GWARANCJE PRZYDATNOŚCI DO OKREŚLONEGO CELU, PRZYDATNOŚCI HANDLOWEJ,
   GWARANCJE DO TYTUŁU PRAWNEGO I DO BRAKU ‑NARUSZENIA.  WESTERN DIGITAL
   NIE UDZIELA ŻADNYCH GWARANCJI W ZAKRESIE DOKŁADNOŚCI WYNIKÓW LUB
   REZULTATÓW OSIĄGANYCH DZIĘKI KORZYSTANIU Z USŁUG.

Polityka w zakresie praw autorskich oraz roszczenia z tytułu naruszenia praw
autorskich na podstawie ustawy DMCA

   Na podstawie Tytułu 17, Kodeksu Stanów Zjednoczonych, Sekcja 512(c),
   polityka Western Digital polega na reagowaniu na zgłoszenia dotyczące
   domniemanych naruszeń, objętych Ustawą Digital Millennium Copyright Act
   i pozostałymi obowiązującymi przepisami dotyczącymi własności
   intelektualnej.  Szanujemy cudzą własność intelektualną.  Jeżeli
   użytkownik uważa, że jego praca została skopiowana w sposób stanowiący
   naruszenie praw autorskich, należy zastosować procedury podane w naszej
   Polityce dotyczącej praw autorskich.

Polityka korzystania ze znaków towarowych

   Znaki towarowe, loga oraz znaki usługowe (łącznie “Znaki”) wyświetlane
   w związku z dostarczanymi przez nas towarami i usługami stanowią
   własność Western Digital lub stron trzecich.  Znaki Western Digital
   mogą być wykorzystywane wyłącznie w ściśle określonych okolicznościach
   oraz za wcześniejszą pisemną zgodą Western Digital.  Zgód udziela się
   na podstawie każdego przypadku z osobna.  Wszystkie zatwierdzone
   wykorzystania muszą być ściśle zgodne z Wytycznymi dotyczącymi
   stosowania znaków towarowych.  W celu wyświetlenia niepełnej listy
   Znaków Western Digital należy kliknąć tutaj.

Ograniczone prawa rządu Stanów Zjednoczonych

   Usługi są chronione “OGRANICZONYMI PRAWAMI".  Wykorzystywanie,
   powielanie lub udostępnianie przez rząd Stanów Zjednoczonych podlega
   ograniczeniom określonymi w dokumentach FAR52.227-14 oraz
   DFAR252.227-7013 i następnych lub w dokumentach je zastępujących, lub
   wszelkimi innym obowiązującym przepisom i regulacjom.  Korzystanie z
   Usług przez rząd Stanów Zjednoczonych stanowi uznanie naszych praw
   własności.

Wybór prawa; Rozdzielność

   Wszelkie roszczenia wynikające lub mające związek z Usługami, w tym
   Korzystanie (lub niemożność Korzystania) z Usług podlegają przepisom
   prawa stanu Kalifornia bez uwzględniania przepisów kolizyjnych.
   Użytkownik wyraża zgodę na poddanie się wyłącznej jurysdykcji stanu i
   sądów federalnych mających siedzibę w hrabstwie Santa Clara, w
   Kalifornii w zakresie rozstrzygania wszelkich sporów wynikłych lub
   mających związek z Korzystaniem z Usług.  Jeżeli dowolne postanowienie
   niniejszych Warunków zostanie uznane za nieprawomocne, nieważne lub z
   jakiegokolwiek powodu niewykonalne, to postanowienie to będzie mieć
   charakter rozłączny i nie będzie mieć wpływu na wykonalność pozostałych
   postanowień niniejszych Warunków Korzystania.

   Użytkownikom Usług z Kalifornii przysługuje prawo do otrzymania
   następującego powiadomienia dotyczącego szczegółowych praw konsumentów:
   Istnieje możliwość kontaktu z działem obsługi roszczeń Wydziału Usług
   Konsumenckich Kalifornijskiego Wydziału Do Spraw Konsumentów pisząc na
   adres 1625 North Market Blvd., Suite N 112, Sacramento, CA 95834, lub
   telefonując pod numer (800) 952-5210.

Oświadczenia dotyczące przyszłości

   Niektóre informacje dotyczące naszych Usług, w tym również te podane na
   naszych stronach internetowych takich jak investor.wdc.com, mogą
   zawierać stwierdzenia dotyczące przyszłości w rozumieniu przepisów
   prawa federalnego dotyczących papierów wartościowych, w tym
   stwierdzenia dotyczące zdarzeń przyszłych, naszych przyszłych działań
   lub planów finansowych bądź też wyników lub przewidywanego wzrostu,
   trendów w naszej branży i na rynkach na których działamy, a także inne
   stwierdzenia dotyczące przyszłych zdarzeń lub okoliczności.  Wszystkie
   stwierdzenia, które nie stanowią danych historycznych opierają się na
   bieżących oczekiwaniach i są związane z pewnym ryzykiem oraz
   niepewnością, które mogą spowodować, że wyniki faktyczne będą istotnie
   różnić się od tych wyrażonych lub dorozumianych w stwierdzeniach
   dotyczących przyszłości.  Więcej informacji na temat ryzyk i
   niepewności, które mogą mieć wpływ na naszą działalność podano w
   dokumentach złożonych przez nas przed amerykańską Komisją ds. Papierów
   Wartościowych i Giełd (United States Securities and Exchange Commission
   - “SEC”) i dostępnych na stronie internetowej SEC pod adresem
   www.sec.gov, w tym również w ostatnim złożonym sprawozdaniu, na które
   należy zwrócić uwagę.  Do tego rodzaju stwierdzeń nie należy
   przywiązywać nadmiernej wagi.  Nie podejmujemy się obowiązku
   publicznego aktualizowania lub weryfikacji żadnych stwierdzeń, czy to z
   tytułu pojawienia się nowych informacji, czy też wystąpienia przyszłych
   zdarzeń lub innych okoliczności, za wyjątkiem sytuacji przewidzianych
   przez przepisy prawa.

Zmiany dotyczące Usług

   Western Digital zastrzega sobie prawo do zmiany bądź zaprzestania
   świadczenia Usług (lub jakiejkolwiek ich części) zarówno tymczasowo jak
   i na stałe, bądź też produktów lub usług opisanych w nich, w dowolnym
   czasie i bez uprzedniego powiadomienia.  Po zakończeniu świadczenia
   Usług lub ich części Western Digital nie ma obowiązku utrzymywania lub
   przekazywania Treści Użytkownika lub innych danych.

Dane kontaktowe

   W przypadku pytań, skarg lub uwag dotyczących niniejszych Warunków
   Korzystania, a także w przypadku zgłoszenia chęci otrzymania bardziej
   szczegółowych informacji dotyczących Usług, lub też kontaktu z Western
   Digital w innych sprawach, należy skorzystać z informacji kontaktowych
   podanych na stronie Skontaktuj się z Western Digital.

     * {{unescape(item.title)}}
          + {{anchor.title}}

   Дата последних изменений 28 мая 2018 г.

   Настоящие Условия пользования («Условия пользования») определяют
   порядок Использование (в определенном ниже смысле) вами веб-сайтов,
   предлагаемых Western Digital Technologies, Inc. и / или аффилированными
   лицами Western Digital Technologies, Inc. (в совокупности «Western
   Digital», «мы», «наш»), а также контент, функции, материалы,
   программное обеспечение, соответствующую документацию и услуги,
   доступные на таких веб-сайтах (такие веб-сайты, контент, функции,
   материалы, программное обеспечение, соответствующая документация,
   услуги – в совокупности «Услуги»).

   ВАЖНАЯ ИНФОРМАЦИЯ – ВНИМАТЕЛЬНО ОЗНАКОМЬТЕСЬ С НЕЮ: если вы не согласны
   с настоящими Условиями пользования, вы не вправе пользоваться Услугами.

   Приведенное ниже оглавление поможет вам ориентироваться в документе и
   находить определенные разделы настоящих Условий пользования:

Принятие Условий пользования

   Пользуясь (в определенном ниже смысле) Услугами, вы заявляете и
   подтверждаете, что достигли совершеннолетнего возраста, определенного
   законодательством вашей страны, и обладаете всеми полномочиями и
   разрешениями, необходимыми для того, чтобы выступать стороной по
   настоящим Условиям пользования и быть связанным ими; вы подтверждаете,
   что прочитали и поняли настоящие Условия пользования и соглашаетесь их
   соблюдать; вы обязуетесь соблюдать законы и правила, применимые в связи
   с использованием вами Услуг.

   Если вы Пользуетесь Услугами от лица компании, организации или другого
   лица, то:  под словом «Вы» подразумеваетесь и вы и такое лицо; вы
   заявляете и подтверждаете, что являетесь уполномоченным представителем
   организации, наделенным полномочиями связывать организацию настоящими
   Условиями пользования и соглашаетесь с настоящими Условиями пользования
   от имени организации; вы соглашаетесь с тем, что такое лицо несет
   юридическую и финансовую ответственность за Пользование вами Услугами,
   а также за использование вашей учетной записи пользователя (в
   определенном ниже смысле) другими лицами, связанными с вашей
   организацией, включая работников, агентов, подрядчиков.

Интерпретация

   Для целей настоящих Условий пользования глагол «Использовать»
   написанный с заглавной буквы означает получать (иметь) доступ,
   просматривать, создавать учетные записи пользователя (в определенном
   ниже смысле), загружать, скачивать контент, материалы и пользоваться
   Услугами иным образом (существительное «Использование» и форма
   «Используя» имеют смысл, логически вытекающей из смысла глагола);
   термины «вы» и «ваш» относятся к вам как пользователю Услуг; слова
   «включает», «включены» или «в том числе» понимаются только в сочетании
   с подразумеваемым «без ограничений».

Изменения в настоящих Условиях пользования

   МЫ ВПРАВЕ НА СВОЕ УСМОТРЕНИЕ ВНОСИТЬ ИЗМЕНЕНИЯ В НАСТОЯЩИЕ УСЛОВИЯ
   ПОЛЬЗОВАНИЯ, ЭТИ ИЗМЕНЕНИЯ СТАНОВЯТСЯ ВИДНЫ ПРИ ОБНОВЛЕНИИ СТРАНИЦЫ.
   ЕСЛИ ВЫ ПРОДОЛЖАЕТЕ ПОЛЬЗОВАТЬСЯ УСЛУГАМИ ПОСЛЕ ТОГО, КАК В НИХ БЫЛИ
   ВНЕСЕНЫ ИЗМЕНЕНИЯ, СЧИТАЕТСЯ, ЧТО ВЫ ОБЯЗУЕТЕСЬ ПОЛЬЗОВАТСЯ ИМИ С
   УЧЕТОМ ИЗМЕНЕНИЯ.  ПОЭТОМУ, РЕКОМЕНДУЕТСЯ ПЕРИОДИЧЕСКИ ПОСЕЩАТЬ ЭТУ
   СТРАНИЦУ, ЧТОБЫ ОТСЛЕЖИВАТЬ ИЗМЕНЕНИЯ В УСЛОВИЯХ ПОЛЬЗОВАНИЯ.  ЕСЛИ ВЫ
   НЕ ПРИНИМАЕТЕ ТЕХ ИЛИ ИНЫХ ИЗМЕНЕНИЙ, ВАМ ЗАПРЕЩАЕТСЯ ПРОДОЛЖАТЬ
   ПОЛЬЗОВАНИЕ УСЛУГАМИ.

Дополнительные условия

   Мы предлагаем широкий спектр продуктов и услуг, включая программные
   продукты и услуги.  На некоторые продукты или услуги, размещенные на
   наших веб-сайтах, распространяются другие или дополнительные условия
   («Дополнительные условия»).  Такие Дополнительные условия прилагаются к
   соответствующим продуктам или услугам, например, размещаются
   непосредственно на веб-сайте с продуктом или услугой или представляются
   в виде отдельного пакета условий при покупке, загрузке, доступе,
   просмотре, использовании соответствующего продукта или услуги.  В
   случае распространения настоящих Условий пользования на эти продукты
   или услуги (например, в связи с тем, что они размещены на наших
   веб-сайтах), но при противоречии между ними и Дополнительными
   условиями, применимыми к этим продуктам или услугам, Дополнительные
   условия заменяют противоречащие положения настоящих Условий пользования
   и распространяются на эти продукты или услуги.

Право собственности

   Услуги, в том числе их «внешнее оформление» (например, текст, графика,
   изображения, логотипы), запатентованный контент, информация и другие
   материалы, содержащиеся в Услугах, охраняются законом, включая законы
   США об интеллектуальной собственности, авторском праве, товарных знаках
   и другими законами, а также попадают под действие международных
   договоров.  Вы соглашаетесь с тем, что все права на Услуги (включая
   патенты, авторские права, коммерческую тайну, товарные знаки, материалы
   наглядного обучения, ноу-хау, а также все другие права интеллектуальной
   собственности на указанное или связанные с указанным) принадлежат
   Western Digital и / или нашим лицензиарам, и вы обязуетесь не
   предпринимать каких-либо действий, нарушающих такие права
   собственности.

Ограничения на пользование

   Если настоящие Условия явным образом не разрешают что-либо из
   перечисленного ниже, запрещается копировать, воспроизводить,
   распространять, переиздавать, загружать, отображать, отправлять,
   размещать, передавать в любой форме и любыми средствами, включая
   электронные, механические, фотокопирование, запись и иное без нашего
   предварительного письменного разрешения или предварительного
   письменного разрешения владельца авторских прав.  При условии
   соблюдения вами настоящих Условий пользования, Western Digital
   настоящим предоставляет вам ограниченное неисключительное право доступа
   и использования материалов, содержащихся в Услугах, однако в каждом
   случае только для личного некоммерческого использования и с запретом на
   модификацию, перепродажу и коммерческое использование таких
   материалов.  Это разрешение автоматически аннулируется в случае
   нарушения вами какого-либо из этих Условий пользования.  После
   аннулирования вы должны немедленно уничтожить все материалы, полученные
   из Услуг.

   Вы обязуетесь не удалять, не изменять уведомления об авторских правах и
   других правах собственности, ограничительных правах, содержащихся или
   включенных в Услуги; не декомпилировать, не дизассемблировать, не
   компилировать обратно, не собирать обратно и не перерабатывать иным
   образом Услуги, обновления Услуг и их часть(и) (за исключением случаев,
   когда то или иное предыдущее ограничение запрещено применимым
   законодательством); не использовать средства обнаружения скрытого
   исходного кода любой части Услуг; не обходить средства контроля доступа
   или защиты Услуг.

   Также, вы обязуетесь не Пользоваться Услугами так, чтобы домогаться,
   унижать, преследовать, угрожать, порочить, ущемлять или иным образом
   нарушать права других сторон, не загружать, не публиковать, не
   отправлять по электронной почте, не передавать и не предоставлять
   контент незаконным, вредным, угрожающим, оскорбительным, беспокоящим,
   аморальным, клеветническим, вульгарным, непристойным, пасквильным,
   нарушающим неприкосновенности частной жизни, ненавистническим способом,
   а также способами, неприемлемыми с точки зрения межрасовых,
   межэтнических или иных отношений.  Вы соглашаетесь с тем, что Western
   Digital не несет ответственности за такие случаи Использования, а также
   за сообщения или переданные данные притесняющего, угрожающего,
   дискредитирующего, оскорбительного, неправомерного характера, которые
   вы можете получить в результате Пользования Услугами.  Вы обязуетесь
   намеренно или непреднамеренно не нарушать законодательство, применимое
   в связи с Пользованием вами Услугами.  В случае нарушения чего-либо из
   вышесказанного, вы можете быть привлечены к ответственности, в том
   числе материальной.

   Вы признаете, что, за исключением прямо указанных в данном документе
   случаев, ничто в настоящих Условиях пользования не должно
   рассматриваться как предоставление вам какой-либо лицензии на наши
   патенты, патенты наших лицензиаров и на другие права интеллектуальной
   собственности, например, на основании эстоппеля, косвенного указания
   или иным образом, и вы соглашаетесь с тем, что на вас целиком ложится
   ответственность по получению данных лицензий, путем заключения для
   этого соответствующих письменных соглашений.  Несанкционированное
   пользование Услугами может нарушать законы об авторском праве, законы о
   товарных знаках, законы о конфиденциальности и соглашении, а также
   правила и положения в сфере связи.

Регистрация учетной записи, подписки

   Для использования определенных функций или разделов Услуг от вас может
   потребоваться создание учетной записи («Учетная запись пользователя»).
   Учетная запись пользователя создается путем прохождения регистрации,
   порядок которой указывается в соответствующих разделах Услуг.  Вы
   несете ответственность за предоставление точной и актуальной информации
   при создании учетной записи.

   Вы являетесь единственным авторизованным пользователем своей Учетной
   записи.  Вы отвечаете за сохранение в тайне пароля и учетного номера,
   созданного либо вами, либо Western Digital для пользования Услугами.
   Вы несете полную ответственность за все действия, осуществленные из-под
   вашей Учетной записи пользователя.  Western Digital может не
   контролировать использование вашей Учетной записи пользователя или
   другого пользователя, и Western Digital категорически отказывается от
   какой-либо ответственности, вытекающей в этой связи.

Конфиденциальность

   Вы пользуетесь Услугами при условии согласия с нашей Политикой
   конфиденциальности, с которой можете ознакомиться здесь, («Политика
   конфиденциальности»).  Ознакомьтесь с Политикой конфиденциальности, где
   представлена информация о наших методах сохранения конфиденциальности.

Пользовательская лицензия на использование контента

   Вы пользуетесь Услугами на том условии, что размещая, загружая,
   публикуя, отправляя, показывая, передавая контент и другие материалы
   через Услуги («Ваш контент»), вы тем самым предоставляете Western
   Digital неисключительную, бессрочную, безотзывную, не требующую
   лицензионных отчислений лицензию, действующую во всем мире,
   передаваемую с правом многоуровневого сублицензирования (в том числе
   другим пользователям Услуги) лицензию на доступ, использование,
   воспроизведение, передачу, отображение, публикацию, распространение,
   публичное исполнение, публичное отображение, изменение, адаптацию и
   создание производных от вашего Контента и включение вашего Контента в
   другие работы в любом формате и на носителях, как уже известных, так и
   будущих с любой коммерческой и некоммерческой целью.  Вы заявляете и
   гарантируете, что владеете или иным образом контролируете все права на
   ваш контент, включая все авторские права, о том, что ваш контент
   является исключительно вашим и не нарушает прав интеллектуальной
   собственности третьих лиц, в том числе прав на публичное использование
   и конфиденциальность, и что использование вашего Контента не нарушает
   настоящих Условий пользования или Политики конфиденциальности и не
   причиняет вреда ни физическим, ни юридическим лицам.  Мы не несем и не
   берем на себя ответственности за контент и материалы, представленные
   или отправленные через Услуги вами или третьими лицами.  Если ваш
   контент содержит изображения, вы также заявляете и гарантируете, что
   изображенные на них люди, если таковые изображены, дали согласие на
   использование изображений, как указано в настоящих Условиях
   пользования.

   МЫ ОСТАВЛЯЕМ ЗА СОБОЙ ПРАВО ОСУЩЕСТВЛЯТЬ ПРЕДВАРИТЕЛЬНУЮ ПРОВЕРКУ
   КОНТЕНТА И МАТЕРИАЛОВ, ОТКЛОНЯТЬ, ИЗМЕНЯТЬ, УДАЛЯТЬ КОНТЕНТ И МАТЕРИАЛЫ
   С УСЛУГ ПО ЛЮБОЙ ПРИЧИНЕ, В ТОМ ЧИСЛЕ, ЕСЛИ МЫ ПОЛАГАЕМ, ЧТО ТАКОЙ
   КОНТЕНТ ИЛИ МАТЕРИАЛ НАРУШАЕТ КАКОЙ-ЛИБО ЗАКОН ИЛИ ПРАВО КАКОГО-ЛИБО
   ЛИЦА, УЩЕМЛЯЕТ ПРАВА КАКОГО-ЛИБО ЛИЦА ИЛИ ПО КАКИМ-ЛИБО ПРИЧИНАМ НЕ
   ПОДХОДИТ ДЛЯ РАЗМЕЩЕНИЯ НА УСЛУГАХ.

Доступ из-за границы США

   Услуги контролируются и управляются нами из наших структур в США.  Мы
   не заявляем, что Услуги подходят или доступны для пользования в других
   местах, и, что к ним запрещен доступ с территорий, где их контент
   является противозаконным.  Тот, кто предпочитает пользоваться Услугами
   на иной территории, делает это по собственной инициативе и несет
   ответственность за соблюдение применимых местных законов.  Если вы
   пользуетесь Услугами на другой территории, вы несете ответственность за
   соблюдение применимых местных законов, включая законы в области
   экспорта и импорта других стран.  Вы признаете, что Услуги или часть
   Услуг, в том числе материалы, содержащиеся в них, могут подпадать под
   действие законов и положений США о контроле над экспортом, а также под
   положения о регулировании экономических санкций, разработанных Отделом
   контроля иностранных активов Министерства финансов США («OFAC») и под
   законодательство об экспорте других стран, и что отклонение от правил
   использования Услуг в нарушение законодательства США или
   законодательства других применимых стран, запрещена.  Вы соглашаетесь с
   тем, что ни одна из Услуг или продукт, полученный из них напрямую, не
   предназначена для приобретения, отправки, передачи, вывоза, реэкспорта
   ни прямо, ни опосредованно странам или их гражданам, которые подпадают
   под торговое эмбарго, и не будет использоваться в отношении какой-либо
   деятельности в области использования атомной энергии, химического или
   биологического оружия или в проектах по разработке ракетного оружия,
   если со стороны правительства США (или иного соответствующего
   правительства) не получено особое разрешение на осуществления таких
   видов деятельности для таких целей.  Получая доступ к веб-сайту, вы
   заявляете и гарантируете, что не включены в какой-либо подобный список
   OFAC и не являетесь гражданином, не проживаете, не находитесь большую
   часть времени в какой-либо стране или регионе, в отношении которой(го)
   со стороны США наложено эмбарго.  Вы обязуетесь строго соблюдать все
   положения законодательства об экспорте, реэкспорте и импорте и нести
   единоличную ответственность за получение при необходимости лицензий на
   экспорт, реэкспорт или импорт.

Ссылки на сторонние сайты и приложения

   Услуги могут содержать ссылки на сторонние веб-сайты или приложения.
   Однако имейте в виду, что мы не несем ответственности и не контролируем
   такие веб-сайты и приложения.  Western Digital не делает заявлений о
   других веб-сайтах и приложениях, доступ к которым вы можете получить
   через Услуги.  При обращении к стороннему веб-сайту или приложению,
   даже к тому, на котором присутствует логотип компании Western Digital,
   вы должны принять меры предосторожности, чтобы убедиться, что согласны
   с условиями пользования этим веб-сайтом или приложением и, что веб-сайт
   или приложение не содержит вирусов, червей, троянских коней и других
   вещей деструктивного характера.  Вы соглашаетесь с тем, что Western
   Digital не несет какой-либо ответственности за сторонние веб-сайты и
   приложения.

Ограничение ответственности

   В ПРЕДЕЛАХ, МАКСИМАЛЬНО РАЗРЕШЕННЫХ ДЕЙСТВУЮЩИМ ЗАКОНОДАТЕЛЬСТВОМ, МЫ,
   НАШИ ДИРЕКТОРА, ДОЛЖНОСТНЫЕ ЛИЦА, РАБОТНИКИ, КОНСУЛЬТАНТЫ (В
   СОВОКУПНОСТИ «СТОРОНЫ WESTERN DIGITAL») НЕ НЕСУТ ОТВЕТСТВЕННОСТИ ЗА
   УБЫТКИ, ПОНЕСЕННЫЕ В РЕЗУЛЬТАТЕ ИСПОЛЬЗОВАНИЯ, ИЗМЕНЕНИЯ, ДОПОЛНЕНИЯ,
   КОПИРОВАНИЯ, РАСПРОСТРАНЕНИЯ И СКАЧИВАНИЯ УСЛУГ, ИЛИ ЗА ОТСУТСТВИЕ
   НЕОБХОДИМЫХ УМЕНИЙ ДЛЯ ВЫПОЛНЕНИЯ ЧЕГО-ЛИБО ИЗ ВЫШЕПЕРЕЧИСЛЕННОГО.
   СТОРОНЫ WESTERN DIGITAL НЕ НЕСУТ ОТВЕТСТВЕННОСТИ ЗА ЛЮБЫЕ КОСВЕННЫЕ,
   ЧРЕЗВЫЧАЙНЫЕ, УБЫТКИ, ПРИСУЖДАЕМЫЕ В ПОРЯДКЕ НАКАЗАНИЯ, ШТРАФНЫЕ,
   ОСОБЫЕ, ПОБОЧНЫЕ УБЫТКИ (ВКЛЮЧАЯ ПОТЕРЮ ДАННЫХ, ДОХОДОВ, ПРИБЫЛИ,
   ВОЗМОЖНОСТИ ИСПОЛЬЗОВАНИЯ ИЛИ ДРУГИХ ЭКОНОМИЧЕСКИХ ПРЕИМУЩЕСТВ), ОДНАКО
   ВОЗНИКАЮЩИХ ПРИ НАРУШЕНИЕ ДОГОВОРНОЙ ИЛИ ДЕЛИКТНОЙ ОТВЕТСТВЕННОСТИ, ВНЕ
   ЗАВИСИМОСТИ ОТ ТОГО, БЫЛИ ЛИ СТОРОНЫ WESTERN DIGITAL ИНФОРМИРОВАНЫ О
   ВОЗМОЖНОСТИ ВОЗНИКНОВЕНИЯ ТАКИХ УБЫТКОВ.

   ВЫ СОГЛАШАЕТЕСЬ С ТЕМ, ЧТО НЕСЕТЕ ЕДИНОЛИЧНУЮ ОТВЕТСТВЕННОСТЬ ЗА ЗАЩИТУ
   И РЕЗЕРВНОЕ КОПИРОВАНИЕ ДАННЫХ И / ИЛИ ОБОРУДОВАНИЯ, ИСПОЛЬЗУЕМОГО В
   СВЯЗИ С УСЛУГАМИ, И НЕ БУДЕТЕ ПРЕДЪЯВЛЯТЬ СТОРОНАМ WESTERN DIGITAL
   ПРЕТЕНЗИЙ ЗА УТРАЧЕННЫЕ ДАННЫЕ, НЕТОЧНЫЕ РЕЗУЛЬТАТЫ, ЗАДЕРЖКИ В РАБОТЕ
   ИЛИ ПОТЕРЯННУЮ ПРИБЫЛЬ, КАК СЛЕДСТВИЕ ПОЛЬЗОВАНИЯ ИЛИ НЕВОЗМОЖНОСТИ
   ПОЛЬЗОВАНИЯ УСЛУГАМИ.

   ВЫ ОСВОБОЖДАЕТЕ СТОРОНЫ WESTERN DIGITAL ОТ ОТВЕТСТВЕННОСТИ И ОБЯЗУЕТЕСЬ
   НЕ ПРЕСЛЕДОВАТЬ ИХ В СУДЕБНОМ ПОРЯДКЕ ПО ПРИЧИНЕ ВОЗНИКНОВЕНИЯ
   ПРЕТЕНЗИЙ, СВЯЗАННЫХ С УСЛУГАМИ.  ЕСЛИ У ВАС ИМЕЮТСЯ ОСНОВАНИЯ
   ТРЕБОВАТЬ У СТОРОН(Ы) WESTERN DIGITAL ВОЗМЕЩЕНИЯ УБЫТКОВ (ВКЛЮЧАЯ
   ВСЛЕДСТВИЕ НАРУШЕНИЯ НАСТОЯЩИХ УСЛОВИЙ ПОЛЬЗОВАНИЯ) В СВЯЗИ С УСЛУГАМИ
   ИЛИ НАСТОЯЩИМИ УСЛОВИЯМИ ПОЛЬЗОВАНИЯ, ВЫ СОГЛАШАЕТЕСЬ С ТЕМ, ЧТО
   ЕДИНСТВЕННЫМ СРЕДСТВОМ ПРАВОВОЙ ЗАЩИТЫ ДЛЯ ВАС БУДЕТ ВОЗМЕЩЕНИЕ УБЫТКОВ
   ДО СУММЫ, РАВНОЙ ПЛАТЕ ЗА УСЛУГИ ЗА МЕСЯЦ, В ТЕЧЕНИЕ КОТОРОГО ПРОИЗОШЛО
   НАРУШЕНИЕ (ИЛИ В СУММЕ ДО 100 ДОЛЛАРОВ США, ЕСЛИ ПРЕТЕНЗИЯ ОТНОСИТСЯ К
   УСЛУГАМ, ПРЕДОСТАВЛЯЕМЫМ БЕПЛАТНО).

   ОГРАНИЧЕНИЕ ОТВЕТСТВЕННОСТИ СТОРОН WESTERN DIGITAL ПРИМЕНЯЕТСЯ
   НЕЗАВИСИМО ОТ ТОГО, БЫЛА ЛИ СТОРОНА WESTERN DIGITAL ОСВЕДОМЛЕНА ИЛИ
   ДОЛЖНА БЫЛА БЫТЬ ОСВЕДОМЛЕНА О ВЕРОЯТНОСТИ ТАКИХ УБЫТКОВ.  УКАЗАННОЕ
   ВЫШЕ ОГРАНИЧЕНИЕ МОЖЕТ НЕ РАСПРОСТРАНЯТЬСЯ НА ВАС В СИЛУ ТОГО, ЧТО В
   НЕКОТОРЫХ ЮРИСДИКЦИЯХ НЕ ДОПУСКАЕТСЯ ИСКЛЮЧЕНИЕ ИЛИ ОГРАНИЧЕНИЕ
   ОТВЕТСТВЕННОСТИ ЗА КОСВЕННЫЕ ИЛИ ПОБОЧНЫЕ УБЫТКИ.

Отказ

   ВЫ БЕЗОГОВОРОЧО ПРИЗНАЕТЕ, ЧТО ПОЛЬЗУЕТЕСЬ НАСТОЯЩИМИ УСЛУГАМИ НА СВОЙ
   РИСК, И, ЧТО ПРИНИМАЕТЕ РИСК В ОТНОШЕНИИ УДОВЛЕТВОРИТЕЛЬНОГО КАЧЕСТВА,
   ПРОИЗВОДИТЕЛЬНОСТИ, ТОЧНОСТИ И РЕАЛИЗАЦИИ СВОИХ ЗАДАЧ.  ВСЕ ЧАСТИ УСЛУГ
   ПРЕДОСТАВЛЯЮТСЯ WESTERN DIGITAL ПО ПРИНЦИПУ «КАК ЕСТЬ», «СО ВСЕМИ
   НЕИСПРАВНОСТЯМИ» И «ПРИ УСЛОВИИ НАЛИЧИЯ», СО ВСЕМИ НЕДОСТАТКАМИ И БЕЗ
   КАКИХ-ЛИБО ГАРАНТИЙ.  WESTERN DIGITAL НАСТОЯЩИМ ЯВНЫМ ОБРАЗОМ
   ОТКАЗЫВАЕТСЯ ОТ ВСЕХ ЗАЯВЛЕНИЙ, ГАРАНТИЙ И УСЛОВИЙ В ОТНОШЕНИИ УСЛУГ
   (ВКЛЮЧАЯ ПОЛЬЗОВАНИЕ, ИСПОЛНЕНИЕ И ПОДДЕРЖКУ), БУДЬ ТО ЯВНЫЕ,
   ПОДРАЗУМЕВАЕМЫЕ, УСТАНОВЛЕННЫЕ ЗАКОНОМ ИЛИ ИНЫЕ, ВКЛЮЧАЯ
   ПОДРАЗУМЕВАЕМЫЕ ГАРАНТИИ СООТВЕТСТВИЯ ОПРЕДЕЛЕННЫМ ЦЕЛЯМ, ПРИГОДНОСТИ
   ДЛЯ ПРОДАЖИ, ЧИСТОТЫ ПРАВОВОГО ТИТУЛА И‑НЕНАРУШЕНИЯ ПРАВ ТРЕТЬИХ
   СТОРОН.  WESTERN DIGITAL НЕ ДЕЛАЕТ ЗАВЕРЕНИЙ В ОТНОШЕНИИ ТОЧНОСТИ
   РЕЗУЛЬТАТОВ ПОЛУЧЕННЫХ ОТ ПОЛЬЗОВАНИЯ УСЛУГАМИ.

Документ, регламентирующий вопросы авторских прав, претензии в связи
нарушением авторских прав по Закону об авторском праве в цифровом тысячелетии
(DMCA)

   Согласно разделу 17 Свода законов США (раздел 512(с)), Western Digital
   должна реагировать на уведомления о предполагаемом нарушении, которые
   соответствуют смыслу положений закона об авторском праве в цифровую
   эпоху и другим применимым законам об интеллектуальной собственности.
   Мы уважаем права интеллектуальной собственности других.  Если вы
   считаете, что ваша работа была скопирована при нарушение авторских
   прав, используйте процедуры, указанные в Документе, регламентирующем
   вопросы авторских прав.

Документ, регламентирующем вопросы использования товарных знаков

   Товарные знаки, логотипы, знаки обслуживания (в совокупности «Знаки»),
   отображаемые при предоставлении наших товаров и услуг, являются
   собственностью Western Digital или третьих лиц.  Знаки Western Digital
   могут использоваться только в ограниченных обстоятельствах и с
   предварительного письменного разрешения Western Digital.  Получение или
   не получение разрешения зависит от конкретного случая.  При получении
   разрешения, использование должно происходить в строгом соответствии с
   нашими Правилами использования товарных знаков и логотипов.  Нажмите
   здесь, чтобы получить неполный перечень Знаков Western Digital.

Ограничение прав правительства США

   Услуги предоставляются с «ОГРАНИЧЕННЫМИ ПРАВАМИ».  Использование,
   дублирование или раскрытие информации правительством США подлежит
   ограничениям, изложенным в FAR52.227-14 и DFAR252.227-7013 и
   последующих заменяющих документах или любых других применимых законах и
   правилах.  Использование Услуг правительством США является признанием
   наших прав собственности на Услуги.

Применимое право; Делимость

   Претензии, связанные с Услугами, или вытекающие из них, включая,
   касающиеся пользования (или невозможности пользования) Услугами,
   регулируются законами штата Калифорния без учета принципов
   коллизионного права.  Вы соглашаетесь с тем, что споры, связанные с
   Пользованием вами Услугами или связанных с ними, подлежат разрешению
   только в судах штата и федеральных судах, расположенных в округе
   Санта-Клара, штат Калифорния.  Если какое-либо положение настоящих
   Условий пользования считается недействительным, недействующим или по
   какой-либо причине невозможным для выполнения в принудительном порядке,
   такое положение считается делимым и не влияет на действительность и
   возможность исполнения в принудительном порядке оставшихся положения
   настоящих Условий пользования.

   Пользователи Услуг штата Калифорния имеют право получать следующие
   уведомления об определенных потребительских правах: со службой помощи
   по претензиям при Отделе обслуживания потребителей Департамента по
   делам потребителей штата Калифорнии можно связаться в письменной форме
   по адресу 1625 North Market Blvd., Suite N 112, Sacramento, CA 95834
   или по телефону (800) 952-5210.

Утверждения прогнозного характера

   Некоторая информация о наших Услугах, включая ту, что представлена на
   наших веб-сайтах, такие как investor.wdc.com, может содержать
   прогнозные заявления в значении федеральных законов о ценных бумагах,
   включая заявления о будущих событиях, наших будущих операционных или
   финансовых планах или исполнении, нашем ожидаемом росте, тенденциях в
   деятельности и рыночной конъюнктуре и других будущих событий или
   обстоятельствах.  Все утверждения, которые не являются историческими
   фактами, основаны на наших текущих ожиданиях, и подвержены рискам и
   неопределенностям, которые могут привести к фактическим результатам,
   существенно отличающимся от тех, которые выражены или подразумеваются в
   прогнозных заявлениях.  Более подробная информация о рисках и
   неопределенностях, которые могут повлиять на нашу деятельность,
   приведена в документах Комиссии по ценным бумагам и биржам США («SEC»)
   и доступна на веб-сайте SEC по адресу www.sec.gov, включая документ с
   нашим последним периодическим отчетом, на который мы обращаем ваше
   внимание.  Мы не рекомендуем вам чрезмерно полагаться на эти прогнозные
   заявления.  Мы не берем на себя обязательств публично обновлять или
   пересматривать прогнозные заявления, будь то при получении новой
   информации, проведении исследований или иным образом, за исключением
   случаев, предусмотренных законом.

Изменения в Услугах

   Western Digital оставляет за собой право изменять или прекращать
   временно или надолго оказание Услуг (полностью или частично) или
   предоставление продуктов или описанных в них услуг, в любое время без
   предварительного уведомления.  При прекращении оказания Услуг полностью
   или частично Western Digital не несет ответственности за сохранение или
   предоставление вашего Контента и других данных.

Связаться с нами

   Если у вас есть вопросы, жалобы или комментарии в отношении настоящих
   Условий пользования или, если вы хотите получить дополнительную
   информацию об Услугах или, если вы хотите связаться с Western Digital,
   свяжитесь с нами, используя информацию на нашей странице Contact
   Western Digital.

     * {{unescape(item.title)}}
          + {{anchor.title}}

   Laatst bijgewerkt op 28 mei 2018.

   Deze Gebruiksvoorwaarden (deze ‘Gebruiksvoorwaarden’) zijn van
   toepassing op uw Gebruik (zoals hieronder gedefinieerd) van de websites
   die worden aangeboden door Western Digital Technologies, Inc. en/of
   zijn gelieerde bedrijven (gezamenlijk ‘Western Digital’, ‘wij’ of
   ‘ons/onze’ genoemd) en de inhoud, functies, materialen, software en
   bijbehorende documentatie en diensten die beschikbaar zijn op
   dergelijke websites (dergelijke websites, inhoud, functies, materialen,
   software en bijbehorende documentatie en diensten gezamenlijk de
   ‘Diensten’ genoemd).

   BELANGRIJK – LEES ZORGVULDIG – Als u niet akkoord gaat met deze
   Gebruiksvoorwaarden, mag U de Diensten niet Gebruiken.

   Om u te helpen bij het navigeren door en vinden van specifieke
   onderdelen van deze Gebruiksvoorwaarden, kunt u de onderstaande
   inhoudsopgave raadplegen:

Acceptatie van deze Gebruiksvoorwaarden

   Door het Gebruik (zoals hieronder gedefinieerd) van de Diensten:
   verklaart en garandeert u dat u ten minste meerderjarig in uw
   jurisdictie bent en alle bevoegdheid, autoriteit en toestemmingen hebt
   die nodig zijn voor het afsluiten van en gebonden zijn aan deze
   Gebruiksvoorwaarden; u erkent dat u deze Gebruiksvoorwaarden hebt
   gelezen en begrepen, en u gaat ermee akkoord dat u daaraan gebonden
   bent; en u gaat ermee akkoord dat u zult voldoen aan alle toepasselijke
   wetten en voorschriften in verband met uw Gebruik van de Diensten.

   Als u de Diensten namens een bedrijf, organisatie of andere entiteit
   Gebruikt, dan:  omvat ‘u’ u en die entiteit; u verklaart en garandeert
   dat u een bevoegde vertegenwoordiger van de entiteit bent met de
   bevoegdheid om de entiteit aan deze Gebruiksvoorwaarden te binden en
   dat u namens de entiteit instemt met deze Gebruiksvoorwaarden; en u
   gaat ermee akkoord dat die entiteit wettelijk en financieel
   verantwoordelijk is voor uw Gebruik van de Diensten alsmede voor het
   gebruik van uw Gebruikersaccount (zoals hieronder gedefinieerd) door
   anderen die aan uw entiteit gelieerd zijn, waaronder alle werknemers,
   tussenpersonen of contractanten.

Interpretatie

   In het kader van deze Gebruiksvoorwaarden: het werkwoord in
   hoofdletters ‘Gebruiken’ betekent toegang hebben tot, bladeren door en
   aanmaken van een Gebruikersaccount (zoals hieronder gedefinieerd) op,
   het uploaden van inhoud of materiaal naar, het downloaden van inhoud of
   materiaal vanaf of het anderszins gebruiken van de Diensten (en het
   zelfstandig naamwoord ‘Gebruik’ en de term ‘Met behulp van’ hebben
   daaruit voortvloeiende betekenissen); de termen ‘u’ en ‘uw’ verwijzen
   naar u als een gebruiker die de Diensten Gebruikt; en alle verwijzingen
   naar de woorden ‘omvat’, inclusief’ of ‘waaronder’ worden geacht te
   worden gevolgd door de woorden ‘maar niet beperkt tot’.

Wijzigingen in deze Gebruiksvoorwaarden

   WIJ MOGEN, GEHEEL NAAR EIGEN INZICHT, DEZE VOORWAARDEN OP ELK GEWENST
   MOMENT WIJZIGEN DOOR DEZE PAGINA BIJ TE WERKEN.  ALS U DE DIENSTEN NA
   EEN DERGELIJKE WIJZIGING BLIJFT GEBRUIKEN, BENT U GEBONDEN AAN DIE
   WIJZIGING.  DAAROM DIENT U DEZE PAGINA REGELMATIG TE BEZOEKEN OM DEZE
   GEBRUIKERSVOORWAARDEN TE CONTROLEREN.  ALS EEN WIJZIGING NIET
   ACCEPTABEL VOOR U IS, MAG U DE DIENSTEN NIET BLIJVEN GEBRUIKEN.

Aanvullende Voorwaarden

   Wij bieden een breed scala aan producten en diensten, waaronder
   softwareproducten en -diensten.  Op sommige producten en diensten die
   op onze websites beschikbaar zijn, kunnen andere of aanvullende
   voorwaarden (‘Aanvullende Voorwaarden’) van toepassing zijn.  Die
   Aanvullende Voorwaarden worden beschikbaar gesteld bij de relevante
   producten of diensten, bijvoorbeeld door deze direct op de website van
   die producten of diensten te plaatsen of door deze te verstrekken als
   een aparte set voorwaarden bij aankoop of download van, toegang tot,
   browsen door of gebruik van die producten of diensten.  Voor zover deze
   Gebruiksvoorwaarden van toepassing zijn op die producten of diensten
   (bijv. omdat ze op onze websites beschikbaar worden gesteld), maar niet
   overeenstemmen met de Aanvullende Voorwaarden die op die producten of
   diensten van toepassing zijn, vervangen die Aanvullende Voorwaarden
   afwijkende bepalingen in deze Gebruiksvoorwaarden en gelden ze voor die
   producten of diensten.

Eigendom

   De Diensten, inclusief hun ‘uiterlijk en gevoel’ (bijv. tekst,
   grafische afbeeldingen, beelden en logo’s), eigendomsrechtelijk
   beschermde inhoud, informatie en andere materialen die onderdeel
   uitmaken van de Diensten, zijn wettelijk beschermd, waaronder
   Amerikaanse intellectueel eigendoms-, auteursrecht-, handelsmerk- en
   andere wetten en internationale verdragen.  U erkent dat Western
   Digital en/of onze licentiegevers eigenaar zijn van alle rechten op,
   titels van en belangen in de Diensten (inclusief alle octrooien,
   auteursrechten, handelsgeheimen, handelsmerken, show-how en knowhow en
   alle andere intellectuele-eigendomsrechten daarop of daarmee verband
   houdend) en u gaat ermee akkoord dat u geen handeling(en) zult
   verrichten die in strijd zijn met dergelijke eigendomsbelangen.

Gebruiksbeperkingen

   Behalve voor zover uitdrukkelijk hierin goedgekeurd, mag geen van de
   Diensten worden gekopieerd, gereproduceerd, gedistribueerd, opnieuw
   gepubliceerd, gedownload, getoond, geplaatst of verzonden in welke vorm
   en op welke manier dan ook, inclusief elektronisch, mechanisch, door
   fotokopie, opname of anderszins, zonder onze voorafgaande schriftelijke
   toestemming of de voorafgaande schriftelijke toestemming van de
   eigenaar van het auteursrecht.  Afhankelijk van uw nakoming van deze
   Gebruiksvoorwaarden, verstrekt Western Digital u hierbij een beperkt,
   niet-exclusief recht op toegang tot en gebruik van de materialen die
   onderdeel uitmaken van de Diensten, altijd alleen voor persoonlijk,
   niet-commercieel gebruik, en op voorwaarde dat u dergelijke materialen
   niet wijzigt, wederverkoopt of commercieel gebruikt.  Deze toestemming
   eindigt automatisch als u een van deze Gebruiksvoorwaarden schendt.
   Bij beëindiging moet u alle materialen die u van de Diensten hebt
   verkregen, onmiddellijk vernietigen.

   U gaat ermee akkoord dat u: geen kennisgeving over auteursrechten of
   andere eigendomsrechten of een legenda met beperkende rechten die
   behoort tot of wordt geleverd bij de Diensten zult verwijderen of
   wijzigen; geen Diensten, updates of een deel daarvan zult decompileren,
   demonteren, omgekeerd compileren, omgekeerd assembleren of anderszins
   reserve engineeren (behalve wanneer en alleen voor zover een voorgaande
   beperking door de toepasselijke wetgeving verboden is); op geen enkele
   manier zult proberen een vertrouwelijke broncode of een onderdeel van
   de Diensten te ontdekken; of geen functionaliteit zult omzeilen die
   toegang tot de Diensten regelt of de Diensten anderszins beschermt.

   U gaat er verder mee akkoord dat u de Diensten op geen enkele manier
   zult Gebruiken om een andere partij te intimideren, misbruiken,
   hinderlijk volgen (stalken), bedreigen, te schande maken of anderszins
   inbreuk te maken op de rechten van een andere partij of deze rechten te
   schenden, en geen inhoud zult uploaden, plaatsen, e-mailen, verzenden
   of anderszins beschikbaar maken die onwettig, schadelijk, bedreigend,
   beledigend, intimiderend, bedrieglijk, lasterlijk, vulgair,
   onfatsoenlijk, smadelijk, een inbreuk op iemands privacy, hatelijk of
   raciaal, etnisch of anderszins bezwaarlijk is.  U gaat ermee akkoord
   dat Western Digital op geen enkele manier verantwoordelijk is voor een
   dergelijk Gebruik door u, noch voor intimiderende, bedreigende,
   lasterlijke, beledigende of illegale berichten of verzendingen die u
   kunt ontvangen vanwege het Gebruik van de Diensten.  U gaat ermee
   akkoord dat u niet met of zonder opzet een toepasselijke wet zult
   schenden in verband met uw Gebruik van de Diensten.  Als u een van de
   voorgaande schendt, kunt u strafrechtelijk worden vervolgd en kan
   schadevergoeding van u worden geëist.

   U erkent dat, behalve zoals uitdrukkelijk hierin beschreven, niets in
   deze Gebruiksvoorwaarden dient te worden opgevat als een overdracht van
   een licentie aan u voor octrooien of andere
   intellectuele-eigendomsrechten van ons of van een van onze
   licentiegevers, zowel door uitsluiting, implicatie of anderszins, en u
   gaat ermee akkoord dat u alleen verantwoordelijk bent voor het
   verkrijgen van dergelijke licenties door een aparte schriftelijke
   overeenkomst.  Onbevoegd Gebruik van de Diensten kan een schending zijn
   van auteurswetten, handelsmerkwetten, de privacy- en publiciteitswetten
   en communicatievoorschriften en -reglementen.

Accountregistratie en abonnementen

   Wij kunnen van u eisen dat u een account registreert voor het Gebruik
   van bepaalde functies of onderdelen van de Diensten (een
   ‘Gebruikersaccount’).  U kunt een Gebruikersaccount aanmaken door het
   registratieproces te voltooien dat in het toepasselijke onderdeel van
   de Diensten wordt beschreven.  U bent verantwoordelijk voor het
   verstrekken van correcte en actuele accountgegevens.

   U bent de enige bevoegde gebruiker van uw Gebruikersaccount.  U bent
   verantwoordelijk voor de geheimhouding van elk wachtwoord en
   accountnummer dat door u of Western Digital is verstrekt voor het
   Gebruik van de Diensten.  U bent verantwoordelijk voor alle
   activiteiten die met uw Gebruikersaccount plaatsvinden.  Western
   Digital heeft wellicht geen controle over het gebruik van uw
   Gebruikersaccount of die van een andere gebruiker, en Western Digital
   wijst uitdrukkelijk elke daarvan afgeleide aansprakelijkheid af.

Privacypraktijken

   Op Uw Gebruik van de Diensten is ook onze Privacyverklaring van
   toepassing, die beschikbaar is door hier te klikken (de
   ‘Privacyverklaring’).  Wij verzoeken u de Privacyverklaring door te
   lezen voor meer informatie over onze privacypraktijken.

Licentieverlening voor gebruikersinhoud

   Als voorwaarde voor uw Gebruik van de Diensten, door plaatsen,
   uploaden, publiceren, indienen, weergeven of verzenden van inhoud of
   andere materialen via de Diensten (‘Uw Inhoud’) geeft u Western Digital
   hierbij een niet-exclusieve, eeuwigdurende, onherroepbare,
   royaltyvrije, wereldwijde, overdraagbare, volledig voor sublicentie in
   aanmerking komende (inclusief aan andere gebruikers van de Diensten)
   licentie voor toegang tot en gebruik, reproductie, verzending,
   weergave, publicatie, distributie, openbare uitvoering, openbare
   weergave, wijziging, aanpassing en productie van afgeleide werken van
   Uw Inhoud en voor integratie van Uw Inhoud in andere werken in elk
   formaat of op elk medium dat nu bekend is of later wordt ontwikkeld
   voor alle commerciële en niet-commerciële doeleinden.  U verklaart en
   garandeert: dat u eigenaar bent van of anderszins controle hebt over
   alle rechten op Uw Inhoud, inclusief alle auteursrechten; dat Uw Inhoud
   juist is en geen inbreuk maakt op of wederrechtelijke toe-eigening is
   van intellectuele-eigendomsrechten van een derde, inclusief de
   publiciteits- en privacyrechten; en dat gebruik van Uw Inhoud geen
   schending is van deze Gebruiksvoorwaarden of de Privacyverklaring en
   geen schade aan een persoon of entiteit zal berokkenen.  Wij zijn niet
   verantwoordelijk en aanvaarden geen aansprakelijkheid voor inhoud of
   andere materialen die door u of een derde via de Diensten zijn
   ingediend of geplaatst.  Voor zover Uw Inhoud afbeeldingen bevat,
   verklaart en garandeert u bovendien dat elke persoon die, eventueel, op
   dergelijke afbeeldingen wordt getoond, heeft ingestemd met het gebruik
   van de afbeeldingen zoals beschreven in deze Gebruiksvoorwaarden.

   WIJ BEHOUDEN ONS HET RECHT VOOR OM ELKE INHOUD OF ELK MATERIAAL OP DE
   DIENSTEN OM WELKE REDEN DAN OOK VOORAF TE BEKIJKEN, TE WEIGEREN, TE
   WIJZIGEN OF TE VERWIJDEREN, WAARONDER WANNEER WIJ GEHEEL NAAR EIGEN
   GOEDDUNKEN BEPALEN DAT DIE INHOUD OF DAT MATERIAAL EEN WET OF RECHT VAN
   EEN PERSOON SCHENDT, INBREUK MAAKT OP DE RECHTEN VAN EEN PERSOON OF
   ANDERSZINS ONGEPAST IS VOOR PLAATSING OP DE DIENSTEN.

Toegang van buiten de Verenigde Staten

   De Diensten worden door ons gecontroleerd en beheerd vanuit onze
   kantoren in de Verenigde Staten.  Wij geven geen verklaring af dat de
   Diensten geschikt of beschikbaar zijn voor Gebruik op andere locaties,
   en toegang daartoe vanuit regio’s waar de inhoud ervan onwettig is, is
   verboden.  Degenen die kiezen om de Diensten vanuit andere locaties te
   Gebruiken, doen dit op eigen initiatief en zijn verantwoordelijk voor
   naleving van de toepasselijke lokale wetten.  Als u de Diensten vanuit
   andere locaties Gebruikt, bent u verantwoordelijk voor naleving van de
   toepasselijke lokale wetten, inclusief de export- en
   importvoorschriften van andere landen.  U erkent dat op sommige of alle
   Diensten, waaronder de materialen die daarvan onderdeel uitmaken, de
   Amerikaanse exportbeheerwetten en -voorschriften, de voorschriften voor
   economische sancties van het Office of Foreign Assets Control (OFAC -
   Kantoor voor het beheer van buitenlandse activa) van het Amerikaanse
   Ministerie van Financiën, alsmede exportwetten van andere landen van
   toepassing zijn, en dat gebruik van de Diensten voor andere doeleinden
   in strijd met de wetgeving van de Verenigde Staten of andere
   toepasselijke landen verboden is.  U gaat ermee akkoord dat geen van de
   Diensten, noch een direct product ervan, wordt of zal worden
   aangeschaft, verzonden, overgedragen, geëxporteerd of opnieuw
   geëxporteerd, direct of indirect, naar landen of hun ingezetenen waarop
   of op wie een verbod rust of waaraan of aan wie een embargo is
   opgelegd, en ook niet mag worden Gebruikt voor nucleaire activiteiten,
   chemische biologische wapens, of raketprojecten, tenzij specifiek
   goedgekeurd door de Amerikaanse regering (of andere relevante regering)
   voor die doeleinden.  Door toegang tot de website, verklaart en
   garandeert dat u geen staatsburger of ingezetene bent van, en niet
   gewoonlijk woont in, een land of regio waaraan de Amerikaanse regering
   een embargo heeft opgelegd, en dat u niet als een gesanctioneerde
   partij voorkomt op de lijst met speciaal aangewezen staatsburgers en
   geblokkeerde personen, die door OFAC wordt bijgehouden.  U gaat ermee
   akkoord dat u alle export-, hernieuwde export- en importwetten strikt
   zult naleven en alleen verantwoordelijk bent voor het verkrijgen van
   eventueel vereiste export-, hernieuwde export- of importvergunningen.

Koppelingen naar externe sites en applicaties

   De Diensten kunnen koppelingen naar externe websites of applicaties
   bevatten.  Wees u er echter van bewust dat wij niet verantwoordelijk
   zijn voor en geen controle hebben over deze andere website of
   applicaties.  Western Digital geeft geen enkele verklaring af over een
   andere website of applicatie waartoe u via de Diensten mogelijk toegang
   krijgt.  Wanneer u een externe website of applicatie opent, zelfs een
   met een bedrijfslogo van Western Digital, dient u zelf
   voorzorgsmaatregelen te nemen om ervoor te zorgen dat u instemt met de
   gebruiksvoorwaarden van die website of applicatie en dat de website of
   applicatie vrij is van zaken zoals virussen, wormen, Trojaanse paarden
   en andere vernietigende zaken.  U gaat ermee akkoord dat Western
   Digital op geen enkele manier aansprakelijk is voor externe websites of
   applicaties.

Beperking van aansprakelijkheid

   IN DE DOOR DE TOEPASSELIJKE WETGEVING TOEGESTANE MATE ZIJN WIJ EN ONZE
   DIRECTEUREN, BESTUURDERS, WERKNEMERS EN ADVISEURS (SAMEN ‘DE WESTERN
   DIGITAL PARTIJEN’ GENOEMD) NIET AANSPRAKELIJK VOOR SCHADE DIE WORDT
   GELEDEN TEN GEVOLGE VAN HET GEBRUIKEN, WIJZIGEN, BIJDRAGEN AAN,
   KOPIËREN, DISTRIBUEREN OF DOWNLOADEN VAN DE DIENSTEN OF HET NIET KUNNEN
   UITVOEREN VAN EEN VAN DE HIERVOOR GENOEMDE ACTIVITEITEN.  IN GEEN GEVAL
   ZIJN DE WESTERN DIGITAL PARTIJEN AANSPRAKELIJK VOOR INDIRECTE,
   BUITENGEWONE, ALS VOORBEELD OF STRAF DIENENDE, SPECIALE, INCIDENTELE OF
   GEVOLGSCHADE (INCLUSIEF VERLIES VAN GEGEVENS, OMZET, WINSTEN, GEBRUIK
   OF ANDER ECONOMISCH VOORDEEL, OP WELKE MANIER DAN OOK ONTSTAAN, DOOR
   NIET-NAKOMING OF ONRECHTMATIGE DAAD, ZELFS ALS DE WESTERN DIGITALE
   PARTIJEN EERDER OVER DE MOGELIJKHEID VAN EEN DERGELIJKE SCHADE ZIJN
   GEÏNFORMEERD.

   U GAAT ERMEE AKKOORD DAT U ALLEEN VERANTWOORDELIJK BENT VOOR DE JUISTE
   BESCHERMING EN BACK-UP VAN GEGEVENS EN/OF APPARATUUR DIE IN VERBAND MET
   DE DIENSTEN WORDEN GEBRUIKT EN GEEN CLAIMS IN WELKE VORM DAN OOK ZULT
   INDIENEN TEGEN DE WESTERN DIGITAL PARTIJEN VOOR VERLIES VAN GEGEVENS,
   ONJUISTE RESULTATEN, WERKVERTRAGINGEN OF WINSTVERLIES ALS GEVOLG VAN
   HET GEBRUIK, OF HET NIET KUNNEN GEBRUIKEN, VAN DE DIENSTEN.

   U GAAT ERMEE AKKOORD DAT U DE WESTERN DIGITAL PARTIJEN VOLLEDIG ZULT
   VRIJWAREN VAN, EN U STEMT ERMEE IN DAT U GEEN RECHTSZAAK ZULT
   AANSPANNEN TEGEN DE WESTERN DIGITAL PARTIJEN VOOR, CLAIMS DIE VERBAND
   HOUDEN MET DE DIENSTEN.  ALS ER ENIGE BASIS IS VOOR SCHADEVERGOEDING
   (INCLUSIEF SCHENDING VAN DEZE GEBRUIKSVOORWAARDEN) VAN EEN VAN DE
   WESTERN DIGITAL PARTIJEN IN VERBAND MET DEZE DIENSTEN OF DEZE
   GEBRUIKSVOORWAARDEN, GAAT U ERMEE AKKOORD DAT UW ENIGE VERHAAL IS
   VERGOEDING VAN DE SCHADE DOOR DE WESTERN DIGITAL PARTIJEN TOT EEN
   BEDRAG DAT GELIJK IS AAN DE KOSTEN VAN UW DIENSTEN VOOR DE MAAND WAARIN
   DE SCHENDING PLAATSVOND (OF TOT $100,00, ALS DE CLAIMS BETREKKING
   HEBBEN OP GRATIS DIENSTEN).

   DEZE BEPERKINGEN VAN DE AANSPRAKELIJKHEID VAN DE WESTERN DIGITAL
   PARTIJEN ZIJN VAN TOEPASSING ONGEACHT OF WESTERN DIGITAL AL DAN NIET
   WERD GEÏNFORMEERD OVER OF ZICH BEWUST HAD MOETEN ZIJN VAN DE
   MOGELIJKHEID VAN DERGELIJKE VERLIEZEN.  BEPAALDE STATEN STAAN DE
   UITSLUITING OF BEPERKING VAN INCIDENTELE OF GEVOLGSCHADE NIET TOE,
   ZODAT DE BOVENSTAANDE UITSLUITINGEN OF BEPERKINGEN NIET OP U VAN
   TOEPASSING KUNNEN ZIJN.

Vrijwaring

   U ERKENT UITDRUKKELIJK DAT U DE DIENSTEN GEBRUIKT GEHEEL VOOR EIGEN
   RISICO EN DAT U HET VOLLEDIGE RISICO VOOR TEVREDENSTELLENDE KWALITEIT,
   PRESTATIE, NAUWKEURIGHEID EN INSPANNING DRAAGT.  ALLE ONDERDELEN VAN DE
   DIENSTEN WORDEN DOOR WESTERN DIGITAL ALLEEN ‘IN DE HUIDIGE STAAT’, ‘MET
   ALLE FOUTEN’ EN ‘VOOR ZOVER BESCHIKBAAR’ VERSTREKT, MET ALLE FOUTEN EN
   ZONDER GARANTIE IN WELKE VORM DAN OOK.  WESTERN DIGITAL WIJST HIERBIJ
   UITDRUKKELIJK ALLE VERKLARINGEN, GARANTIES EN CONDITIES MET BETREKKING
   TOT DE DIENSTEN AF (INCLUSIEF GEBRUIK, PRESTATIE EN ONDERSTEUNING
   DAARVAN), ONGEACHT OF HET OM EXPLICIETE, IMPLICIETE, WETTELIJKE OF
   ANDERE, INCLUSIEF ALLE IMPLICIETE GARANTIES VAN GESCHIKTHEID VOOR EEN
   BEPAALD DOEL, VERKOOPBAARHEID, TITEL EN NIET-SCHENDING.  WESTERN
   DIGITAL GEEFT GEEN GARANTIES AF VOOR DE NAUWKEURIGHEID VAN DE
   RESULTATEN OF UITKOMST DIE AFKOMSTIG ZIJN VAN DE DIENSTEN.

Auteursrechtbeleid en claims van schending van auteursrecht volgens de DMCA

   Volgens Title 17, United States Code, Section 512(c), is het beleid van
   Western Digital om te reageren op kennisgevingen van vermeende inbreuk
   die voldoen aan de Digital Millennium Copyright Act en andere
   toepasselijke intellectuele-eigendomswetten.  Wij respecteren het
   intellectueel eigendom van anderen.  Als u denkt dat uw werk op een
   manier is gekopieerd die een inbreuk op het auteursrecht vormt,
   verzoeken wij u de procedures te gebruiken zoals beschreven in ons
   Auteursrechtbeleid.

Beleid voor het gebruik van handelsmerken

   De handelsmerken, logo's en servicemerken (samen ‘Merken’ genoemd) die
   bij de levering van onze producten en diensten worden weergegeven, zijn
   eigendom van Western Digital of derden.  De Merken van Western Digital
   mogen alleen onder beperkte omstandigheden en met voorafgaande
   schriftelijke toestemming van Western Digital worden gebruikt.
   Goedkeuringen worden telkens per geval gegeven.  Elk goedgekeurd
   gebruik moet strikt voldoen aan onze Richtlijnen voor het gebruik van
   handelsmerken en logo's.  Klik hier voor een niet-volledige lijst van
   merken van Western Digital.

Beperkte rechten voor de Amerikaanse overheid

   De Diensten worden geleverd met ‘BEPERKTE RECHTEN’.  Voor het gebruik,
   de vermenigvuldiging of de openbaarmaking door de Amerikaanse regering
   gelden de beperkingen zoals beschreven in FAR52.227-14 en
   DFAR252.227-7013 e.v., zijn opvolger(s) of andere toepasselijke wetten
   en voorschriften.  Het Gebruik van de Diensten door de Amerikaanse
   regering vormt erkenning van onze eigendomsrechten daarop.

Toepasselijk recht; scheidbaarheid

   Op elke claim die voortvloeit uit of verband houdt met de Diensten,
   waaronder het Gebruik (of het niet kunnen Gebruiken) van de Diensten,
   zijn de wetten van de staat Californië van toepassing, zonder rekening
   te houden met verwijzingsregels.  U gaat ermee akkoord dat u instemt
   met de exclusieve jurisdictie van de rechtbanken van de deelstaat en
   federale rechtbanken in het district Santa Clara, Californië, voor het
   oplossen van alle geschillen die voortvloeien uit of verband houden met
   uw Gebruik van de Diensten.  Als een bepaling van deze
   Gebruiksvoorwaarden ongeldig, nietig of om een of andere reden
   onafdwingbaar wordt geacht, wordt die bepaling beschouwd als scheidbaar
   en heeft dit geen gevolgen van de geldigheid en afdwingbaarheid van
   alle overige bepalingen van deze Gebruiksvoorwaarden.

   Gebruikers van de Diensten in Californië hebben het recht de volgende
   specifieke kennisgeving over consumentenrechten te ontvangen: U kunt
   contact opnemen met de Complaint Assistance Unit van de Division of
   Consumer Services van de California Department of Consumer Affairs en
   wel schriftelijk op 1625 North Market Blvd., Suite N 112, Sacramento,
   CA 95834, of telefonisch op +1 (800) 952-5210.

Toekomstgerichte verklaringen

   Sommige informatie op onze Diensten, inclusief onze websites zoals
   investor.wdc.com, kan toekomstgerichte verklaringen bevatten zoals
   gedefinieerd door de federale effectenwetten, inclusief verklaringen
   over toekomstige gebeurtenissen, onze toekomstige operationele of
   financiële plannen of prestatie, onze verwachte groei, trends in onze
   bedrijfstak en de markten waarin wij opereren, en andere beschrijvingen
   van toekomstige gebeurtenissen of omstandigheden.  Alle verklaringen
   die geen historische feiten zijn, zijn gebaseerd op onze huidige
   verwachtingen en onderhevig aan een aantal risico’s en onzekerheden
   waardoor de actuele resultaten wezenlijk kunnen afwijken van de
   genoemde of geïmpliceerde resultaten in de toekomstgerichte
   verklaringen.  Meer informatie over de risico’s en onzekerheden die
   onze bedrijfsvoering zouden kunnen beïnvloeden, vindt u in de
   documenten die wij hebben ingediend bij de Amerikaanse
   beurstoezichthouder (Securities and Exchange Commission of SEC) en
   beschikbaar zijn op de website van SEC op www.sec.gov, inclusief ons
   meest recent ingediende periodieke rapport, waarnaar wij u verwijzen.
   U mag niet overmatig vertrouwen op deze toekomstgerichte verklaringen.
   Wij zijn niet verplicht om elke toekomstgerichte verklaring
   publiekelijk bij te werken of te herzien, ongeacht of dit voortvloeit
   uit nieuwe informatie, toekomstige ontwikkelingen of anderszins,
   behalve wanneer dit wettelijk vereist is.

Wijzigingen van de Diensten

   Western Digital behoudt zich het recht voor om de Diensten (of een
   onderdeel ervan), of de producten of diensten die daarin zijn
   beschreven, tijdelijk of permanent, op elk gewenst moment en zonder
   kennisgeving te wijzigen of te beëindigen.  Na beëindiging van de
   Diensten of een onderdeel ervan is Western Digital niet verplicht om Uw
   Inhoud of andere gegevens te behouden of te verstrekken.

Contactgegevens

   Bij vragen, klachten of commentaar over deze Gebruiksvoorwaarden, als u
   nadere informatie over de Diensten wenst te ontvangen, of als u op
   andere wijze contact wilt opnemen met Western Digital, verzoeken wij u
   de informatie te raadplegen op onze website Contact opnemen met Western
   Digital.

     * {{unescape(item.title)}}
          + {{anchor.title}}

   En son 28 Mayıs 2018 tarihinde güncellenmiştir.

   Western Digital Technologies, Inc. ve/veya bağlı kuruluşları (birlikte
   “Western Digital”, “biz” veya “bizim” olarak anılacaktır) tarafından
   sunulan web sitelerini ve bu web sitelerindeki içeriği, özellikleri,
   materyalleri, yazılımı ve ilgili belgeleri ve hizmetleri (bu tür web
   siteleri, içerik, özellikler, materyaller, yazılım ve ilgili belgeler
   ve hizmetler birlikte “Hizmetler” olarak anılacaktır) Kullanımınız
   (aşağıda belirtildiği üzere) işbu Kullanım Şartlarına tabidir.

   ÖNEMLİ – LÜTFEN DİKKATLİ OKUYUN – İşbu Kullanım Şartlarını kabul
   etmezseniz Hizmetleri Kullanamazsınız.

   İşbu Kullanım Şartlarında aradığınız bölümleri daha kolay bulabilmek
   için lütfen aşağıdaki içindekiler kısmına başvurun:

İşbu Kullanım Şartlarının Kabulü

   Hizmetleri Kullanarak (aşağıda tanımlandığı üzere): En az, bulunduğunuz
   yargı çevresinde geçerli rüşt yaşında olduğunuzu ve işbu Kullanım
   Şartlarını akdetmek ve bağlayıcılığını kabul etmek için gerekli tüm
   yetkilere, otoriteye ve izinlere sahip olduğunuzu beyan ve garanti
   etmektesiniz; işbu Kullanım Şartlarını okuduğunuzu ve anladığınızı ve
   işbu Kullanım Şartlarının bağlayıcılığını kabul ettiğinizi
   onaylamaktasınız ve Hizmetleri Kullanımınızla bağlantılı yürürlükteki
   tüm yasa ve yönetmeliklere uymayı kabul etmektesiniz.

   Hizmetleri bir şirket, kuruluş veya başka tür bir işletme adına
   Kullanıyorsanız:  “Siz” sizi ve söz konusu işletmeyi içerir; işletmenin
   işletmeyi işbu Kullanım Şartlarının bağlayıcılığına tabi tutma
   yetkisine sahip yetkili bir temsilcisi olduğunuzu beyan ve garanti
   etmekte ve işletmenin adına işbu Kullanım Şartlarını kabul etmektesiniz
   ve söz konusu işletmenin Hizmetleri Kullanımınızın yanı sıra Kullanıcı
   Hesabınızın (aşağıda tanımlandığı üzere) çalışanlar, temsilciler veya
   yükleniciler dâhil olmak üzere işletmenizle bağlantılı başka kişilerce
   kullanımından yasal ve finansal olarak sorumlu olduğunu kabul
   etmektesiniz.

Yorumlama

   İşbu Kullanım Şartlarının amaçları doğrultusunda: Büyük harfle yazılan
   “Kullanmak” Hizmetlere erişmek, göz atmak, Hizmetlerde Kullanıcı Hesabı
   (aşağıda tanımlandığı üzere) oluşturmak, Hizmetlere içerik veya
   materyal yüklemek, Hizmetlerden içerik veya materyal indirmek veya
   Hizmetleri başka şekillerde kullanmak anlamına gelmektedir (ve isim
   halindeki “Kullanım” ile “Kullanma” terimi aynı anlamları
   taşımaktadır); “siz” ve “sizin” terimleri Hizmetleri Kullanan bir
   kullanıcı olarak size atıfta bulunmaktadır ve “içerir”, “içeren” veya
   “dâhil” sözcüklerine atıfta bulunulan tüm ifadeleri, “ancak bunlarla
   sınırlı olmamak üzere” sözcüklerinin izlediği kabul edilmektedir.

İşbu Kullanım Şartlarındaki Değişiklikler

   YEGÂNE TAKDİRİMİZ DOĞRULTUSUNDA, İŞBU KULLANIM ŞARTLARINI, BU SAYFAYI
   GÜNCELLEMEK SURETİ İLE DİLEDİĞİMİZ AN DEĞİŞTİREBİLİRİZ.  BU TÜR
   HERHANGİ BİR DEĞİŞİKLİK SONRASINDA HİZMETLERİ KULLANMAYA DEVAM ETMENİZ
   BU DEĞİŞİKLİKLERİN BAĞLAYICILIĞINI KABUL ETTİĞİNİZ ANLAMINA GELİR.  BU
   NEDENLE BU SAYFAYI DÜZENLİ OLARAK ZİYARET EDEREK İŞBU KULLANIM
   ŞARTLARINI İNCELEMELİSİNİZ.  HERHANGİ BİR DEĞİŞİKLİĞİ KABUL ETMEZSENİZ
   HİZMETLERİ KULLANMAYA DEVAM EDEMEZSİNİZ.

Ek Şartlar

   Yazılım ürünleri ve hizmetleri dâhil olmak üzere çok çeşitli ürün ve
   hizmetler sunmaktayız.  Web sitelerimizde bulunan ürün veya
   hizmetlerden bazıları diğer yahut ek şart ve koşullara (“Ek Şartlar”)
   tabi olabilir.  Bu Ek Şartlar ilgili ürünlerin veya hizmetlerin web
   sitesinde doğrudan yayınlanarak veya bu ürün veya hizmetleri satın
   alma, indirme, kullanma ve bunlara erişme veya göz atma sırasında ayrı
   bir şart ve koşullar bölümü şeklinde sunularak belirtilecektir.  İşbu
   Kullanım Şartlarının söz konusu ürün veya hizmetler için geçerli olduğu
   (ör. web sitelerimizde yer verilmesi sebebiyle) ancak bu ürün veya
   hizmetler için geçerli Ek Şartlar ile tutarlı olmadığı durumlarda
   ilgili Ek Şartlar, işbu Kullanım Şartlarındaki tutarsız hükümlerin
   yerine geçecek ve ilgili ürün veya hizmetler bu Ek Şartlara tabi
   olacaktır.

Mülkiyet

   Hizmetlerin “görünümü ve işlevselliği” (ör. metin, grafikler,
   görüntüler ve logolar) ve Hizmetlerde yer alan tescilli içerik,
   bilgiler ve diğer materyaller dâhil Hizmetler, ABD fikrî mülkiyet,
   telif hakkı, ticari marka yasaları ve diğer yasalar ile uluslararası
   antlaşmalar dâhil olmak üzere yasalarca korunmaktadır.  Hizmetlere ait
   veya ilişkin tüm haklar, mülkiyet hakları ve menfaatlerin (her türlü
   patent, telif hakkı, ticari sır, ticari marka, teknik prosedür
   anlatımı, teknik bilgiler ve bahse konu veya ilgili her türlü diğer
   fikrî mülkiyet hakkı dâhil) Western Digital ve/veya lisansörlerimize
   ait olduğunu onaylamakta ve bu tür mülkiyet menfaatleri ile tutarlı
   olmayan hiçbir eylemde bulunmamayı kabul etmektesiniz.

Kullanım Kısıtlamaları

   İşbu belgede açıkça izin verilmedikçe hiçbir Hizmet bizim veya telif
   hakkı sahibinin önceden yazılı izni alınmadan, elektronik yahut mekanik
   yollarla veya şekillerle yahut fotokopi veya kayıt yoluyla yahut
   şekliyle veya diğer herhangi bir yolla veya şekilde kopyalanamaz,
   çoğaltılamaz, dağıtılamaz, yeniden yayınlanamaz, indirilemez,
   görüntülenemez, paylaşılamaz veya aktarılamaz.  İşbu Kullanım
   Şartlarına uyumunuza tabi olmak suretiyle, Western Digital işbu belge
   ile Hizmetlerde yer alan materyallere erişiminiz ve bu materyalleri
   kullanımınızla ilişkili olarak, bu tür materyalleri değiştirmemeniz,
   satmamanız veya ticari amaçlarla kullanmamanız kaydıyla size ticari
   olmayan kişisel kullanımınız için münhasır olmayan sınırlı bir hak
   vermektedir.  İşbu Kullanım Şartlarından herhangi birini ihlal etmeniz
   halinde bu izin otomatik olarak iptal edilecektir.  İzninizin iptal
   edilmesini takiben, Hizmetlerden elde ettiğiniz her türlü materyali
   derhâl imha etmelisiniz.

   Hizmetlerde yer alan veya Hizmetlerin içerdiği herhangi bir telif hakkı
   veya diğer mülkiyet haklarına ilişkin bildirimleri veya kısıtlı
   hakların göstergesini kaldırmayacağınızı veya değiştirmeyeceğinizi;
   Hizmetleri, güncellemeleri veya bunların herhangi bir kısmını geri
   derlemeyeceğinizi, kaynak koda dönüştürmeyeceğinizi, ters derleme, ters
   kurulum veya başka bir ters mühendislik işlemine tabi tutmayacağınızı
   (sadece yukarıda bahsedilen kısıtlamaya yürürlükteki yasalarca izin
   verilmediği durumlar hariç olmak üzere); Hizmetlerin herhangi bir
   kısmının gizli kaynak kodunu keşfetmeye hiçbir şekilde
   çalışmayacağınızı veya Hizmetlere erişimi kontrol eden veya Hizmetleri
   başka şekilde koruyan herhangi bir işlevi bozmayacağınızı kabul
   etmektesiniz.

   Ayrıca Hizmetleri başka bir tarafı taciz edecek, istismar edecek,
   gizlice izleyecek, tehdit edecek, karalayacak veya bu tarafın haklarını
   çiğneyecek yahut başka türlü ihlal edecek şekilde veya yasa dışı,
   zararlı, tehdit edici, kötüleyici, saldırgan, hileli, onur kırıcı,
   edebe aykırı, müstehcen, hakaret içerikli, bir başkasının gizliliğini
   ihlal edici, menfur veya ırk, etnik köken yahut başka açılardan
   uygunsuz hiçbir içeriği yükleyecek, paylaşacak, e-posta ile gönderecek,
   aktaracak veya başka yollarla oluşturacak şekilde Kullanmamayı kabul
   etmektesiniz.  Western Digital’ın sizin bu tür bir Kullanımınızdan veya
   Hizmetleri Kullanımınız sonucu alabileceğiniz taciz içerikli, tehdit
   edici, onur kırıcı, hakaret içerikli veya yasa dışı ileti veya
   gönderilerden hiçbir şekilde sorumlu olmadığını kabul etmektesiniz.
   Hizmetleri Kullanımınızla bağlantılı olarak yürürlükteki hiçbir yasayı
   kasıtlı veya kasıtsız şekilde ihlal etmeyeceğinizi kabul etmektesiniz.
   Yukarıda bahsi geçen şartlardan herhangi birini ihlal etmeniz halinde
   kovuşturmaya maruz kalmak veya tazminat ödemek durumunda
   kalabilirsiniz.

   İşbu belgede açıkça belirtilmedikçe, işbu Kullanım Şartlarındaki hiçbir
   şeyin bizim veya herhangi bir lisansörümüzün patentleri veya diğer
   fikrî mülkiyet haklarına ilişkin olarak, hukuki engeller yoluyla veya
   dolaylı yahut başka yollarla size lisans verdiği şeklinde
   yorumlanamayacağını onaylamakta ve bu tür lisansları ayrı bir yazılı
   anlaşma ile almaktan sadece sizin sorumlu olduğunuzu kabul
   etmektesiniz.  Herhangi bir Hizmetin izinsiz Kullanımı telif hakkı
   yasalarını, ticari marka yasalarını, gizlilik ve tanıtım yasalarını ve
   iletişim yönetmelikleri ve tüzüklerini ihlal edebilir.

Hesap Oluşturma ve Abonelikler

   Hizmetlerin bazı özelliklerini veya bölümlerini Kullanabilmeniz için
   bir hesap oluşturmanızı isteyebiliriz (bir “Kullanıcı Hesabı”).
   Kullanıcı Hesabınızı Hizmetlerin ilgili bölümünde yer alan hesap
   oluşturma sürecini tamamlayarak oluşturabilirsiniz.  Doğru ve güncel
   hesap bilgilerini vermek sizin sorumluluğunuzdur.

   Kullanıcı Hesabınızın tek yetkili kullanıcısı sizsiniz.  Hizmetlerin
   Kullanımı için Sizin verdiğiniz veya Western Digital’ın verdiği her
   türlü parola ve hesap numarasının gizliliğini korumaktan siz
   sorumlusunuz.  Kullanıcı Hesabınız ile gerçekleştirilen tüm faaliyetler
   tamamen sizin sorumluluğunuz altındadır.  Western Digital, sizin veya
   başka bir kullanıcının Kullanıcı Hesabının kullanılmasını denetlemez ve
   Western Digital bu tür kullanımlardan kaynaklanan her türlü yükümlülüğü
   açıkça reddeder.

Gizlilik Uygulamaları

   Hizmetleri Kullanımınız ayrıca buraya tıklayarak ulaşabileceğiniz
   Gizlilik Bildirimimize (“Gizlilik Bildirimi”) de tabidir.  Gizlilik
   uygulamalarımız hakkında bilgi edinmek için lütfen Gizlilik
   Bildirimimizi inceleyin.

Kullanıcı İçeriğine İlişkin Lisans Verilmesi

   Hizmetleri Kullanımınızın bir koşulu olarak, Hizmetler aracılığıyla
   herhangi bir içeriği veya diğer materyalleri paylaşarak, yükleyerek,
   yayınlayarak, göndererek, görüntüleyerek veya aktararak (“İçeriğiniz”),
   işbu belge ile Western Digital’a İçeriğinize erişme, İçeriğinizi
   kullanma, çoğaltma, aktarma, görüntüleme, yayınlama, dağıtma, halka
   açık şekilde uygulama, halka açık şekilde gösterme, değiştirme,
   uyarlama ve İçeriğinizden türev çalışmalar oluşturma ve İçeriğinizi
   ticari olan veya olmayan her türlü amaca yönelik olarak hâlihazırda
   bilinen veya daha sonra geliştirilecek olan her türlü biçimdeki veya
   ortamdaki diğer çalışmalara dâhil etme konusunda münhasır olmayan,
   süresiz, gayrikabili rücu, telif ücreti gerektirmeyen, dünya çapında
   geçerli, devredilebilir, tamamen alt lisansı verilebilir (Hizmetlerin
   diğer kullanıcılarına alt lisans verilebilmesi de dâhil olmak üzere)
   bir lisans vermektesiniz.  İçeriğinize ilişkin tüm telif hakları dâhil
   olmak üzere her türlü hakka sahip olduğunuzu veya bu hakları başka
   şekilde kontrol ettiğinizi; İçeriğinizin doğru olduğunu ve tanıtım ve
   gizlilik hakları dâhil olmak üzere hiçbir üçüncü tarafın fikrî mülkiyet
   haklarını ihlal etmediğini veya haksız şekilde içermediğini ve
   İçeriğinizin kullanımının işbu Kullanım Şartları veya Gizlilik
   Bildirimini ihlal etmediğini ve hiçbir kişiye veya kuruluşa zarar
   vermeyeceğini beyan ve garanti etmektesiniz.  Sizin ve herhangi bir
   üçüncü tarafın Hizmetler aracılığıyla gönderdiğiniz veya paylaştığınız
   içerik veya diğer materyallere ilişkin hiçbir sorumluluk ve yükümlülük
   kabul etmeyiz.  İçeriğinizin herhangi bir görüntü içermesi halinde bu
   tür görüntülerdeki kişilerin (varsa) görüntülerinin kullanımını işbu
   Kullanım Şartlarında belirtildiği şekilde onayladıklarını beyan ve
   garanti etmektesiniz.

   YEGÂNE TAKDİR YETKİMİZ DOĞRULTUSUNDA HİZMETLERDEKİ HER TÜRLÜ İÇERİK
   VEYA MATERYALİN HERHANGİ BİR YASAYI VEYA HERHANGİ BİR KİŞİNİN HAKKINI
   İHLAL ETTİĞİNİ, HERHANGİ BİR KİŞİNİN HAKLARINI ÇİĞNEDİĞİNİ VEYA
   HİZMETLERDE PAYLAŞILMASININ BAŞKA ŞEKİLDE UYGUNSUZ OLDUĞUNU
   BELİRLEDİĞİMİZ DURUMLAR DÂHİL OLMAK ÜZERE, HERHANGİ BİR NEDENLE BU TÜR
   İÇERİK VEYA MATERYALLERİ ÖN GÖRÜNTÜLEME, REDDETME, DEĞİŞTİRME VEYA
   KALDIRMA HAKKIMIZI SAKLI TUTARIZ.

Amerika Birleşik Devletleri Dışından Erişim

   Hizmetleri Amerika Birleşik Devletleri’nde yer alan ofislerimizden
   kontrol etmekte ve yürütmekteyiz.  Hizmetlerin diğer konumlarda
   Kullanımının uygun veya mümkün olduğu konusunda hiçbir beyanda
   bulunmayız ve Hizmetlere, içeriklerinin yasa dışı görüldüğü bölgelerden
   erişilmesi yasaktır.  Hizmetleri diğer konumlardan Kullanmayı tercih
   eden kişiler bunu kendi inisiyatifleri doğrultusunda yaparlar ve
   yürürlükteki yerel yasalara uymaktan sorumludurlar.  Hizmetleri diğer
   konumlardan Kullanmanız halinde diğer ülkelerin ihracat ve ithalat
   yönetmelikleri dâhil olmak üzere yürürlükteki yerel yasalara uymaktan
   sorumlusunuz.  İçeriğindeki materyaller de dâhil olmak üzere
   Hizmetlerin bir kısmı veya tümünün ABD İhracat İdaresi Yasaları ve
   Yönetmelikleri, ABD Hazine Bakanlığı Yabancı Varlıkları Kontrol Ofisi
   (“OFAC”) Ekonomik Yaptırımlar Yönetmeliğinin yanı sıra diğer ülkelerin
   ihracat yasalarına tabi olabileceğini ve Hizmetlerin ABD veya ilgili
   diğer ülkelerin yasalarının aksi yönde değiştirilmesinin yasak olduğunu
   onaylamaktasınız.  Hiçbir Hizmetin veya ilgili hiçbir ürünün doğrudan
   veya dolaylı olarak yasaklı veya ambargolu ülkelere veya bunların
   vatandaşlarına gönderilmediğini, aktarılmadığını, ihraç edilmediğini
   veya yeniden ihraç edilmediğini veya bu ülke yahut vatandaşlar için
   elde edilmediğini ve tüm bunların gelecekte de yapılmayacağını ve
   hiçbir Hizmetin veya ilgili hiçbir ürünün Amerika Birleşik Devletleri
   hükümeti (veya ilgili diğer hükümetler) tarafından ilgili amaçlar için
   kullanımına özellikle izin verilmediği sürece nükleer faaliyetler,
   kimyasal veya biyolojik silahlar veya füze projeleri için
   Kullanılmayacağını kabul etmektesiniz.  Web sitesine erişerek, Amerika
   Birleşik Devletleri hükümetinin ambargosuna tabi hiçbir ülke veya
   bölgenin vatandaşı veya mukimi olmadığınızı ve böyle bir ülke veya
   bölgede mutat olarak ikamet etmediğinizi ve OFAC özel olarak
   belirlenmiş uluslar ve engellenmiş kişiler listesinde yer alan
   yaptırıma tabi bir taraf olarak listelenmediğinizi beyan ve garanti
   etmektesiniz.  Ayrıca tüm ihracat, yeniden ihracat ve ithalat
   yasalarına harfiyen uyacağınızı ve gerekebilecek ihracat, yeniden
   ihracat veya ithalat lisanslarını almanın sadece sizin sorumluluğunuz
   olduğunu kabul etmektesiniz.

Üçüncü Taraf Sitelerine ve Uygulamalarına Bağlantılar

   Hizmetler üçüncü taraf web sitelerine veya uygulamalarına bağlantılar
   içerebilir.  Ancak bu diğer web sitelerini veya uygulamaları kontrol
   etmediğimizi ve bunlardan sorumlu olmadığımızı lütfen unutmayın.
   Western Digital, Hizmetler aracılığıyla ulaşabileceğiniz diğer web
   sitelerine veya uygulamalara ilişkin hiçbir beyanda bulunmaz.  Western
   Digital şirket logosunu taşısa dahi, üçüncü taraf bir web sitesine veya
   uygulamasına eriştiğinizde, web sitesinin veya uygulamanın kullanım
   şartlarını kabul ettiğinizden ve web sitesinin veya uygulamanın virüs,
   solucan, truva atı yahut başka bir zararlı öğe içermediğinden emin
   olmak için gerekli önlemleri almak sizin sorumluluğunuzdur.  Western
   Digital’ın hiçbir koşul altında üçüncü taraf web siteleri veya
   uygulamalarından hiçbir şekilde sorumlu olmayacağını kabul
   etmektesiniz.

Yükümlülük Sınırlaması

   YÜRÜRLÜKTEKİ YASALARIN İZİN VERDİĞİ MAKSİMUM ÖLÇÜDE, BİZ VE
   DİREKTÖRLERİMİZ, GÖREVLİLERİMİZ, ÇALIŞANLARIMIZ VE DANIŞMANLARIMIZ
   (BİRLİKTE “WESTERN DIGITAL TARAFLARI”) HİZMETLERİN KULLANILMASI,
   DEĞİŞTİRİLMESİ, KOPYALANMASI, DAĞITILMASI, İNDİRİLMESİ YAHUT HİZMETLERE
   KATKIDA BULUNULMASINDAN VEYA BUNLARIN YAPILAMAMASINDAN KAYNAKLANAN
   HİÇBİR ZARARDAN SORUMLU DEĞİLDİR.  WESTERN DIGITAL TARAFLARI HİÇBİR
   KOŞUL ALTINDA, İHLAL VEYA HAKSIZ FİİL SONUCU OLUP OLMAMASI VEYA SEBEBİ
   FARK ETMEKSİZİN DOLAYLI, OLAĞAN DIŞI, EMSAL, CEZAİ, ÖZEL, ARIZİ VEYA
   NETİCE KABİLİNDEN DOĞAN HİÇBİR ZARARDAN (VERİ, GELİR, KÂR, KULLANIM
   VEYA DİĞER EKONOMİK AVANTAJ KAYBI DÂHİL), BU TÜR ZARARLARIN
   OLASILIĞINDAN DAHA ÖNCE HABERDAR OLSALAR DAHİ SORUMLU DEĞİLDİR.

   HİZMETLER İLE BAĞLANTILI OLARAK KULLANILAN VERİLER VE/VEYA EKİPMAN İÇİN
   YETERLİ KORUMAYI SAĞLAMAK VE YEDEKLEMEYİ YAPMAKTAN SADECE SİZİN SORUMLU
   OLDUĞUNUZU VE HİZMETLERİN KULLANIMINDAN YAHUT KULLANILAMAMASINDAN
   KAYNAKLANAN VERİ KAYBI, HATALI ÇIKTI, İŞ GECİKMELERİ VEYA KÂR KAYBI
   KONUSUNDA WESTERN DIGITAL TARAFLARINA HİÇBİR ŞEKİLDE DAVA
   AÇAMAYACAĞINIZI KABUL ETMEKTESİNİZ.

   HİZMETLERE İLİŞKİN TÜM DAVALARDA WESTERN DIGITAL TARAFLARINI HİÇBİR
   ŞEKİLDE SORUMLU TUTMAMAYI KABUL ETMEKTE VE WESTERN DIGITAL TARAFLARINA
   DAVA AÇMAYACAĞINIZI BEYAN ETMEKTESİNİZ.  HİZMETLER VEYA İŞBU KULLANIM
   ŞARTLARI İLE BAĞLANTILI OLARAK WESTERN DIGITAL TARAFLARINDAN HERHANGİ
   BİRİNDEN TAZMİNAT ALMAYA YÖNELİK BİR DAYANAĞINIZ VARSA (İŞBU KULLANIM
   ŞARTLARININ İHLALİ DÂHİL) MÜNHASIR ÇÖZÜM YOLUNUZUN WESTERN DIGITAL
   TARAFLARINDAN İHLALİN MEYDANA GELDİĞİ AYA İLİŞKİN HİZMET ÜCRETİNİZE EŞ
   DEĞER MİKTARDA (MAKSİMUM) (VEYA İDDİALAR ÜCRETSİZ HİZMETLERE İLİŞKİNSE
   MAKSİMUM 100,00 $) OLACAK ŞEKİLDE TAZMİNAT ALMAK OLDUĞUNU KABUL
   ETMEKTESİNİZ.

   WESTERN DIGITAL TARAFLARININ YÜKÜMLÜLÜĞÜNE İLİŞKİN BU SINIRLAMALAR,
   WESTERN DIGITAL’IN BU TÜR KAYIPLARIN OLASILIĞINDAN HABERDAR EDİLMİŞ
   OLUP OLMAMASI VEYA BUNLARIN FARKINDA OLMASININ GEREKİP GEREKMEMESİ FARK
   ETMEKSİZİN GEÇERLİDİR.  BAZI ÜLKELER ARIZİ VEYA NETİCE KABİLİNDEN DOĞAN
   ZARARLARIN REDDEDİLMESİ VEYA SINIRLANDIRILMASINA MÜSAADE ETMEDİĞİ İÇİN
   YUKARIDAKİ RETLER VEYA SINIRLAMALAR SİZİN İÇİN GEÇERLİ OLMAYABİLİR.

Sorumluluk Reddi

   HİZMETLERİN KULLANIMI İLE İLİŞKİLİ RİSKLERDEN SADECE SİZİN SORUMLU
   OLDUĞUNUZU VE TATMİN EDİCİ KALİTE, PERFORMANS, DOĞRULUK VE ÇABAYA
   İLİŞKİN RİSKLERİN TÜM SORUMLULUĞUNU ÜSTLENDİĞİNİZİ AÇIKÇA
   ONAYLAMAKTASINIZ.  HİZMETLERİN TÜM KISIMLARI WESTERN DIGITAL TARAFINDAN
   GARANTİ SUNULMAKSIZIN VE HİÇBİR GARANTİ BEYANINDA BULUNULMAKSIZIN,
   “OLDUĞU GİBİ”, “GARANTİ VERİLMEKSİZİN” VE “MEVCUT HALİYLE”
   SAĞLANMAKTADIR.  WESTERN DIGITAL İŞBU BELGE İLE BELİRLİ BİR AMACA
   UYGUNLUK, PAZARLANABİLİRLİK, İHLALİN SÖZ KONUSU OLMAMASI VE MÜLKİYET
   HAKKINA YÖNELİK HER TÜRLÜ ZIMNİ GARANTİ DÂHİL OLMAK ÜZERE HİZMETLERE
   İLİŞKİN (KULLANIM, PERFORMANS VE DESTEK DÂHİL) AÇIK, ZIMNİ, YASAL VEYA
   DİĞER TÜM BEYANLARI, GARANTİLERİ VE KOŞULLARI AÇIKÇA REDDEDER.  WESTERN
   DIGITAL HİZMETLERDEN ELDE EDİLEN SONUÇLARIN VEYA ÇIKTILARIN DOĞRULUĞU
   KONUSUNDA HERHANGİ BİR GÜVENCE VERMEZ.

Telif Hakkı Politikası ve Dijital Binyıl Telif Hakkı Yasası Telif Hakkı İhlal
İddiaları

   Title 17, ABD Kanunu, Bölüm 512(c) uyarınca Western Digital, Dijital
   Binyıl Telif Hakkı Yasası ve yürürlükteki diğer fikrî mülkiyet
   yasalarına uyuma ilişkin iddia edilen ihlal bildirimlerini, politikası
   gereği yanıtlar.  Başkalarının fikrî mülkiyet haklarına da saygı
   gösteririz.  Çalışmanızın telif hakkı ihlali teşkil edecek şekilde
   kopyalandığını düşünüyorsanız lütfen Telif Hakkı Politikamızda
   belirtildiği şekilde ilgili prosedürü izleyin.

Ticari Marka Kullanım Politikası

   Ürünlerimiz ve hizmetlerimiz sunulurken görünen ticari markalar,
   logolar ve hizmet markaları (birlikte “Markalar”) Western Digital veya
   üçüncü tarafların mülkiyetindedir.  Western Digital’ın Markaları sadece
   sınırlı koşullar altında ve Western Digital’ın önceden yazılı onayı
   alınarak kullanılabilir.  Her vaka için ayrı onay verilir.  Onaylı tüm
   kullanımların Ticari Marka ve Logo Kullanım Kılavuzumuza harfiyen uygun
   olması gerekir.  Western Digital Markalarının listesi için buraya
   tıklayın; ancak bu listenin tüm markaları içermediğini göz önünde
   bulundurun.

ABD Hükümetinin Kısıtlı Hakları

   Hizmetler “KISITLI HAKLAR” ile sunulmaktadır.  Amerika Birleşik
   Devletleri hükümeti tarafından kullanım, kopyalama veya açıklama
   FAR52.227-14 ve DFAR252.227-7013 ve sonraki sayfalarda, bunların yerine
   geçecek yönetmeliklerde veya yürürlükteki diğer yasa ve yönetmeliklerde
   belirtildiği üzere kısıtlamalara tabidir.  Hizmetlerin Amerika Birleşik
   Devletleri hükümeti tarafından Kullanımı, Hizmetlere ilişkin mülkiyet
   haklarımızın kabul edildiği anlamına gelmektedir.

Hukukun Seçimi; Bölünebilirlik

   Hizmetlerin Kullanımı (veya Kullanılamaması) dâhil olmak üzere
   Hizmetlerden kaynaklanan veya Hizmetlerle ilgili her türlü dava
   kanunlar ihtilafı ilkelerine bakılmaksızın Kaliforniya Eyaleti
   yasalarına tabidir.  Hizmetleri Kullanımınızdan kaynaklanan veya
   bunlarla ilgili her türlü ihtilafın çözümü için Santa Clara County,
   Kaliforniya’daki eyalet mahkemeleri ve federal mahkemelerin münhasır
   yargı çevresine başvurmayı kabul etmektesiniz.  İşbu Kullanım
   Şartlarının herhangi bir hükmünün geçersiz veya herhangi bir sebeple
   uygulanamaz kabul edilmesi halinde, söz konusu hüküm bölünebilir kabul
   edilir ve bu durum, işbu Kullanım Şartlarının kalan hükümlerinin
   geçerliliği veya uygulanabilirliğini etkilemez.

   Kaliforniya’daki Hizmet kullanıcıları aşağıdaki özel tüketici hakları
   bildirimini alma hakkına sahiptirler: Kaliforniya Tüketici İşleri
   Bakanlığının Tüketici Hizmetleri Bölümünün Şikâyet Yardım Birimine 1625
   North Market Blvd., Suite N 112, Sacramento, CA 95834 adresine posta
   göndererek veya (800) 952-5210 numaralı telefonu arayarak ulaşılabilir.

İleriye Yönelik İfadeler

   investor.wdc.com gibi web sitelerimiz dâhil olmak üzere Hizmetlerimizde
   yer alan bazı bilgiler gelecekteki etkinlikler, gelecekteki operasyonel
   veya finansal planlarımız veya performansımız, öngörülen büyümemiz,
   işimizdeki ve faaliyet gösterdiğimiz piyasalardaki eğilimler ve
   gelecekteki etkinliklerin veya koşulların diğer özellikleri ile ilgili
   ifadeler dâhil olmak üzere, federal menkul kıymetler yasaları
   kapsamında ileriye yönelik ifadeler içerebilir.  Tarihsel olgu
   niteliğinde olmayan tüm ifadeler bizim mevcut beklentilerimize
   dayanmaktadır ve gerçek sonuçların ileriye yönelik ifadelerde açıkça
   belirtilen veya ima edilenlerden çok daha farklı şekilde tezahür
   etmesine sebep olabilecek bir takım risklere ve belirsizliklere
   tabidir.  İşimizi etkileyebilecek risklere ve belirsizliklere ilişkin
   daha fazla bilgiye, ABD Sermaye Piyasası Kuruluna (“SEC”) sunduğumuz ve
   aralarında en güncel periyodik raporumuzun da yer aldığı raporlardan ve
   SEC’nin www.sec.gov adresindeki web sitesinden ulaşabilirsiniz.
   İleriye yönelik bu ifadelerin kesin olmadığını dikkate almalısınız.
   Yeni bilgilerin veya gelecekteki gelişmelerin sonucunda veya başka
   sebeplerle olsun veya olmasın, yasalarca gerekmedikçe hiçbir ileriye
   yönelik ifadeyi kamuya açık şekilde güncelleme veya revize etme
   yükümlülüğümüz bulunmamaktadır.

Hizmetlerdeki Değişiklikler

   Western Digital, Hizmetleri (yahut bunların bir kısmını) veya
   Hizmetlerde tanımlanan ürünleri veya hizmetleri bildirimde
   bulunmaksızın dilediği an, geçici veya kalıcı olarak değiştirme veya
   sonlandırma hakkını saklı tutar.  Hizmetlere veya Hizmetlerin herhangi
   bir kısmına son verilmesini takiben, Western Digital İçeriğinizi veya
   diğer verileri saklama veya sunmaya yönelik hiçbir yükümlülük taşımaz.

İletişim

   İşbu Kullanım Şartları ile ilgili sorunuzun, şikâyetinizin veya
   yorumunuzun olması veya Hizmetlerle ilgili daha fazla bilgi almak yahut
   Western Digital ile başka amaçlarla irtibat kurmayı istemeniz halinde
   lütfen Western Digital İle İletişim sayfamızda yer alan bilgileri
   kullanarak bizimle iletişime geçin.

     * {{unescape(item.title)}}
          + {{anchor.title}}

   Dernière mise à jour le 28 mai 2018.

   Les présentes Conditions d’Utilisation (les présentes « Conditions
   d’Utilisation ») régissent votre Utilisation (ainsi qu’il est défini
   ci-dessous) des sites Internet proposés par Western Digital
   Technologies, Inc. et/ou ses sociétés affiliées (collectivement,
   « Western Digital », « nous », « notre » ou « nos ») ainsi que le
   contenu, les fonctions, les matériels, les logiciels et la
   documentation apparentée, et les services disponibles sur lesdits sites
   Internet (lesdits sites Internet, contenu, fonctions, matériels,
   logiciels et documentation apparentée, et services étant dénommés
   collectivement les « Services »).

   IMPORTANT – VEUILLEZ LIRE ATTENTIVEMENT – Si vous n’acceptez pas les
   présentes Conditions d’Utilisation, vous n’êtes alors pas autorisé à
   Utiliser les Services.

   Pour vous aider à naviguer et à trouver des sections spécifiques des
   présentes Conditions d’Utilisation, veuillez vous référer à la présente
   table des matières ci-dessous :

Acceptation des présentes Conditions d’utilisation

   En Utilisant (ainsi qu’il est défini ci-dessous) les Services : vous
   déclarez et garantissez être majeur au sein de votre juridiction et
   avoir le pouvoir de, être habilité à, et être autorisé à conclure et
   être lié par les présentes Conditions d’Utilisation ; vous reconnaissez
   avoir lu et compris les présentes Conditions d’Utilisation, et acceptez
   d’être lié par ces dernières ; et vous convenez de vous conformer à
   l’ensemble des lois et réglementations applicables en relation avec
   votre Utilisation des Services.

   Si vous Utilisez les Services pour le compte d’une société, entreprise,
   ou autre entité, alors :  « vous » comprend votre personne et ladite
   entité ; vous déclarez et garantissez être un représentant dûment
   habilité de l’entité avec le pouvoir de lier l’entité aux présentes
   Conditions d’Utilisation et accepter les présentes Conditions
   d’Utilisation pour le compte de l’entité ; et vous convenez que ladite
   entité est légalement et financièrement responsable de votre
   Utilisation des Services ainsi que de l’utilisation de votre Compte
   Utilisateur (ainsi qu’il est défini ci-dessous) par d’autres personnes
   affiliées à votre entité, y compris tout employé, agent, ou
   sous-traitant.

Interprétation

   Aux fins des présentes Conditions d’Utilisation : le verbe commençant
   par une majuscule « Utiliser » désigne accéder aux, naviguer dans,
   créer un Compte Utilisateur (ainsi qu’il est défini ci-dessous) sur,
   télécharger du contenu ou matériel sur, télécharger du contenu ou
   matériel depuis, ou utiliser autrement les Services (et le nom
   « Utilisation » ainsi que le terme « Utilisant » auront les
   significations connexes) ; les termes « vous », « votre » et « vos »
   vous désignent en tant qu’utilisateur qui Utilise les Services ; et
   l’ensemble des références aux mots « comprend », « y compris », ou
   « comprenant » sont réputées être suivies des mots « sans limitation ».

Modifications des présentes Conditions d’utilisation

   NOUS POUVONS, À NOTRE DISCRÉTION EXCLUSIVE, MODIFIER LES PRÉSENTES
   CONDITIONS D’UTILISATION À TOUT MOMENT EN METTANT À JOUR LA PRÉSENTE
   PAGE.  SI VOUS CONTINUEZ D’UTILISER LES SERVICES APRÈS TOUTE DITE
   MODIFICATION, VOUS ÊTES ALORS LIÉ PAR LADITE MODIFICATION.  VOUS DEVEZ
   PAR CONSÉQUENT CONSULTER RÉGULIÈREMENT LA PRÉSENTE PAGE POUR EXAMINER
   LES PRÉSENTES CONDITIONS D’UTILISATION.  SI VOUS N’ACCEPTEZ PAS TOUTE
   MODIFICATION, VOUS N’ÊTES PAS AUTORISÉ À CONTINUER D’UTILISER LES
   SERVICES.

Conditions supplémentaires

   Nous proposons un large éventail de produits et services, y compris des
   produits et services logiciels.  Certains produits ou services
   disponibles sur nos sites Internet peuvent être soumis à d’autres
   modalités ou à des modalités supplémentaires (« Conditions
   supplémentaires »).  Lesdites Conditions supplémentaires seront mises à
   disposition avec les produits ou services pertinents, comme, par
   exemple, en étant publiées directement sur le site Internet desdits
   produits ou services ou en étant présentées sous forme de modalités
   séparées au moment de l’achat, du téléchargement, de l'accès, de la
   navigation, ou de l’utilisation desdits produits ou services.  Dans la
   mesure où les présentes Conditions d’Utilisation s’appliquent auxdits
   produits ou services (par ex. parce qu’elles sont mises à disposition
   sur nos sites Internet) mais sont en contradiction avec les Conditions
   supplémentaires s’appliquant auxdits produits ou services, lesdites
   Conditions supplémentaires remplaceront les dispositions
   contradictoires des présentes Conditions d’Utilisation et prévaudront
   eu égard auxdits produits ou services.

Propriété

   Les Services, y compris leurs « aspect et convivialité » (par ex.
   texte, graphiques, images, et logos), contenu exclusif, informations,
   et autres matériels contenus sur les Services, sont protégés par la
   loi, y compris les lois américaines relatives à la propriété
   intellectuelle, aux droits d’auteur, aux marques de commerce, et autres
   lois, et traités internationaux.  Vous reconnaissez que Western Digital
   détient et/ou nos concédants de licences détiennent l’ensemble des
   droits, titres de propriété, et intérêts dans les et afférents aux
   Services (y compris tout(e) et tous/toutes brevets, droits d’auteur,
   secrets industriels, marques de commerce, démonstrations, et
   savoir-faire, et tout et tous autres droits de propriété intellectuelle
   dans ces derniers ou apparentés à ces derniers), et vous convenez de ne
   prendre aucune mesure en contradiction avec lesdits droits de
   propriété.

Restrictions d’Utilisation

   Sauf ainsi qu’il est expressément autorisé dans les présentes, aucun
   des Services ne peut être copié, reproduit, distribué, republié,
   téléchargé, affiché, publié, ou transmis sous quelque forme ou par
   quelque moyen que ce soit, y compris électronique, mécanique,
   photocopie, enregistrement, ou autre, sans notre autorisation préalable
   par écrit ou l’autorisation préalable par écrit du propriétaire des
   droits d’auteur.  Sous réserve de votre conformité aux présentes
   Conditions d’Utilisation, Western Digital vous octroie par les
   présentes un droit non exclusif et limité d’accéder aux et d’utiliser
   les matériels contenus sur les Services, dans chaque cas pour un usage
   non commercial, personnel uniquement, et à condition que vous ne
   modifiez pas, ne revendiez pas, ou n’utilisiez pas à des fins
   commerciales lesdits matériels.  Ladite autorisation prend
   automatiquement fin si vous commettez une violation de l’une quelconque
   des présentes Conditions d'utilisation.  Lorsque ladite autorisation
   prend fin, vous devez immédiatement détruire tout matériel obtenu à
   partir des Services.

   Vous convenez de ne pas : supprimer ou modifier toute mention de droits
   d’auteur ou d’autres droits exclusifs ou toute légende de droits
   restrictifs contenue ou comprise dans les Services ; décompiler,
   désassembler, rétro-compiler, rétro-assembler, ou rétro-concevoir
   autrement tout Service, toute mise à jour, ou toute partie de ces
   derniers (sauf et uniquement dans la mesure où toute restriction qui
   précède est interdite par la loi applicable) ; utiliser quelque moyen
   que ce soit pour découvrir tout code source confidentiel de toute
   partie des Services ; ou contourner toute fonctionnalité qui contrôle
   l’accès aux ou protège autrement les Services.

   Vous convenez également de ne pas Utiliser les Services de quelque
   manière que ce soit pour harceler, utiliser abusivement, persécuter,
   menacer, diffamer, enfreindre, ou violer autrement les droits de toute
   autre partie, ou pour télécharger, publier, envoyer par e-mail,
   transmettre, ou mettre autrement à disposition tout contenu qui est
   illégal, préjudiciable, menaçant, abusif, importun, délictueux,
   diffamatoire, vulgaire, obscène, calomnieux, porte atteinte à la vie
   privée d’une autre personne, est haineux, ou répréhensible sur le plan
   racial, ethnique, ou autre.  Vous convenez que Western Digital décline
   toute responsabilité quant à toute dite Utilisation de votre part, ou
   quant à tout(e) message ou transmission importun(e), menaçant(e),
   diffamatoire, offensant(e), ou illégal(e) que vous pouvez recevoir
   suite à l’Utilisation des Services.  Vous convenez que vous
   n’enfreindrez volontairement ou involontairement aucune loi applicable
   en relation avec votre Utilisation des Services.  Si vous commettez une
   violation de ce qui précède, vous pouvez être passible de poursuites et
   de dommages-intérêts.

   Vous reconnaissez que, sauf ainsi qu’il est expressément énoncé dans
   les présentes, aucune disposition des présentes Conditions
   d’Utilisation ne sera interprétée comme vous conférant une quelconque
   licence dans nos brevets ou autres droits de propriété intellectuelle
   ou ceux de l’un quelconque de nos concédants de licences, que ce soit
   par préclusion, implication, ou autrement, et vous convenez que vous
   assumez la responsabilité exclusive quant à l’obtention desdites
   licences au moyen d'un accord écrit distinct.  Toute Utilisation non
   autorisée de tout Service peut enfreindre les lois relatives aux droits
   d’auteur et aux marques de commerce, les lois relatives à la
   confidentialité et à la protection de la personnalité, ainsi que les
   réglementations et les lois écrites relatives aux communications.

Inscription et abonnements

   Nous pouvons vous demander de vous inscrire en créant un compte pour
   Utiliser certaines fonctions ou sections des Services (un « Compte
   Utilisateur »).  Vous pouvez créer un Compte Utilisateur en suivant la
   procédure d'inscription énoncée à la section correspondante des
   Services.  Vous êtes tenu de fournir des informations de compte exactes
   et à jour.

   Vous êtes l’unique utilisateur autorisé de votre Compte Utilisateur.
   Vous êtes responsable de la préservation de la confidentialité de tout
   mot de passe et tout numéro de compte que vous fournissez ou qui sont
   fournis par Western Digital pour Utiliser les Services.  Vous êtes
   pleinement responsable de l’ensemble des activités survenant au titre
   de votre Compte Utilisateur.  Western Digital ne peut pas exercer un
   contrôle sur l’utilisation de votre Compte Utilisateur ou du Compte
   Utilisateur de tout autre utilisateur, et Western Digital rejette
   expressément toute responsabilité en découlant.

Pratiques de confidentialité

   Votre Utilisation des Services est également soumise à notre
   Déclaration de Confidentialité, qui est disponible en cliquant ici (la
   « Déclaration de Confidentialité »).  Veuillez lire la Déclaration de
   Confidentialité pour en savoir plus sur nos pratiques de
   confidentialité.

Octroi de licences de contenu utilisateur

   Comme condition de votre Utilisation des Services, en postant,
   téléchargeant, publiant, soumettant, affichant, ou transmettant tout
   contenu ou tous autres matériels à travers les Services (« Votre
   Contenu »), vous octroyez par les présentes à Western Digital une
   licence non-exclusive, perpétuelle, irrévocable, exempte de redevance,
   mondiale, cessible, entièrement sous-licenciable (y compris à d’autres
   utilisateurs des Services) pour accéder à, utiliser, reproduire,
   transmettre, afficher, publier, distribuer, présenter en public,
   afficher en public, modifier, adapter, et créer des œuvres dérivées de
   Votre Contenu et pour incorporer Votre Contenu à d’autres œuvres sous
   quelque format ou sur quelque support que ce soit aujourd’hui connu ou
   développé ultérieurement à toute et toutes fins commerciales ou
   non-commerciales.  Vous déclarez et garantissez : que vous détenez ou
   contrôlez autrement l’ensemble des droits afférents à Votre Contenu, y
   compris l’ensemble des droits d’auteur ; que Votre Contenu est exact et
   n’enfreint pas ou ne détourne pas les droits de propriété
   intellectuelle de tout tiers, y compris les droits à la protection de
   la personnalité et au respect de la vie privée ; et que l’utilisation
   de Votre Contenu ne viole pas les présentes Conditions d’Utilisation ou
   la Déclaration de Confidentialité et ne portera préjudice à aucune
   personne ou entité.  Nous déclinons toute responsabilité et n’assumons
   aucune responsabilité quant à tout contenu ou tous autres matériels
   soumis ou publié(s) à travers les Services par vous ou tout tiers.
   Dans la mesure où Votre Contenu contient toute image, vous déclarez et
   garantissez également que chaque personne illustrée dans lesdites
   images, le cas échéant, a donné son consentement à l’utilisation des
   images ainsi qu’il est énoncé dans les présentes Conditions
   d’Utilisation.

   NOUS NOUS RÉSERVONS LE DROIT DE PRÉ-FILTRER, REFUSER, MODIFIER, OU
   SUPPRIMER TOUT CONTENU OU MATÉRIEL SUR LES SERVICES POUR QUELQUE RAISON
   QUE CE SOIT, Y COMPRIS SI NOUS DÉTERMINONS À NOTRE DISCRÉTION EXCLUSIVE
   QUE LEDIT CONTENU OU MATÉRIEL ENFREINT TOUTE LOI OU TOUT DROIT DE TOUTE
   PERSONNE, PORTE ATTEINTE AUX DROITS DE TOUTE PERSONNE, OU QUE SA
   PUBLICATION SUR LES SERVICES EST AUTREMENT INAPPROPRIÉE.

Accès en dehors des États-Unis

   Nous contrôlons et exploitons les Services depuis nos bureaux aux
   États-Unis.  Nous ne soumettons aucune déclaration selon laquelle
   l’Utilisation des Services est  appropriée ou disponible dans d’autres
   pays, et l’accès à ces derniers depuis des territoires où leur contenu
   est illégal est interdit.  Les personnes qui choisissent d’Utiliser les
   Services depuis d’autres pays le font de leur propre chef et sont
   responsables de la conformité aux lois locales applicables.  Si vous
   Utilisez les Services depuis d’autres pays, vous êtes responsable de la
   conformité aux lois locales applicables, y compris les réglementations
   d’exportation et d’importation d’autres pays.  Vous reconnaissez qu’une
   partie ou la totalité des Services, y compris les matériels contenus
   sur ces derniers, peut être soumise aux Lois et Réglementations
   américaines relatives à l’administration des exportations, aux
   Réglementations relatives aux sanctions économiques du Bureau de
   Contrôle des Avoirs Étrangers (« OFAC ») du Ministère américain des
   Finances, ainsi qu’aux lois d’exportation d’autres pays et qu’un
   détournement des Services contraire à la loi des États-Unis ou d’autres
   pays concernés est interdit.  Vous convenez qu’aucun des Services, ni
   aucun produit direct de ces derniers, ne sont ou ne seront acquis pour,
   expédiés, transférés, exportés, ou réexportés, directement ou
   indirectement, vers des pays interdits ou sous embargo ou leurs
   ressortissants, ou ne seront Utilisés pour des activités nucléaires,
   des armes chimiques et biologiques, ou des projets de missiles, sauf
   autorisation spécifique du gouvernement des États-Unis (ou autre
   gouvernement compétent) auxdites fins.  En accédant au site Internet,
   vous déclarez et garantissez que vous n’êtes ni un ressortissant ni un
   résident de, et n’êtes pas un résident habituel de, tout(e) pays ou
   région soumis(e) à un embargo par le gouvernement des États-Unis, et
   que vous ne figurez pas en tant que partie faisant l’objet de sanctions
   sur la liste des ressortissants expressément identifiés et des
   personnes dont les avoirs sont bloqués (« specially designated
   nationals » et « blocked persons ») tenue par l’OFAC.  Vous convenez de
   vous conformer rigoureusement à l’ensemble des lois d’exportation, de
   réexportation, et d’importation et d’assumer la responsabilité
   exclusive quant à l’obtention de licences d’exportation, de
   réexportation, ou d’importation selon les besoins.

Liens vers des sites et applications de tiers

   Les Services peuvent contenir des liens vers des sites Internet ou
   applications de tiers.  Veuillez toutefois noter que nous déclinons
   toute responsabilité quant auxdits/auxdites autres sites Internet ou
   applications et ne contrôlons pas ces derniers/dernières.  Western
   Digital ne soumet aucune déclaration quelle qu’elle soit au sujet de
   tout(e) autre site Internet ou application auquel/à laquelle vous
   pouvez accéder à travers les Services.  Lorsque vous accédez à un site
   Internet ou à une application de tiers, même un(e) pouvant afficher un
   logo de la société Western Digital, il vous incombe de prendre des
   précautions pour vous assurer d’accepter les conditions d’utilisation
   dudit site Internet ou de ladite application et que le site Internet ou
   l’application ne contienne pas d’éléments tels que virus, vers
   informatiques, chevaux de Troie, et autres éléments de nature
   destructrice.  Vous convenez que Western Digital ne sera en aucun cas
   responsable de quelque manière que ce soit de tout(e) site Internet ou
   application de tiers.

Limitation de responsabilité

   DANS LA MESURE MAXIMUM PERMISE PAR LA LOI APPLICABLE, NOUS ET NOS
   ADMINISTRATEURS, MEMBRES DU BUREAU, EMPLOYÉS, ET CONSULTANTS
   (COLLECTIVEMENT, « LES PARTIES WESTERN DIGITAL ») DÉCLINONS TOUTE
   RESPONSABILITÉ QUANT À TOUT DOMMAGE SUBI SUITE À L’UTILISATION, LA
   MODIFICATION, LA CONTRIBUTION, LA COPIE, LA DISTRIBUTION, OU AU
   TÉLÉCHARGEMENT DES SERVICES OU À L’INCAPACITÉ À FAIRE CE QUI PRÉCÈDE.
   LES PARTIES WESTERN DIGITAL NE SERONT EN AUCUN CAS RESPONSABLES QUANT À
   TOUT DOMMAGE INDIRECT, EXTRAORDINAIRE, EXEMPLAIRE, PUNITIF,
   PARTICULIER, ACCESSOIRE, OU CONSÉCUTIF (Y COMPRIS PERTE DE DONNÉES, DE
   REVENUS, DE BÉNÉFICES, DE JOUISSANCE, OU DE TOUT AUTRE AVANTAGE
   ÉCONOMIQUE), QUELLE QU’EN SOIT LA CAUSE, DÉCOULANT D’UNE VIOLATION OU
   D’UNE RESPONSABILITÉ DÉLICTUELLE, MÊME SI LES PARTIES WESTERN DIGITAL
   ONT ÉTÉ PRÉALABLEMENT INFORMÉES DE LA POSSIBILITÉ DESDITS DOMMAGES.

   VOUS CONVENEZ D’ASSUMER L’UNIQUE RESPONSABILITÉ QUANT À UNE PROTECTION
   ET UNE SAUVEGARDE ADÉQUATES DES DONNÉES ET/OU ÉQUIPEMENTS UTILISÉ(E)S
   EN RELATION AVEC LES SERVICES ET DE NE SOUMETTRE AUCUNE RÉCLAMATION DE
   QUELQUE  NATURE QUE CE SOIT À L’ENCONTRE DES PARTIES WESTERN DIGITAL
   POUR PERTE DE DONNÉES, RÉSULTAT INEXACT, RETARDS DANS LE TRAVAIL, OU
   PERTE DE BÉNÉFICES RÉSULTANT DE L’UTILISATION DES SERVICES, OU DE
   L’INCAPACITÉ À UTILISER CES DERNIERS.

   VOUS CONVENEZ DE TENIR LES PARTIES WESTERN DIGITAL ENTIÈREMENT À
   COUVERT CONTRE, ET VOUS VOUS ENGAGEZ À NE PAS POURSUIVRE LES PARTIES
   WESTERN DIGITAL POUR, TOUTE RÉCLAMATION APPARENTÉE AUX SERVICES.  SI
   VOUS AVEZ TOUT FONDEMENT POUR INTENTER UNE ACTION EN DOMMAGES ET
   INTÉRÊTS (Y COMPRIS UNE VIOLATION DES PRÉSENTES CONDITIONS
   D’UTILISATION) À L’ENCONTRE DE TOUTE PARTIE WESTERN DIGITAL EN RELATION
   AVEC LES SERVICES OU LES PRÉSENTES CONDITIONS D’UTILISATION, VOUS
   CONVENEZ QUE VOTRE VOIE DE RECOURS EXCLUSIVE CONSISTE À RECOUVRER
   AUPRÈS DES PARTIES WESTERN DIGITAL DES DOMMAGES ET INTÉRÊTS À HAUTEUR
   D’UN MONTANT ÉGAL À VOS FRAIS DE SERVICES POUR LE MOIS DURANT LEQUEL LA
   VIOLATION A EU LIEU (OU À HAUTEUR DE 100,00 $ SI LES RÉCLAMATIONS SE
   RAPPORTENT À TOUT SERVICE GRATUIT).

   LES PRÉSENTES LIMITATIONS DE LA RESPONSABILITÉ DES PARTIES WESTERN
   DIGITAL S’APPLIQUERONT QUE WESTERN DIGITAL AIT ÉTÉ INFORMÉE OU NON OU
   AURAIT DÛ OU NON AVOIR CONNAISSANCE DE LA POSSIBILITÉ DE TOUTE DITE
   PERTE.  CERTAINS ÉTATS N’AUTORISANT PAS L’EXCLUSION OU LA LIMITATION DE
   DOMMAGES ACCESSOIRES OU CONSÉCUTIFS, LES EXCLUSIONS OU LIMITATIONS
   CI-DESSUS PEUVENT NE PAS S’APPLIQUER À VOTRE PERSONNE.

Avis de non-responsabilité

   VOUS RECONNAISSEZ EXPRESSÉMENT QUE L’UTILISATION DES SERVICES EST À VOS
   RISQUES EXCLUSIFS ET QUE VOUS ASSUMEZ LA TOTALITÉ DU RISQUE EN MATIÈre
   DE QUALITÉ SATISFAISANTE, DE PERFORMANCES, D’EXACTITUDE, ET D’EFFORT.
   TOUTES LES PARTIES DES SERVICES SONT FOURNIES PAR WESTERN DIGITAL «
   TELLES QUELLES », « EN L’ÉTAT », ET « SELON DISPONIBILITÉ » UNIQUEMENT,
   EN L’ÉTAT ET SANS GARANTIE QUELLE QU’ELLE SOIT.  WESTERN DIGITAL
   REJETTE EXPRESSÉMENT PAR LES PRÉSENTES TOUTES DÉCLARATIONS, GARANTIES,
   ET CONDITIONS EU ÉGARD AUX SERVICES (Y COMPRIS L’UTILISATION, LES
   PERFORMANCES, ET LE SUPPORT DE CES DERNIERS), EXPLICITES, IMPLICITES,
   LÉGALES, OU AUTRES, Y COMPRIS TOUTE GARANTIE IMPLICITE D’APTITUDE À UN
   EMPLOI PARTICULIER, DE QUALITÉ MARCHANDE, DE TITRE DE PROPRIÉTÉ, ET DE
   NON-CONTREFAÇON.  WESTERN DIGITAL NE DONNE AUCUNE ASSURANCE EU ÉGARD À
   L’EXACTITUDE DES RÉSULTATS OU DU PRODUIT DÉRIVÉ(S) DES SERVICES.

Politique de droits d’auteur et Actions pour atteinte aux droits d’auteur
DMCA

   En vertu du Titre 17, Code des États-Unis, Section 512(c), Western
   Digital a pour politique de répondre aux notifications de contrefaçon
   présumée conformes à la Digital Millennium Copyright Act (loi
   américaine relative au droit d’auteur du millénaire numérique) et
   autres lois applicables relatives à la propriété intellectuelle.  Nous
   respectons la propriété intellectuelle de tiers.  Si vous estimez que
   votre travail a été copié d’une manière qui constitue une atteinte aux
   droits d’auteur, veuillez suivre les procédures stipulées dans notre
   Politique relative aux Droits d’auteur.

Politique d’usage des marques de commerce

   Les marques de commerce, logos, et marques de services (collectivement,
   les « Marques ») affichés avec la fourniture de nos produits et
   services sont la propriété de Western Digital ou de tiers.  Les Marques
   de Western Digital peuvent être utilisées uniquement dans des
   circonstances limitées et avec l’autorisation préalable par écrit de
   Western Digital.  Les autorisations sont accordées au cas par cas.
   Toutes les utilisations autorisées doivent être strictement conformes à
   nos Orientations d’usage des marques de commerce et logos.  Veuillez
   cliquer ici pour obtenir une liste non exhaustive des Marques Western
   Digital.

Droits limités du Gouvernement des États-Unis

   Les Services sont fournis avec des « DROITS LIMITÉS. »  L’utilisation,
   la reproduction, ou la divulgation par le gouvernement des États-Unis
   est soumise à restrictions ainsi qu’il est énoncé dans la FAR52.227-14
   et la DFAR252.227-7013 et suivants, les lois leur succédant, ou toutes
   autres lois et réglementations applicables.  L’Utilisation des Services
   par le gouvernement des États-Unis constitue une reconnaissance de nos
   droits exclusifs y afférents.

Choix de la Loi ; Autonomie des dispositions

   Toute réclamation découlant des ou se rapportant aux Services, y
   compris l’Utilisation des Services (ou l’incapacité à Utiliser ces
   derniers), est régie par les lois de l’État de Californie sans
   considération des principes de conflits de lois.  Vous convenez de vous
   soumettre à la compétence exclusive des tribunaux d’État et fédéraux
   situés dans le Comté de Santa Clara, Californie, pour le règlement de
   tout et tous litiges découlant de ou se rapportant à votre Utilisation
   des Services.  Si toute disposition des présentes Conditions
   d’Utilisation est jugée invalide, nulle et non avenue ou, pour quelque
   raison que ce soit, inapplicable, ladite disposition sera jugée
   séparable et n’affectera pas la validité et l’applicabilité de toute
   disposition restante des présentes Conditions d’Utilisation.

   Les utilisateurs des Services en Californie sont habilités à recevoir
   la notification de droits des consommateurs spécifiques suivante : Le
   « Complaint Assistance Unit of the Division of Consumer Services of the
   California Department of Consumer Affairs » (service d’assistance pour
   les réclamations de la division des services consommateurs de la
   direction de la protection des consommateurs de Californie) peut être
   contacté par écrit à 1625 North Market Blvd., Suite N 112, Sacramento,
   CA 95834, ou par téléphone au (800) 952-5210.

Déclarations prospectives

   Certaines des informations sur nos Services, y compris nos sites
   Internet tels que investor.wdc.com, peuvent contenir des déclarations
   prospectives au sens des lois fédérales relatives aux valeurs
   mobilières, y compris des déclarations concernant des événements
   futurs, nos plans ou performances d’exploitation ou
   financiers/financières futur(e)s, nos prévisions de croissance, les
   tendances au sein de notre secteur d’activité et des marchés au sein
   desquels nous évoluons, et autres caractéristiques d’événements ou de
   situations futur(e)s.  L’ensemble des déclarations qui ne sont pas des
   faits historiques sont basées sur nos attentes actuelles et sont
   soumises à un certain nombre de risques et d’incertitudes pouvant faire
   diverger de manière substantielle les résultats effectifs des résultats
   formulés ou présumés dans les déclarations prospectives.  De plus
   amples informations sur les risques et incertitudes susceptibles
   d’impacter nos activités figurent dans nos documents déposés auprès de
   la Securities and Exchange Commission des États-Unis (la « SEC »)
   (commission des opérations de bourse) et sont disponibles sur le site
   Internet de la SEC à www.sec.gov, y compris notre dernier rapport
   périodique déposé, sur lequel nous attirons votre attention.  Vous ne
   devez pas vous fonder indûment sur lesdites déclarations prospectives.
   Nous n’assumons aucune obligation de mettre à jour publiquement ou
   réviser toute déclaration prospective, que ce soit suite à de nouvelles
   informations, des développements futurs, ou autrement, sauf ainsi que
   la loi l’exige.

Modifications des Services

   Western Digital se réserve le droit de modifier ou d’interrompre,
   provisoirement ou définitivement, les Services (ou toute partie de ces
   derniers), ou les produits ou services décrits dans ces derniers, à
   tout moment sans préavis.  À la résiliation des Services ou de toute
   partie de ces derniers, Western Digital n’est pas dans l’obligation de
   conserver ou fournir Votre Contenu ou d’autres données.

Nous contacter

   Si vous avez des questions, réclamations, ou remarques au sujet des
   présentes Conditions d’Utilisation, si vous souhaitez recevoir de plus
   amples informations concernant les Services, ou si vous souhaitez
   autrement contacter Western Digital, veuillez nous contacter aux
   coordonnées figurant sur notre page Contacter Western Digital.

     * {{unescape(item.title)}}
          + {{anchor.title}}

   עדכון אחרון מיום 28 במאי 2018

   תנאי שימוש אלה ("תנאי שימוש") מסדירים את השימוש שלך (כהגדרתו להלן)
   באתרים המוצעים על ידי Western Digital Technologies, Inc. ו/או הגופים
   הקשורים לחברה זו (שיכונו ביחד: "Western Digital Technologies", "אנו" או
   "שלנו") והתוכן, המאפיינים, החומרים, התוכנה והמסמכים הקשורים, וכן
   השירותים הזמינים באתרים כאמור (אתרים, תוכן, מאפיינים, חומרים, תוכנה
   ומסמכים ושירותים נלווים יכונו ביחד: "השירותים").

   חשוב – נא לקרוא בעיון – אם אינך מסכים/ה לתנאי שימוש אלה, אינך מורשה
   להשתמש בשירותים.

   על מנת לסייע לך להתמצא ולאתר סעיפים מסוימים של תנאי שימוש אלה, אנא עיין
   בתוכן העניינים להלן:

קבלת תנאי השימוש

   באמצעות שימוש בשירותים (כהגדרתם להלן): הנך מצהיר ומתחייב שאתה לפחות
   בגיל בגרות בשטח השיפוט שלך ויש לך סמכות, הרשאה והיתר הדרושים לכרות תנאי
   שימוש אלה ולהיות מחויב בהם; הנך מאשר שקראת והבנת ומסכים להיות מחויב
   בתנאי שימוש אלה; והנך מסכים לקיים את החוקים והתקנות בקשר לשימוש שלך
   בשירותים.

   אם השימוש שלך בשירותים נעשה מטעם חברה, ארגון או גוף אחר, כי אז: "אתה"
   פירושו אתה ואותו גוף; אתה מצהיר ומתחייב שהנך נציג מורשה של הגוף האמור,
   בעל הרשאה לחייב את אותו גוף בתנאי שימוש אלה וכי אתה מסכים לתנאי שימוש
   אלה מטעמו של אותו גוף; והנך מסכים שגוף זה נושא באחריות משפטית ופיננסית
   לשימוש שלך בשירותים כמו גם לשימוש שלך בחשבון המשתמש שלך (כהגדרתו להלן)
   ע ל ידי אחרים הקשורים לגוף שלך, ובכלל זה עובדים, סוכנים או קבלנים
   כלשהם.

פרשנות

   לצורך תנאי שימוש אלה: "שימוש" פירושו לקבל גישה, לגלוש, ליצור חשבון
   משתמש (כהגדרתו להלן), להעלות תכנים או חומרים, להוריד תכנים או חומרים או
   לעשות שימוש אחר בשירותים (ושם העצם "שימוש" והמונח "משתמש" יהיו בעלי
   פרשנות משתמעת); המונחים "אתה" ו- "שלך" יתייחסו אליך כאל משתמש העושה
   שימוש בשירותים; וכל ההתייחסויות למלים "כוללים", "נכלל" או "כולל" ייחשבו
   כאילו נכתבו אחריהן המלים "בין היתר".

שינויים בתנאי שימוש אלה

   אנו רשאים על פי שיקול דעתנו הבלעדי, לשנות תנאי שימוש אלה בכל עת באמצעות
   עדכון עמוד זה. אם תמשיך לעשות שימוש בשירותים לאחר כל שינוי כאמור, הרי
   שאתה מחויב בשינוי כאמור. לפיכך, עליך לעיין בעמוד זה מעת לעת על מנת
   לסקור תנאי שימוש אלה. אם שינוי זה אינו מקובל עליך, אינך רשאי להמשיך
   ולעשות שימוש בשירות.

תנאים נוספים

   אנו מציעים טווח רחב של מוצרים ושירותים, לרבות מוצרי תוכנה ושירותים.
   מוצרים או שירותים מסוימים הזמינים באתרים שלנו, עשויים להיות כפופים
   לתניות ותנאים אחרים או נוספים ("תנאים נוספים"). תנאים נוספים אלה יהיו
   זמינים עם המוצרים או השירותים הרלוונטיים, כגון פרסום במישרין באתר של
   מוצרים או שירותים אלה או הצגתם כתנאים ותניות נפרדים במועד הרכישה,
   ההורדה, הגישה, הגלישה או השימוש במוצרים או שירותים אלה. ככל שתנאי שימוש
   אלה חלים על אותם מוצרים או שירותים (למשל בגלל שהם זמינים באתרים שלנו)
   אולם אינם עולים בקנה אחד עם התנאים הנוספים החלים על אותם מוצרים או
   שירותים, אותם תנאים נוספים יגברו על הוראות בלתי תואמות בתנאי שימוש אלה
   ויחולו בקשר לאותם מוצרים ושירותים.

בעלות

   השירותים, לרבות "המראה והמרגש" שלהם (כגון, המלל, הגרפיקה, התמונות
   והסמלילים), תוכן קנייני, מידע וכן חומרים אחרים הכלולים בשירותים, מוגנים
   על פי דין, ובכלל זה חוקי קניין רוחני, זכויות יוצרים, סימני מסחר וחוקים
   אחרים של ארצות הברית ואמנות בינלאומיות. הנך מאשר כי Western Digital
   ו/או בעלי רישיון אחרים הנם בעלי כל הזכויות, הקניין והעניין בשירותים
   (ובכלל זה כל פטנט, זכות יוצרים, סוד מסחרי, סימן מסחר, המחשה (show-how)
   וידע (know-how), והנך מסכים לא לנקוט בשום צעד שאינו עולה בקנה אחד עם
   אינטרסי בעלות כאמור.

מגבלות שימוש

   למעט כפי שנכתב בזה מפורשות, אין להעתיק, לשכפל, להפיץ, לחזור ולהפיץ,
   להוריד, להציג, להעלות או לשדר אף אחד מהשירותים בשום צורה ובשום אמצעי,
   לרבות אלקטרוני, מכאני, צילום, הקלטה או אחר, ללא הסכמה מראש ובכתב מאתנו
   או מבעל זכויות היוצרים. בכפוף לקיומך את תנאי שימוש אלה, Western Digital
   מעניקה לך בזה זכות מוגבלת שאינה בלעדית לקבל גישה ולעשות שימוש בחומרים
   הכלולים בשירותים, בכל מקרה, לצורך שימוש אישי בלבד, שאינו מסחרי, ובלבד
   שלא תשנה, תמכור או תעשה שימוש מסחרי בחומרים כאמור. הסכמה זו תתבטל מאליה
   אם תפר איזה מתנאי שימוש אלה. עם הביטול, עליך להשמיד באופן מיידי חומרים
   כלשהם שהתקבלו מהשירות.

   הנך מסכים שלא: תסיר או תשנה כל הודעת זכויות יוצרים או הודעת זכויות
   קניין אחרות או תווית הגבלת זכויות הכלולה או המופיעה בשירותים; תבצע דה-
   קומפילציה, פירוק, קומפילציה לאחור, הרכבה לאחור, או הנדסה לאחור בדרך
   אחרת של שירותים כלשהם, עדכונים כלשהם או כל חלק מהם (למעט ורק במידה שכל
   מגבלה מהאמורות לעיל הנה אסורה על פי הדין החל); תשתמש בכל אמצעי על מנת
   לגלות כל קוד מקור סודי של חלק כלשהו מן השירותים; או תיצור מעקף של
   פונקציה כלשהי השולטת בגישה לשירותים או מגינה עליהם בדרך אחרת.

   הנך מוסיף ומסכים לא לעשות שימוש בשירותים בכל אופן על מנת להציק, לפגוע,
   לארוב, לאיים, להשמיץ, להפר או לפגוע בדרך אחרת בזכויותיו של צד אחר
   כלשהו, או להעלות, לפרסם, לשלוח במייל, לשדר או לגרום לזמינות של תוכן אחר
   שאינו חוקי, מזיק, מאיים, פוגעני, מטריד, מעוול, משמיץ, גס או שנוי
   במחלוקת באופן אחר. הנך מסכים לכך ש- Western Digital לא נושאת באחריות
   כלשהי לשימוש כאמור על ידך ולא בגין שום הודעות או תשדורות מטרידות,
   מאיימות, משמיצות, פוגעניות או בלתי חוקיות אותן אתה עלול לקבל כתוצאה
   משימוש בשירותים. הנך מסכים שלא תפר במתכוון או שלא במתכוון שום דין חל
   בקשר לשימושך בשירותים. אם תפר את האמור לעיל, אתה עשוי להיות נתון להעמדה
   לדין ותשלום פיצויים.

   הנך מאשר שלמעט כאמור בזה באופן מפורש, שום דבר מהאמור בתנאי שימוש אלה לא
   יפורש כמעניק לך רישיון כלשהו באיזה מהפטנטים של בעלי הרישיון שלנו או
   זכויות קניין רוחני אחרות, בין באמצעות השתק, במרומז או אחרת, והנך מסכים
   שאתה נושא באחריות הבלעדית לקבלת רישיונות כאמור באמצעות הסכם נפרד בכתב.
   שימוש בלתי מורשה בשירות כלשהו כאמור, עלול להפר זכויות יוצרים, דיני
   סימני מסחר, דיני פרטיות ופרסום וחוקים ותקנות תקשורת.

רישום חשבון והרשמות

   אנו עשויים לדרוש ממך לרשום חשבון על מנת לעשות שימוש במאפיינים או חלקים
   מסוימים של השירותים ("חשבון משתמש"). תוכל ליצור חשבון משתמש באמצעות
   השלמת הליך הרישום כפי שנקבע בסעיף המתאים של השירותים. אתה נושא באחריות
   למסירת מידע מדויק ועדכני.

   אתה המשתמש הבלעדי בחשבון המשתמש שלך. אתה נושא באחריות לשמירת הסודיות של
   כל סיסמא וכל מספר חשבון שניתן על ידך או על ידי Western Digital לשימוש
   בשירותים. אתה נושא באחריות המלאה לכל הפעילויות המתרחשות תחת חשבון
   המשתמש שלך. Western Digital עשויה שלא לשלוט בשימוש בחשבון המשתמש שלך או
   של כל משתמש אחר, וכן Western Digital מופטרת באופן מפורש מכל אחריות
   הנגזרת מכך.

נהלי פרטיות

   השימוש שלך בשירותים כפוף גם להצהרת הפרטיות שלנו, הזמינה כאן ("הצהרת
   הפרטיות"). יש לעיין בהצהרת הפרטיות על מנת ללמוד על מדיניות הפרטיות
   שלנו.

הענקת רישיון לתוכן המשתמש

   כתנאי לשימוש שלך בשירותים, באמצעות פוסט, העלאה, פרסום, הגשה, הצגה או
   שידור של כל תוכן או חומרים אחרים באמצעות השירותים ("התוכן שלך"), הנך
   מעניק בזה ל- Western Digital רישיון שאינו בלעדי, לצמיתות, בלתי ניתן
   לביטול, ללא תמלוגים, חובק עולם, ניתן להעברה ולרישוי משנה באופן מלא
   (לרבות למשתמשים אחרים בשירותים) לקבל גישה, להשתמש, לשכפל, לשדר, להציג,
   לפרסם, להפיץ, לתקן באופן ציבורי, להציג בציבור, לשנות, לתקן וליצור
   עבודות נגזרות מהתוכן שלך ולשלב את התוכן שלך בעבודות אחרות בכל פורמט או
   מדיום הידוע כעת או שיפותח בעתיד לכל מטרה מסחרית או שאינה מסחרית. הנך
   מצהיר ומתחייב: כי הנך הבעלים או בדרך אחרת בשליטה בכל הזכויות בתוכן שלך,
   לרבות כל זכויות היוצרים; כי התוכן שלך מדויק ואינו מפר או פוגע בזכויות
   קניין רוחני של צד שלישי כלשהו, ובכלל זה זכויות פרסום ופרטיות; וכי
   השימוש בתוכן שלך אינו מפר תנאי שימוש אלה או הצהרת הפרטיות ולא יגרום נזק
   לשום אדם או גוף אחר. איננו נושאים בשום אחריות לתוכן כלשהו או חומרים
   אחרים שהוגשו או פורסמו באמצעות השירותים על ידך או על ידי צד שלישי
   כלשהו. ככל שהתוכן שלך כולל תמונות כלשהן, אתה מצהיר ומתחייב שאדם כלשהו
   המופיע בתמונות כאמור, אם ישנו, נתן את הסכמתו לשימוש בתמונות כפי שנקבע
   בתנאי שימוש אלה.

   אנו שומרים לעצמנו את הזכות לבחון מראש, לסרב, לשנות או להסיר כל תוכן או
   חומר המופיע בשירותים מכל סיבה אחרת, לרבות אם נקבע על פי שיקול דעתנו
   הבלעדי שתוכן או חומר כאמור מפר את הדין או את הזכויות של כל אדם אחר,
   פוגע בזכויותיו של כל אדם או באופן אחר אינו מתאים לפרסום בשירות.

גישה מחוץ לארצות הברית

   השירותים נשלטים ומופעלים על ידנו מהמשרדים שלנו בארצות הברית. איננו
   מצהירים שהשירותים מתאימים או זמינים לשימוש באתרים אחרים והגישה אליהם
   משטחים בהם התכנים אינם חוקיים, הנה אסורה. אלה הבוחרים לעשות שימוש
   בשירות ממיקומים אחרים, עושים זאת מיוזמתם ונושאים באחריות לקיים את
   הדינים המקומיים החלים. אם אתה עושה שימוש ממיקומים אחרים, אתה נושא
   באחריות לקיום הדינים המקומיים החלים, לרבות תקנות היבוא והיצוא של מדינות
   אחרות. אתה מאשר שחלק מהשירותים או כולם, לרבות החומרים הכלולים בהם,
   עשויים להיות כפופים לחוקים ולתקנות ניהול היצוא של ארצות הברית וכן ל
   מחלקה לבקרת נכסים זרים במשרד האוצר של ארה"ב ("OFAC"), כמו גם דיני היצוא
   של מדינות אחרות והטיית השירותים בניגוד לדיני ארצות הברית או מדינות
   רלוונטיות אחרות, הנה אסורה. הנך מסכים שאף אחד מן השירותים, ולא שום מוצר
   ישיר שלהם, אינו ולא יהיה נתון לרכישה, משלוח, העברה, יצוא, יצוא חוזר,
   במישרין או בעקיפין למדינות אסורות או שמוטל עליהן חרם או לנתיניהן, ולא
   ישמש לפעילויות גרעין, נשק כימי (או) ביולוגי, או פרויקטים של טילים, אלא
   אם התקבל אישור מפורש מממשלת ארצות הברית (או ממשלה רלוונטית אחרת) למטרות
   כאמור. באמצעות גישה לאתר, הנך מצהיר ומתחייב שאינך אזרח או תושב ואינך
   בדרך כלל תושב בכל מדינה או איזור הכפוף לחרם מצדה של ממשלת ארצות הברית,
   שאינך רשום כצד נגדו מופעלת סנקציה ברשימת נתינים ספציפיים ואנשים חסומים,
   המנוהלת על ידי OFAC. הנך מסכים לקיים בקפידה את דיני היצוא, היצוא החוזר,
   והיבוא ולקבל את מלוא האחריות לקבלת רישיונות ליצוא, יצוא חוזר או יבוא,
   כנדרש.

קישורים לאתרי צד שלישי ויישומים

   השירותים עשויים לכלול קישורים לאתרים או יישומים של צד שלישי. ואולם, שים
   לב בבקשה שאיננו נושאים באחריות ואיננו שולטים באתרים או יישומים כאמור.
   Western Digital אינה מצהירה דבר לגבי כל אתר או יישום אחר אליו אתה עשוי
   לגשת באמצעות השירותים. כאשר הנך ניגש לאתר או יישום של צד שלישי, אפילו
   אחד העשוי להציג את הסמליל של Western Digital, עליך לנקוט משנה זהירות על
   מנת לוודא שאתה מסכים לתנאי השימוש של אותו אתר או יישום וכי אותו אתר או
   יישום חופשי מפריטים כגון וירוסים, תולעים, סוסים טרויאניים ופריטים אחרים
   הרסניים מטבעם. הנך מסכים שבשום מקרה Western Digital לא תישא בשום אחריות
   לשום אתר או יישום של צד שלישי.

הגבלת אחריות

   במידה המרבית המותרת על פי הדין החל, אנו והדירקטורים, נושאי המשרה,
   העובדים והיועצים שלנו (שיכונו להלן: "צדדי Western Digital") לא נישא
   באחריות לשום נזק שנגרם כתוצאה משימוש, תיקון, הוספה, העתקה, הפצה או
   הורדה של השירותים או חוסר יכולת לעשות מה מהאמור לעיל. בשום מקרה, צדדי
   Western Digital לא יישאו באחריות לשום נזק עקיף, חריג, לדוגמא, עונשי,
   מיוחד, אקראי או תוצאתי (לרבות אבדן נתונים, הכנסות, רווחים, שימוש או
   יתרון כלכלי אחר) ללא תלות באופן גרימתו, בין אם בהפרת חוזה או בנזיקין,
   אפילו אם צדדי Western Digital קיבלו הודעה מוקדמת על אפשרות קרות נזק
   כאמור.

   הנך מסכים שמוטלת עליך האחריות הבלעדית להגנה נאותה ולגיבוי נתונים ו/או
   ציוד המשמש בקשר עם השירותים ולא תעלה טענה מכל סוג כלפי צדדי Western
   Digital בגין נתונים שאבדו, יצוא בלתי מדויק של נתונים, עיכובי עבודה או
   אבדן רווחים הנובעים מהשימוש או מחוסר היכולת לעשות שימוש בשירותים.

   הנך מסכים לפטור באופן מלא את צדדי Western Digital מכל תביעה הקשורה
   לשירותים והנך מתחייב שלא לתבוע את צדדי Western Digital בגין כל תביעה
   הקשורה לשירותים. אם יש לך עילה כלשהי לקבלת פיצוי (לרבות הפרת תנאי שימוש
   אלה) מאת צדדי Western Digital בקשר לשירותים או לתנאי שימוש אלה, הנך
   מסכים שהתרופה הבלעדית שלך לקבלת פיצוי מאת Western Digital תהיה פיצוי
   בסכום השווה לדמי השירותים שלך ששולמו לחודש שבמהלכו אירעה ההפרה (או עד
   לסך של 100.00 $ אם התביעות מתייחסות לשירותים חינמיים כלשהם).

   מגבלות אלה לאחריות של צדדי Western Digital תחול בין אם Western Digital
   קיבלה הודעה או הייתה צריכה להיות מודעת לאפשרות של הפסדים כלשהם כאמור.
   מדינות מסוימות אינן מאפשרות את ההחרגה או ההגבלה על נזקים אקראיים או
   תוצאתיים כך שההחרגות או המגבלות האמורות לעיל עשויות שלא לחול עליך.

שחרור

   הנך מאשר במפורש כי השימוש בשירותים הנו על אחריותך בלבד וכי מלוא האחריות
   לאיכות, ביצוע, דיוק ומאמץ משביעי רצון, חלה עליך. כל חלקי השירות ניתנים
   על ידי Western Digital על בסיס "כפי שהוא" ("as- is"), "עם כל הפגמים"
   ("with all faults") ו-"כפי שזמין" (“as available”) בלבד, עם כל הליקויים
   וללא שום אחריות משום סוג. Western Digital משוחררת בזה באופן מפורש מכל
   מצג, אחריות ותנאי באשר לשירותים (ובכלל זה השימוש, הביצוע, והתמיכה בהם),
   בין אם מפורשים, משתמעים, מכוח חקיקה או בדרך אחרת, לרבות אחריות משתמעת
   להתאמה למטרה מסוימת, אחריות לסחירות, קניין ואי הפרה. Western Digital
   אינה מבטיחה הבטחה כלשהי באשר לדיוק התוצאות או הפלט הנובע מהשירות.

מדיניות זכויות יוצרים ותביעות הפרת זכויות יוצרים של DMCA

   על פי פרק 17 לחוק של ארה"ב, סעיף 512 (c) מדיניותה של Western Digital
   היא להגיב להודעות של הפרה נטענת אשר עולה בקנה אחד עם חוק זכויות יוצרים
   של המילניום הדיגיטלי (Digital Millennium Copyright Act) ודיני קניין
   רוחני רלוונטיים אחרים. אנו מכבדים את הקניין הרוחני של אחרים. אם אתה
   סבור שעבודתך הועתקה באופן המהווה הפרת זכויות יוצרים, אנא עשה שימוש
   בהליכים שנקבעו במדיניות זכויות היוצרים שלנו.

מדיניות שימוש בסימני מסחר

   סימני המסחר, הסמלילים וסימני השירות (שיכונו ביחד "סימנים") המוצגים עם
   אספקת הטובין והשירותים שלנו, הנם קניינה של Western Digital או של צדדי
   ג'. הסימנים של Western Digital יכולים לשמש רק בנסיבות מוגבלות ובהרשאה
   מראש ובכתב מאת Western Digital. אישורים ניתנים בכל מקרה בנפרד. כל
   השימושים המאושרים חייבים לעלות בקנה אחד עם הקווים המנחים לשימוש בסימני
   מסחר וסמלילים. יש להקליק כאן לרשימה שאינה ממצה של סימני Western
   Digital.

זכויות מוגבלות על ידי ממשלת ארצות הברית

   השירותים ניתנים עם "זכויות מוגבלות". השימוש, השכפול או הגילוי על ידי
   ממשלת ארצות הברית כפופה למגבלות כפי שנקבעו ב- FAR52.227-14 וב-
   DFAR252.227-7013 ואילך, הדינים המחליפים אותם או חוקים ותקנות חלופיים
   אחרים. השימוש בשירותים על ידי ממשלת ארצות הברית מהווה אישור לזכויות
   הקנייניות שלנו בהם.

ברירת דין; הוראות נפרדות

   כל טענה העולה מהשירותים או בקשר אליהם, ובכלל זה השימוש (או חוסר היכולת
   לעשות שימוש) בשירותים, מוסדרת על ידי דיני מדינת קליפורניה ללא התייחסות
   לעקרונות  ברירת דין. אתה מסכים להיות כפוף לסמכות השיפוט הבלעדית של בתי
   המשפט המדינתיים והפדראליים במחוז סנטה קלרה, קליפורניה, לצורך יישוב
   סכסוכים כלשהם שיתגלעו מהשימוש שלך בשירותים או בקשר לכך. אם הוראה כלשהי
   מהוראות תנאי שימוש אלה תימצא פסולה, בטלה או בלתי ניתנת לאכיפה מכל סיבה
   שהיא, הוראה כאמור תחשב כהוראה נפרדת ולא תשפיע על תוקפה ואפשרות אכיפתה
   של כל הוראה אחרת בתנאי שימוש אלה.

   משתמשי שירותים מקליפורניה, זכאים לקבל את הודעת זכויות הצרכן הבאה: ניתן
   ליצור קשר בכתב עם יחידת הסיוע בתלונות של מחלקת שירותים לצרכן של המשרד
   לשירותים צרכניים של קליפורניה, בכתובת: 1625 North Market Blvd., Suite N
   112, Sacramento, CA 95834 או בטלפון שמספרו (800) 952-5210.

הצהרות צופות פני עתיד

   חלק מהמידע המצוי בשירותים שלנו, לרבות באתרים שלנו, כגון
   investor.wdc.com, עשוי לכלול הצהרות צופות פני עתיד, במשמעות דיני ניירות
   הערך הפדראליים, ובכלל זה הצהרות המתייחסות לאירועים עתידיים, התפעול
   העתידי שלנו או תכניות פיננסיות וביצועים עתידיים, הצמיחה הצפויה שלנו,
   מגמות בעסק שלנו והשווקים שבהם אנו פועלים ומאפיינים אחרים באירועים או
   נסיבות עתידיות. כל ההצהרות שאינן עובדות היסטוריות, מבוססות על הציפיות
   הנוכחיות שלנו וכפופות למספר סיכונים ואי וודאויות העלולות לגרום לתוצאות
   בפועל להיות שונות באופן מהותי מאלה שהובעו או השתמעו בהצהרות צופות פני
   עתיד. מידע נוסף על הסיכונים ואי וודאויות העלולים להשפיע על העסק שלנו
   ניתן למצוא בהגשות שלנו לבורסה לניירות ערך של ארה"ב ("SEC") והוא זמין
   באתר של הבורסה בכתובת: www.sec.gov, לרבות הדוח התקופתי האחרון שהוגש על
   ידנו, אליו אנו מסבים את תשומת לבך. אל תסתמך באופן בלתי נאות על הצהרות
   צופות פני עתיד אלה. איננו מתחייבים לעדכן באופן ציבורי או לתקן כל הצהרה
   הצופה פני עתיד, בין אם כתוצאה ממידע חדש, התפתחויות עתידיות או בדרך
   אחרת, אלא אם הדבר נדרש על פי דין.

שינויים בשירותים

   Western Digital שומרת לעצמה את הזכות לשנות או להפסיק, באופן זמני או
   קבוע את השירותים (או כל חלק מהם) או את השירותים או המוצרים המתוארים
   בזה, בכל עת וללא מתן הודעה מוקדמת. עם כל ביטול של השירותים או כל חלק
   מהם, Western Digital אינה מחויבת לשמור או לספק את התוכן שלך או נתונים
   אחרים.

צור קשר

   אם יש לך שאלות, תלונות או הערות אודות תנאי שימוש אלה, אם אתה מעוניין
   לקבל מידע נוסף בנוגע לשירותים האמורים או אם אתה מעוניין ליצור קשר בדרך
   אחרת עם Western Digital, אנא צור עמנו קשר לפי המידע המצוי בעמוד שלנו של
    יצירת קשר עם Western Digital.

     * {{unescape(item.title)}}
          + {{anchor.title}}

   Poslední aktualizace dne 28. května 2018.

   Tyto podmínky používání (tyto „Podmínky používání“) upravují vaše
   používání (jak je definováno dále) webových stránek nabízených
   společností Western Digital Technologies, Inc., a/nebo jejích
   přidružených společností (společně „Western Digital“, „my“ nebo „naše“)
   a obsahu, funkcí, materiálů, softwaru a související dokumentace a
   služeb dostupných na těchto webových stránkách (např. webové stránky,
   obsah, funkce, materiály, software a související dokumentace a služby,
   souhrnně „Služby“).

   DŮLEŽITÉ – ČTĚTE POZORNĚ – Pokud s těmito podmínkami používání
   nesouhlasíte, nejste oprávněni používat naše služby.

   Abychom vám pomohli při navigaci a hledání konkrétních částí těchto
   podmínek používání, využijte odkazů v následujícím obsahu:

Přijetí těchto podmínek používání

   Používáním služeb (jak je definováno dále): prohlašujete a zaručujete,
   že jste ve vaší jurisdikci nejméně ve věku plnoletosti a že máte
   veškeré pravomoci, oprávnění a povolení k tomu, abyste mohli vstoupit
   do vztahu regulovaného těmito podmínkami a být jimi vázáni;
   potvrzujete, že jste si přečetli tyto podmínky používání, porozuměli
   jste jim a souhlasíte s tím, že jimi budete vázáni; a zavazujete se
   dodržovat všechny platné zákony a předpisy v souvislosti s vaším
   používáním služeb.

   Pokud používáte služby jménem společnosti, organizace nebo jiné entity,
   pak platí:  „vy“ zahrnuje vás a předmětnou entitu; zastupujete a
   zaručujete, že jste oprávněným zástupcem entity, ve které jste
   oprávněni zavazovat danou entitu těmito podmínkami používání jejím
   jménem, a souhlasíte s těmito podmínkami používání jménem dané entity;
   a souhlasíte s tím, že předmětná entita je právně a finančně odpovědná
   za vaše používání služeb a za používání vašeho uživatelského účtu (jak
   je definováno dále) ostatními partnery ve vaší entitě, včetně všech
   zaměstnanců, zástupců nebo smluvních partnerů.

Interpretace

   Pro účely těchto podmínek používání: slovem „používání“ se rozumí
   přístup, prohlížení, vytvoření uživatelského účtu (jak je definován
   dále), odesílání obsahu nebo materiálu do služeb, stahování obsahu nebo
   materiálu ze služeb nebo jiné používání služeb (a slova „používání“ a
   „použití“ budou mít výsledný význam); výrazy „vy“ a „vaše“ označují vás
   jako uživatele, který používá služby; a všechny odkazy na slova
   „zahrnuje“, „zahrnuto“ nebo „včetně“ se považují za odkazy následované
   slovy „bez omezení“.

Změny těchto podmínek používání

   NA ZÁKLADĚ VLASTNÍHO SVOBODNÉHO ROZHODNUTÍ MŮŽEME KDYKOLI ZMĚNIT TYTO
   PODMÍNKY POUŽÍVÁNÍ AKTUALIZACÍ TÉTO STRÁNKY.  JESTLIŽE BUDETE PO
   JAKÉKOLI TAKOVÉ ZMĚNĚ I NADÁLE POUŽÍVAT SLUŽBY, JE PRO VÁS PŘEDMĚTNÁ
   ZMĚNA ZÁVAZNÁ.  Z TOHOTO DŮVODU BYSTE TUTO STRÁNKU MĚLI PRAVIDELNĚ
   NAVŠTĚVOVAT, ABYSTE SI OVĚŘILI TYTO PODMÍNKY POUŽÍVÁNÍ.  BUDE-LI PRO
   VÁS JAKÁKOLI PROVEDENÁ ZMĚNA NEPŘIJATELNÁ, nesmíte pokračovat v
   používání SLUŽEB.

Další podmínky

   Nabízíme širokou škálu produktů a služeb včetně softwarových produktů a
   služeb.  Některé produkty nebo služby dostupné na našich webových
   stránkách mohou podléhat dalším nebo dodatečným podmínkám („další
   podmínky“).  Tyto další smluvní podmínky budou k dispozici s
   příslušnými produkty nebo službami, jako je například zveřejnění přímo
   na webových stránkách těchto produktů nebo služeb nebo představení
   samostatného souboru smluvních podmínek v době nákupu, stažení,
   přístupu a prohlížení nebo použití těchto produktů nebo služeb.  V
   rozsahu, v jakém se tyto smluvní podmínky vztahují na tyto produkty
   nebo služby (např. proto, že jsou dostupné na našich webových
   stránkách), ale nejsou v souladu s dalšími podmínkami vztahujícími se
   na tyto produkty nebo služby, tyto další podmínky nahradí
   nekonzistentní ustanovení těchto podmínek používání a budou platné ve
   vztahu k předmětným produktům nebo službám.

Vlastnictví

   Služby, včetně jejich „vzhledu a ovládání“ (např. text, grafika,
   obrázky a loga), vlastnického obsahu, informací a dalších materiálů
   obsažených ve službách, jsou chráněny zákonem, včetně zákona o duševním
   vlastnictví Spojených států, zákona na ochranu autorských práv, zákona
   o ochraně obchodních značek a dalších zákonů a mezinárodních smluv.
   Berete na vědomí, že společnost Western Digital a/nebo naši
   poskytovatelé licencí vlastní veškerá práva, nároky a zájmy ve službách
   a k nim (včetně veškerých patentových, autorských práv, práv k
   obchodnímu tajemství, k ochranným známkám, předvedení a know-how a
   všech dalších práv k duševnímu vlastnictví nebo souvisejících s nimi) a
   souhlasíte s tím, že nebudete podnikat žádná opatření, která by byla v
   rozporu s těmito vlastnickými zájmy.

Omezení používání

   S výjimkou případů výslovně povolených v tomto dokumentu nesmí být
   žádná z těchto služeb kopírována, reprodukována, distribuována, znovu
   zveřejňována, stažena, zobrazována, zasílána nebo přenášena v jakékoli
   podobě nebo jakýmikoli prostředky, a to elektronickou, mechanickou
   cestou, formou fotokopií, záznamů nebo jinak bez našeho předchozího
   písemného povolení nebo předchozího písemného povolení majitele
   autorských práv.  Na základě vašeho souladu s těmito podmínkami
   používání vám společnost Western Digital uděluje omezené nevýhradní
   právo k přístupu a používání materiálů obsažených ve službách, a to
   vždy pouze k osobním, nekomerčním účelům a za předpokladu, že tyto
   materiály nebudete pozměňovat, prodávat nebo komerčně využívat.  Toto
   povolení automaticky končí, pokud porušíte kteroukoli z těchto podmínek
   používání.  Při ukončení musíte okamžitě zničit veškeré materiály
   získané ze služeb.

   Zavazujete se, že nebudete: odstraňovat nebo měnit žádné oznámení o
   autorských právech nebo jiných vlastnických právech nebo poznámku o
   omezujících právech obsaženou nebo zahrnutou do služeb; nebudete
   dekompilovat, analyzovat, zpětně kompilovat, reverzně sestavovat nebo
   jinak zpětně zkoumat žádnou službu, žádnou aktualizaci a žádnou jejich
   část (s výjimkou případů, kdy je jakékoli předchozí omezení zakázáno
   rozhodným právem); používat jakýkoli prostředek k objevení jakéhokoli
   důvěrného zdrojového kódu kterékoli části služeb; nebo obcházet
   jakékoli funkce, které řídí přístup nebo jinak chrání služby.

   Dále souhlasíte s tím, že nebudete služby využívat žádným způsobem k
   obtěžování, zneužívání, sledování, ohrožení, hanobení, porušení či
   jinému přestoupení práv kterékoli jiné strany nebo k nahrávání,
   zveřejňování, zasílání e-mailů, přenášení nebo jinému zpřístupnění
   jakéhokoli obsahu, který je nezákonný, škodlivý, vyhrožující, urážlivý,
   obtěžující, zkreslený, hanlivý, vulgární, obscénní, urážlivý, invazivní
   vůči soukromí jiné osoby, nenávistný nebo rasově, etnicky nebo jinak
   závadný.  Souhlasíte s tím, že společnost Western Digital není v žádném
   případě odpovědná za žádné takové používání vámi ani za žádné
   obtěžující, ohrožující, hanlivé, urážlivé nebo nelegální zprávy nebo
   přenosy informací, které můžete obdržet v důsledku svého používání
   služeb.  Souhlasíte s tím, že nebudete v souvislosti s vaším používáním
   služeb úmyslně ani neúmyslně porušovat platné zákony.  Pokud porušíte
   kterékoli z výše uvedených ustanovení, můžete být vystaveni stíhání a
   povinni uhradit náhradu škod.

   Berete na vědomí, že s výjimkou ustanovení výslovně uvedených v tomto
   dokumentu nebude nic v těchto podmínkách používání vykládáno tak, jako
   kdyby vám udělovalo jakoukoli licenci v rámci patentů našich
   poskytovatelů licencí nebo jiných práv duševního vlastnictví, ať už
   formou překážky, implicitně nebo jinak, a souhlasíte s tím, že máte
   výlučnou odpovědnost za získání takových licencí samostatnou písemnou
   dohodou.  Neoprávněné použití libovolných služeb může být v rozporu se
   zákony na ochranu autorských práv, se zákony o ochranných známkách,
   zákony o ochraně osobních údajů a publicity, směrnic a stanov o
   komunikaci.

Registrace účtu a odběry

   Můžeme vyžadovat, abyste si zaregistrovali účet k použití určitých
   funkcí nebo částí služeb („uživatelský účet“).  Uživatelský účet si
   můžete vytvořit splněním registračního procesu uvedeného v příslušné
   části služeb.  Jste zodpovědní za poskytování přesných a aktuálních
   informací o účtu.

   Jste jediným oprávněným uživatelem svého uživatelského účtu.
   Odpovídáte za zachování důvěrnosti jakéhokoli hesla a čísla účtu, které
   jste poskytli vy nebo společnost Western Digital za účelem použití
   služeb.  Plně odpovídáte za všechny činnosti, které budou provedeny pod
   vaším uživatelským účtem.  Společnost Western Digital nemusí mít
   kontrolu nad používáním vašeho uživatelského účtu či uživatelského účtu
   jiného uživatele a společnost Western Digital výslovně odmítá jakoukoli
   odpovědnost z toho odvozenou.

Postupy ochrany soukromí

   Vaše používání služeb rovněž podléhá našemu prohlášení o ochraně
   osobních údajů, které je k dispozici po kliknutí zde („Prohlášení o
   ochraně osobních údajů“).  Přečtěte si prosím naše prohlášení o ochraně
   osobních údajů a dozvíte se o našich postupech ochrany soukromí.

Udělení uživatelské licence k obsahu

   Podmínkou vašeho používání služeb je, že prostřednictvím zveřejňování,
   odesílání, publikování, zasílání, zobrazování nebo přenosu jakéhokoli
   obsahu nebo jiných materiálů prostřednictvím služeb („váš obsah“)
   udělujete společnosti Western Digital nevýhradní, časově neomezené,
   neodvolatelné, bezplatné, celosvětové, převoditelné, plně licencované
   (včetně ostatních uživatelů služeb) licence k přístupu, použití,
   reprodukci, přenosu, zobrazování, publikování, distribuci, veřejné
   prezentaci, veřejnému zobrazení, úpravám, změnám a vytváření odvozených
   děl z vašeho obsahu a k začlenění vašeho obsahu do jiných děl v
   jakémkoli formátu nebo médiu, které je nyní známo nebo které bude
   později vyvinuto k jakýmkoli komerčním a nekomerčním účelům.
   Prohlašujete a zaručujete, že vlastníte nebo jinak kontrolujete veškerá
   práva k vašemu obsahu, včetně všech autorských práv; že váš obsah je
   přesný a neporušuje ani nezcizuje práva k duševnímu vlastnictví žádné
   třetí strany, zejména včetně práv na propagaci a ochranu soukromí; a že
   používání vašeho obsahu neporušuje tyto podmínky používání nebo
   prohlášení o ochraně osobních údajů a nezpůsobí újmu žádné osobě ani
   subjektu.  Neneseme žádnou odpovědnost a nepřebíráme žádnou odpovědnost
   za jakýkoli obsah nebo jiné materiály, které jste prostřednictvím
   služeb odeslali nebo zveřejnili vy nebo kterákoli třetí strana.  V
   rozsahu, ve kterém váš obsah obsahuje jakékoli obrázky, dále
   prohlašujete a zaručujete, že každá osoba zobrazená na těchto obrázcích
   (pokud existuje) poskytla souhlas s používáním obrázků, jak je
   stanoveno v těchto podmínkách používání.

   VYHRAZUJEME SI PRÁVO NA PŘEDEM PROVĚŘOVAT, ODMÍTNOUT, MODIFIKOVAT NEBO
   ODSTRANIT JAKÝKOLI OBSAH NEBO MATERIÁL VE SLUŽBÁCH, A TO Z JAKÉHOKOLI
   DŮVODU, VČETNĚ PŘÍPADŮ, KDY NA ZÁKLADĚ SVÉHO VLASTNÍHO ROZHODNUTÍ
   ROZHODNEME, ŽE takový obsah NEBO MATERIÁL PORUŠUJE KTERÝKOLI ZÁKON NEBO
   PRÁVO KTERÉKOLI OSOBY, NEBO JE JINAK NEVHODNÝ KE ZVEŘEJNĚNÍ V RÁMCI
   SLUŽEB.

Přístup z míst mimo Spojené státy

   Služby jsou řízeny a provozovány námi z našich poboček ve Spojených
   státech.  Nevydáváme žádné prohlášení, že služby jsou vhodné nebo
   dostupné k používání na jiných místech a přístup z území, kde je jejich
   obsah nezákonný, je zakázán.  Ti, kdo se rozhodnou používat služby z
   jiných míst, tak činí z vlastního podnětu a odpovídají za dodržování
   platných místních zákonů.  Pokud používáte služby z jiných míst,
   odpovídáte za dodržování platných místních zákonů včetně předpisů pro
   vývoz a dovoz jiných zemí.  Berete na vědomí a souhlasíte s tím, že
   některé nebo všechny služby, včetně materiálů v nich obsažených, mohou
   podléhat směrnicím a zákonům Spojených států amerických o vývozu,
   směrnicím o hospodářských sankcích Úřadu pro kontrolu zahraničních
   aktiv (OFAC) Ministerstva financí Spojených států i vývozním zákonům
   jiných zemí a že je zakázáno zneužití služeb v rozporu s právními
   předpisy USA nebo jiných příslušných zemí.  Souhlasíte s tím a
   zavazujete se, že žádná ze služeb ani jejich přímý produkt nejsou a
   nebudou získány, přepraveny, převáděny, vyvezeny nebo zpětně vyvezeny
   přímo nebo nepřímo do zakázaných nebo embargovaných zemí nebo jejich
   státním příslušníkům, ani nebudou použity k jaderným činnostem, výrobě
   chemických biologických zbraní nebo projektům raket, pokud pro tyto
   účely výslovně nepovolí vláda Spojených států (nebo jiná příslušná
   vláda).  Přístupem na tyto webové stránky prohlašujete a zaručujete, že
   nejste občanem nebo obyvatelem země, nebo nejste státním příslušníkem
   kteréhokoli státu nebo regionu, který podléhá embargu vlády Spojených
   států, a že nejste vedeni jako sankcionovaná strana na seznamu
   speciálně určených státních příslušníků a zablokovaných osob, jejichž
   seznam vede OFAC.  Dále souhlasíte s tím, že budete striktně dodržovat
   veškeré zákony týkající se exportu, reexportu a importu a přebíráte
   výhradní odpovědnost za získání licencí k exportu, reexportu nebo
   importu, jak může být požadováno.

Odkazy ke stránkám jiných stran a aplikacím

   Služby mohou obsahovat odkazy k webovým stránkám nebo aplikacím třetích
   stran.  Mějte na paměti, že za tyto webové stránky nebo aplikace
   neodpovídáme a nekontrolujeme je.  Společnost Western Digital
   neposkytuje žádné informace o žádných jiných webových stránkách nebo
   aplikacích, ke kterým máte přístup prostřednictvím služeb.  V případě
   přístupu na webovou stránku nebo aplikaci třetích stran, dokonce i na
   webových stránkách společnosti Western Digital, je na vás, abyste se
   ujistili, že souhlasíte s podmínkami používání webových stránek nebo
   aplikací a že webová stránka nebo aplikace jsou bez virů, červů,
   trojských koní a dalších položek destruktivní povahy.  Souhlasíte s
   tím, že společnost Western Digital nebude za žádných okolností
   odpovědná za žádné webové stránky nebo aplikace třetích stran.

Omezení odpovědnosti

   V MAXIMÁLNÍM ROZSAHU POVOLENÉM PŘÍSLUŠNÝM ZÁKONEM MY A NAŠI ŘEDITELÉ,
   VEDOUCÍ PRACOVNÍCI, ZAMĚSTNANCI A KONZULTANTI (SOUHRNNĚ „STRANY VE
   SPOLEČNOSTI WESTERN DIGITAL“) NEPONESOU ŽÁDNOU ODPOVĚDNOST ZA ŽÁDNÉ
   ŠKODY VYPLÝVAJÍCÍ Z POUŽÍVÁNÍ, ÚPRAV, PŘÍSPĚVKŮ, KOPÍROVÁNÍ, DISTRIBUCE
   NEBO STAHOVÁNÍ SLUŽEB NEBO Z NEMOŽNOSTI VYKONÁVAT KTEROUKOLI Z VÝŠE
   UVEDENÝCH ČINNOSTÍ. STRANY VE SPOLEČNOSTI WESTERN DIGITAL NEPONESOU V
   ŽÁDNÉM PŘÍPADĚ ŽÁDNOU ODPOVĚDNOST ZA NEPŘÍMÉ, VÝJIMEČNÉ, EXEMPLÁRNÍ,
   PENÁLNÍ, SPECIÁLNÍ, NÁHODNÉ NEBO NÁSLEDNÉ ŠKODY (VČETNĚ ZTRÁTY DAT,
   PŘÍJMŮ, ZISKŮ, MOŽNOSTI POUŽÍVÁNÍ NEBO JINÝCH EKONOMICKÝCH VÝHOD), AŤ
   JIŽ V PŘÍPADĚ PORUŠENÍ PŘEDPISŮ NEBO ÚMYSLNÝM PORUŠENÍM PRÁVA, A TO I V
   PŘÍPADĚ, ŽE BY STRANY VE SPOLEČNOSTI WESTERN DIGITAL BYLY PŘEDEM
   UPOZORNĚNY NA MOŽNOST VZNIKU TAKOVÉ ŠKODY.

   SOUHLASÍTE S TÍM, ŽE NESETE VÝHRADNÍ ODPOVĚDNOST ZA PŘIMĚŘENOU OCHRANU
   A ZÁLOHOVÁNÍ ÚDAJŮ A/NEBO ZAŘÍZENÍ POUŽÍVANÝCH V SOUVISLOSTI SE
   SLUŽBAMI A NEVZNESETE ŽÁDNÉ NÁROKY JAKÉKOLI POVAHY PROTI STRANÁM VE
   SPOLEČNOSTI WESTERN DIGITAL ZA UTRPĚNOU ZTRÁTU DAT, NEPŘESNOST VÝSTUPŮ,
   ZPOŽDĚNÍ PRACÍ NEBO ZTRÁTU ZISKU, KTERÉ BY MOHLY VYPLYNOUT Z POUŽÍVÁNÍ
   SLUŽEB NEBO NEMOŽNOSTI POUŽÍVAT SLUŽBY.

   ZAVAZUJETE SE, ŽE BUDETE CHRÁNIT STRANY WESTERN DIGITAL PŘED JAKÝMIKOLI
   NÁROKY A ZAVAZUJETE SE NEDOMÁHAT SE ŽÁDNÝCH NÁROKŮ VŮČI STRANÁM WESTERN
   DIGITAL SOUVISEJÍCÍCH SE SLUŽBAMI. JESTLIŽE BUDETE MÍT JAKÝKOLI PODKLAD
   K VYMÁHÁNÍ NÁHRADY ŠKOD (VČETNĚ PORUŠENÍ TĚCHTO PODMÍNEK POUŽÍVÁNÍ) OD
   KTERÉKOLI STRANY WESTERN DIGITAL VE SPOJENÍ SE SLUŽBAMI NEBO TĚMITO
   PODMÍNKAMI POUŽÍVÁNÍ, SOUHLASÍTE S TÍM, ŽE VAŠE VÝHRADNÍ NÁHRADA ŠKOD
   OD STRAN WESTERN DIGITAL BUDE SPOČÍVAT V NÁHRADĚ DO VÝŠE ODPOVÍDAJÍCÍ
   POPLATKU ZA POSKYTOVÁNÍ SLUŽEB ZA MĚSÍC, VE KTERÉM DOŠLO K PŘEDMĚTNÉMU
   PORUŠENÍ (NEBO NEJVÝŠE DO ČÁSTKY 100,00 USD, POKUD SE NÁROKY BUDOU
   VZTAHOVAT KE SLUŽBÁM POSKYTOVANÝM ZDARMA).

   TOTO OMEZENÍ VZTAHUJÍCÍ SE K ODPOVĚDNOSTI STRAN WESTERN DIGITAL PLATÍ
   BEZ OHLEDU NA TO, ZDA BYLA SPOLEČNOST WESTERN DIGITAL INFORMOVÁNA O
   MOŽNOSTI TAKOVÝCH ZTRÁT NEBO SI TÉTO MOŽNOSTI MOHLA BÝT VĚDOMA. V
   NĚKTERÝCH ZEMÍCH NENÍ VYLOUČENÍ ČI OMEZENÍ NÁHRADY NÁHODNÝCH NEBO
   NÁSLEDNÝCH ŠKOD PŘÍPUSTNÉ, JE TEDY MOŽNÉ, ŽE VÝŠE UVEDENÉ VYLOUČENÍ
   NEBO OMEZENÍ SE NA VÁS NEVZTAHUJE.

Odmítnutí odpovědnosti

   VÝSLOVNĚ BERETE NA VĚDOMÍ A SOUHLASÍTE S TÍM, ŽE POUŽÍVÁTE SLUŽBY NA
   SVÉ VLASTNÍ RIZIKO A ŽE PŘIJÍMÁTE VEŠKERÁ RIZIKA, POKUD JDE O
   USPOKOJIVOU KVALITU, VÝSLEDKY, PŘESNOST A ÚSILÍ. VŠECHNY ČÁSTI SLUŽEB
   JSOU POSKYTOVÁNY SPOLEČNOSTÍ WESTERN DIGITAL NA BÁZI „JAK JSOU“, „SE
   VŠEMI CHYBAMI“ A „PODLE DOSTUPNOSTI“, SE VŠEMI CHYBAMI A BEZ ZÁRUK
   JAKÉHOKOLI DRUHU. WESTERN DIGITAL TÍMTO VÝSLOVNĚ ODMÍTÁ VEŠKERÁ
   PROHLÁŠENÍ, ZÁRUKY A PODMÍNKY SOUVISEJÍCÍ SE SLUŽBAMI (VČETNĚ JEJICH
   POUŽÍVÁNÍ, VÝKONNOSTI A TECHNICKÉ PODPORY), A TO VÝSLOVNÉ,
   PŘEDPOKLÁDANÉ, ZÁKONNÉ NEBO JINÉ, VČETNĚ VŠECH PŘEDPOKLÁDANÝCH ZÁRUK
   VHODNOSTI K URČITÉMU ÚČELU, OBCHODOVATELNOSTI, NÁROKŮ A NE PORUŠOVÁNÍ
   PRÁV JINÝCH OSOB. WESTERN DIGITAL NEVYDÁVÁ ŽÁDNÁ UJIŠTĚNÍ S OHLEDEM NA
   PŘESNOST VÝSLEDKŮ NEBO VÝSTUPU, KTERÉ SE ODVOZUJÍ OD SLUŽEB.

Zásady ochrany autorských práv Copyright a DMCA

   V souladu s hlavou 17, sbírky zákonů Spojených států amerických, část
   512 (c), je zásadou společnosti Western Digital reagovat na oznámení o
   údajném porušení ochrany vlastnických práv podle zákona o ochraně
   vlastnických práv Digital Millennium Copyright Act a dalších platných
   zákonů o duševním vlastnictví.  Plně respektujeme duševní vlastnictví
   jiných osob.  Pokud se domníváte, že vaše dílo bylo zkopírováno
   způsobem, který představuje porušení autorských práv, použijte postupy
   uvedené v našich zásadách autorského práva společnosti.

Zásady používání obchodních značek

   Obchodní značky, loga a servisní značky (souhrnně označené jako
   „značky“) zobrazené při poskytování našich výrobků a služeb jsou
   vlastnictvím společnosti Western Digital nebo třetích stran.  Značky
   společnosti Western Digital mohou být použity pouze za určitých
   omezených okolností a s předchozím písemným souhlasem společnosti
   Western Digital.  Povolení jsou vydávána na bázi jednotlivých případů.
   Všechna schválená použití musí být v souladu s našimi pokyny k
   používání ochranných značek a loga.  Neúplný seznam značek společnosti
   Western Digital najdete zde.

Omezená práva vlády Spojených států

   Služby jsou poskytovány s „OMEZENÝMI PRÁVY“.  Použití, duplikování nebo
   zveřejnění vládou Spojených států amerických podléhá omezením
   stanoveným v předpisech FAR52.227-14 a DFAR252.227-7013 a násl., v
   navazujících předpisech a ve všech ostatních příslušných zákonech.
   Používání služeb vládou Spojených států rovněž znamená uznání našich
   práv k duševnímu vlastnictví obsažených ve službách.

Volba zákona; oddělitelnost

   Jakékoli nároky vyplývající ze služeb nebo související s nimi, včetně
   použití služeb (nebo nemožnosti používat služby), se řídí zákony státu
   Kalifornie bez ohledu na konflikty zákonných zásad.  Souhlasíte s tím,
   že smlouva podléhá výhradní jurisdikci státních a federálních soudů v
   okrese Santa Clara v Kalifornii, které jsou oprávněny řešit všechny
   spory vzniklé v souvislosti s vaším užíváním služeb.  Pokud bude
   kterékoli ustanovení těchto podmínek používání považováno za neplatné,
   neúčinné nebo z jakéhokoli důvodu nevymahatelné, bude předmětné
   ustanovení považováno za oddělitelné a nebude mít vliv na platnost a
   vymahatelnost kteréhokoli zbývajícího ustanovení těchto Podmínek.

   Kalifornští uživatelé služeb jsou oprávněni obdržet následující
   zvláštní oznámení o právech spotřebitelů: Oddělení pro řešení stížností
   divize spotřebitelských služeb Kalifornského ministerstva
   spotřebitelských záležitostí lze kontaktovat písemně na adrese 1625
   North Market Blvd., Suite N 112, Sacramento, CA 95834 nebo telefonicky
   na +1 (800) 952-5210.

Výhledová prohlášení

   Některé informace o našich službách, včetně našich webových stránek,
   jako je investor.wdc.com, mohou obsahovat výhledová prohlášení ve
   smyslu federálních zákonů o cenných papírech, včetně prohlášení o
   budoucích událostech, našich budoucích provozních nebo finančních
   plánech nebo výsledcích, o očekávaném růstu, trendech v našem podnikání
   a na trzích, na kterých působíme, a další charakteristiky budoucích
   událostí nebo okolností.  Všechna tvrzení, která nejsou historickými
   skutečnostmi, vycházejí z našich současných očekávání a podléhají řadě
   rizik a nejistot, které mohou způsobit, že se skutečné výsledky budou
   významně lišit od výsledků vyjádřených nebo předpokládaných v
   výhledových prohlášeních.  Další informace o rizicích a nejistotách,
   které by mohly ovlivnit naše podnikání, jsou uvedeny v našich žádostech
   u Komise pro cenné papíry a burzy („SEC“) a jsou k dispozici na
   internetových stránkách SEC na adrese www.sec.gov, včetně naší nedávno
   podané pravidelné zprávy, na kterou bychom vás rádi upozornili.  Na
   tato výhledová prohlášení byste se neměli nadměrně spoléhat.
   Nepřebíráme žádnou povinnost veřejně aktualizovat nebo revidovat
   jakékoli výhledové prohlášení, ať již v důsledku nových informací,
   budoucího vývoje nebo jinak, s výjimkou požadavků zákona.

Změny služeb

   Společnost Western Digital si vyhrazuje právo dočasně nebo natrvalo
   změnit nebo přerušit služby (nebo kteroukoli jejich část) nebo produkty
   nebo služby popsané v tomto dokumentu kdykoli a bez předchozího
   upozornění.  Při skončení poskytování služeb nebo kterékoli jejich
   části nemá společnost Western Digital žádnou povinnost udržovat nebo
   poskytovat data vašeho obsahu nebo jiné údaje.

Kontaktujte nás

   Máte-li jakékoli dotazy, stížnosti nebo připomínky k těmto podmínkám
   používání, chcete-li získat další informace o službách nebo chcete-li
   kontaktovat Western Digital, obraťte se na nás na stránkách na naší
   kontaktní stránce Western Digital.

     * {{unescape(item.title)}}
          + {{anchor.title}}

   最終更新日：2018年5月28日

   この利用規約（この「利用規約」）は、Western Digital Technologies,
   Inc.、その関連会社の一方または両方（相称して「Western
   Digital」、「当社は」、または「当社の」）により提供されたウェブサイトこうしたウェブサイトで利用できるコンテンツ、機能、素材、ソフトウェ
   ア、関連資料、およびサービス（係るウェブサイト、コンテンツ、機能、素材、ソフトウェア、関連資料、およびサービスであり、相称して「サービス」）の
   利用（以下に記載）を管理します。

   重要 – 注意してお読みください – この利用規約に同意しない場合、サービスを使用する権限はありません。

   利用規約の特定の項を探し、操作の参考となるように、以下の目次をご覧ください:

利用規約の承諾

   サービスを利用することで（以下に定義を記載）、あなたは利用規約により拘束され、あらゆる権力、権限、および許可が必要なことに同意し、管轄権におい
   て最低でも成年であることを表明し、保証します。この利用規約を読み、理解し、同意し、拘束されることに同意します。そしてあなたはサービスの利用に関
   する準拠法および規制に従うことに同意します。

   会社、組織、その他の法人の代表として本サービスを使用している場合、「あなた」という用語にはあなたと法人を含みます。あなたは法人の代わりに利用規
   約に同意し、利用規約に拘束されるため、権限を持つ法人の権限ある代表であることを表明し、保証します。そして係る法人が、あなたの法人と関連する、従
   業員、代理人、または請負業者を含む他者によるユーザーアカウント（以下に定義）の使用、およびサービスの利用に対して法的および財務的責任があること
   に同意します。

解釈

   利用規約の解釈について、動詞の「使用」はアクセス、ブラウザを意味し、ユーザーアカウント（以下に定義）の作成、サービスからコンテンツまたは素材の
   更新、コンテンツまたは素材のダウンロード、またはその他のサービスの使用（名詞の「使用」および「利用」は当然として意味である）である。用語「あな
   た」、「あなたの」という用語は、サービスを使用するユーザーであるあなたを指します。「含む」、「含まれる」、または「含んでいる」という用語へのあ
   らゆる参照は、「制限なし」という言葉に続くものとみなします。

利用規約の変更

   当社は唯一の裁量で本ページを更新することで、いかなるときも、こうした変更を変更することができます。係る変更後サービスを続ける場合、係る変更に拘
   束されます。そのため、利用規約を定期的に読み直すために本ページをご覧ください。変更が許諾できない場合、サービスを継続して利用することが認められ
   ません。

追加条件

   ソフトウェア製品およびサービスを含む、多くの製品およびサービスを提供します。当社ウェブサイトで利用できる製品またはサービスは、その他または追加
   の契約条件（追加条件）に従います。こうした追加条件は、製品またはサービスの購買、ダウンロード、アクセス、ブラウジング、または使用時に提示されて
   いる、もしくは製品またはサービスのウェブサイトに直接掲載されている、関連製品またはサービスと共に利用できます。利用規約は製品またはサービスに適
   用できますが（例:
   当社ウェブサイトで利用できる）、製品またはサービスに適用する追加条件と一致しない範囲において、使機能は利用規約の一致しない条項に優先し、製品ま
   たはサービスに関して管理することとなります。

所有権

   「見て感じる」（例：テキスト、グラフ、画像、および露語）ことを含むサービス、所有者、コンテンツ、情報、およびサービスに含まれるその他の素材は、
   アメリカ合衆国の知的財産、著作権、その他の法、および国際条約を含む法により保護されています。Western Digital
   、当社のライセンサーの一方または両方はすべての権利、称号、サービスへの興味（すべての特許、著作権、企業秘密、商標、ショーハウおよびノウハウ、お
   よび本利用規約に含まれ、または関連するすべてのその他の知的財産権を含みます）を所有することを承諾し、係る所有権と一致しない行為をしないことを同
   意します。

使用規制

   この利用規約において明確に権限が与えられていることを除き、いかなるサービスも著作権所有者の事前の書面による承認、または当社の書面による承認なし
   に電子、機械、複写、記録、またはその他を含むいかなる方法でも、複写、複製、流通、再発行、ダウンロード、表示、投稿、または送信できません。契約条
   件に従い、Western Digitalはここに個人、非商業的のみを目的として、サービスに含まれる素材を使用し、アクセスする制限付き非独占権利
   を付与します。但し、係る素材を修正、再販売、または商業目的に使用しないことを条件とします。利用規約に違反した場合、許可は自動的に消滅します。解
   約をもって、サービスから得たあらゆる素材を直ちに破壊しなければなりません。

   あなたはサービスにある、または含まれる著作権もしくはその他の所有権の告知、または制限付権利に関する表示を削除、または変更せず、サービス、更新、
   またはあらゆる部分（上記の制限が準拠法により禁止される範囲のみを例外とします）のデコンパイル、逆アセンブル、逆コンパイル
   、ディスアセンブル、またはその他のリバースエンジニアリングを行わず、サービスのあらゆる部分の機密のソースコードを発見するための手段を使用せず、
   もしくはサービスへのアクセスまたはサービスの保護を管理する機能を放置しないことを同意します。

   また、違法、有害、脅迫、悪口、嫌がらせ、拷問、中傷、卑猥、猥褻、名誉棄損、他者のプライバシーの侵害、憎しみ、または人種的、民族的、またはその他
   不快なコンテンツをアップロード、投稿、Email、電信、またはそれらを利用できるようにし、もしくは第三者の権利に嫌がらせ、悪口、密かに追跡、脅
   迫、中傷、侵害、その他権利の違反となるように、サービスを利用しないことを同意します。Western
   Digitalは、サービスを使用した結果である嫌がらせ、脅威、
   中傷、攻撃、もしくは違法のメッセージまたは電信に対して、またはあなたの使用に対して責任を持たないことにあなたは同意します。サービスの使用に関す
   る準拠法に故意、または故意を持たずに違反しないことに同意します。上記のいずれかに違反した場合、起訴および損害賠償の対象となることがあります。

   本利用規約に明確に規定されていることを例外として、利用規約に規定されているものが禁反言、推論、またはその他のことにより、ライセンサーの特許また
   はその他の知的財産権が当社から付与されたものと解釈されることはなく、そして、あなたは別紙の書面による同意により係るライセンスを獲得することに関
   して唯一の責任があると同意することを、あなたは承諾します。サービスの不正利用は、著作権法、商標権法、プライバシーおよび宣伝に関する法、そして通
   信の規制および法令に違反することがあります。

アカウントの登録と購読

   当社は、特定の機能またはサービスのセクション（「ユーザーアカウント」）にアカウントを登録することをあなたに要求します。利用可能なサービスのセク
   ションに規定されている登録プロセスを完了し、ユーザーアカウントを作成できます。あなたは、正確および現在の情報を提供する責任があります。

   あなたは、ユーザーアカウントに関して唯一権限を持つユーザーです。あなたには、サービスを使用してあなた、またはWestern
   Digitalにより提供されたパスポート、およびアカウント番号の機密性を維持する責任があります。また、ユーザーアカウントの下発生するあらゆるア
   クティビティに対する責任を持ちます。Western
   Digitalはユーザーのユーザーアカウントの使用を管理せず、そこから派生するあらゆる責任を明確に放棄します。

プライバシーの慣行

   サービスの使用もまた、ここを
   クリックして利用できる、プライバシー規約に従います（プライバシー規約）。プライバシーの慣行については、プライバシー規約をご覧ください。

ユーザーコンテンツライセンスの付与

   サービスを通したコンテンツまたはその他の素材を掲載、アップロード、発行、提出、表示、または電信による（「サービス」）サービスの利用の条件として
   、すべての商業または非商業的目的において現在知られており、または最近開発されたフォーマットまたはメディアで作品にあなたのコンテンツを一体化し、
   あなたのコンテンツから派生的な作品にアクセス、仕様、再現、伝送、表示、発行、配信、公に実行、公に表示、修正、適応、および作成する非独占的、永続
   的、取り消し不能、ロイヤリティーフリー、世界中、譲渡可能、完全に再許諾可能な（サービスのその他のユーザーを含む）ライセンスを、あなたはここにW
   estern
   Digitalに付与します。あなたはすべての著作権を含む、コンテンツへのすべての権利を所有、または管理し、あなたのコンテンツはパブリシティー権
   およびプライバシー権を含む第三者の不適切な知的財産権、または侵害がなく、コンテンツの使用が利用規約またはプライバシー規約に違反せず、個人または
   法人を傷つけないことを、あなたは表明し保証します。当社は、あなた、または第三者によりサービスから提出され、掲載されたコンテンツまたはその他の素
   材に責任を負わず、想定しません。あなたのコンテンツが画像を含む範囲において、係る画像に各個人が記述されている場合には、利用規約に規定されている
   ように画像の利用に同意することをあなたは表明し、保証します。

   当社は唯一の裁量により、係る同意または素材が法または個人の権利、またはサービスの掲載に関して不適切であるか決定することを含み、あらゆる個人に関
   するサービスの素材、または同意を事前に選別、拒否、修正、または排除する権利を保有します。

米国国外からのアクセス

   サービスは合衆国内にある私どものオフィスから制御、運営されています。当社は、サービスが国外での使用において適切または利用可能であることは何ら表
   明しておらず、内容が違法である地域からのアクセスは禁止されています。自らの選択により他の場所から本サービスを利用した場合には、本人の率先により
   行うものであり、その地方における法律を遵守する責任の本人にかかります。さらに、サービスを他の場所で使用した場合には、使用した者は海外輸出入に関
   する規則など、適応するその地方の法律に従う責任があります。お客様は、その中に含まれる資料を含むサービスの一部または全部が、米国輸出管理法および
   規制、米国財務省の外国資産管理局（OFAC）さらにその他の国における輸出法の経済制裁規則の適用を受ける可能性があり、米国その他の該当する国の法
   律に反する本サービスの転用は禁止されていることを承認することになります。お客様は、本サービスまたはその直接製品のいずれも、原子力活動、化学生物
   学的兵器、ミサイルプロジェクトなど、米国政府（またはその他の関係政府）が特別に許可している場合を除き、禁錮または禁輸された国またはその国民に直
   接または間接に取得、出荷、移転、輸出、または再輸出することはないことに同意することになります。お客様はウェブサイトにアクセスすることにより、米
   国政府の禁令の対象となる国または地域の市民または居住者ではなく慣習的に居住していないこと、さらに
   OFACが保有するリスト上の特別に指定された国民や許可されていない人物に挙げられていないことを表明、保証することになります。お客様は、輸出、再
   輸出、輸入に関するすべての法律を遵守し、必要に応じて輸出、再輸出、または輸入するためのライセンスを取得する責任を負うことに同意するものとします
   。

第３者サイトへのリンクとアプリ

   サービスには、第三者のウェブサイトまたはアプリケーションへのリンクが含まれている場合があります。ただし、これらの他のウェブサイトやアプリケーシ
   ョンについては、当社の管理外であり、責任を負いかねますので、ご注意ください。Western
   Digitalは、お客様が本サービスを通じてアクセスできる他のウェブサイトまたはアプリケーションについていかなる表明もしておりません。第３者の
   ウェブサイトまたはアプリケーションにアクセスする場合、これらのサイトはWestern
   Digitalの会社ロゴを表示する場合もありますが、これらのウェブサイトまたはアプリケーションの使用条件に同意したり、ウェブサイトやアプリケー
   ションが無料であったりする際には、ウイルス、ワーム、トロイの木馬、その他の破壊的な性質を持つアイテムが含まれる傾向がありますのでご自身で十分に
   ご注意ください。Western
   Digitalは第三者のウェブサイトまたはアプリケーションに対していかなる場合においてもお客様に対して責任を負いかねます。

責任制限

   当社および当社の取締役、役員、従業員、およびコンサルタント（総称して「Western
   Digital当事者」）は、本ソフトウェアの使用、変更、寄稿、コピー、配布、またはサービスのダウンロード、あるいは上記のいずれもが不可能となっ
   た場合において、　適用される法律によって許可されている最大限の範囲内で責任を負いかねます。Western
   Digital当事者は情報漏洩あるいは不法行為、あるいはWestern
   Digital当事者が上記の損害の可能性について事前に知らされていた場合を除き、いかなる場合においても、間接的、過失的、懲罰的、懲罰的、特別な
   、偶発的　あるいは派生的な損害（データ、収入、利益、その他の経済的利益の損失を含む）に対し、責任を負いかねます。

   お客様は、サービスに関連するデータのバックアップおよび/または使用する機器において適切な保護対策をすることに対する唯一の責任者であり、サービス
   の使用に起因する利益、またはサービスの使用不能による結果データの損失、不正確な結果、作業の遅れ、あるいは失効を理由にWestern
   Digital当事者に対して何らの訴訟をしないことに同意します。

   お客様は、本サービスに関連するいかなる要求に対してもWestern Digital当事者は完全無害であり、これに関してWestern
   Digital当事者を訴訟しないことを誓約同意するものであります。もしお客様が受けた損害の回復責任は、サービスまたは使用条件に関して（これらの
   使用条件の違反を含む）、Western Digital当事者がある根拠をお持ちの場合、お客様は、Western
   Digital当事者からの損害賠償は最高で違反が発生した月の月額サービス手数料に相当する金額（無料のサービスに関連している場合は最高$
   100.00）が支払われます。

   Western Digital当事者の責任に関するこれらの制限は、Western
   Digital当事者がそのような損失の可能性を知っていたかどうか、またはその可能性を知っていたか否かにかかわらず適用されます。一部の州では、偶
   発的または必然的な損害の排除または制限を認めていないため、上記の除外または制限が適用されないことがあります。

放棄声明

   お客様は、サービスの使用が唯一の危険であり、満足のいく品質、性能、正確さ、努力のすべての危険性があなたにあることを明白に認めます。すべてのサー
   ビスは、「現状通り」「すべての不具合あり」「利用可能状態において」の状態に限り、すべての不具合がいかなる保証なしに起こる可能性がある状況下でW
   estern Digitalにより提供されます。Western
   Digitalは、特定の目的、商品性、タイトル、および非侵害性の適合性の黙示担保を含む、明示的、黙示的、法的、またはその他の目的における本サー
   ビスのすべての表明、保証および条件（その使用、性能、およびサポートを含む）をはっきり否認します。Western
   Digitalは、サービスから得られる結果または出力の正確性に関していかなる保証もいたしません。

著作権方針及びDMCA著作権侵害請求　

   米国著作権法第512条（c）の第17条に従い、デジタルミレニアム著作権法およびその他の適用される知的財産法に準拠する侵害の申し立てに対応するの
   はWestern
   Digitalの方針です。我々は他者の知的財産を尊重します。あなたの作品が著作権侵害に該当する形態でコピーされたと思われる場合は、著作権方針（
   Copyright Policy)　に記載されている手順に従ってください。

登録商標使用方針

   当社の商品およびサービスの提供に伴って表示される商標、ロゴおよびサービスマーク（総称して「マーク」といいます）は、Western
   Digitalまたは第三者の財産です。

   Western Digitalのマークは、限定された状況下でのみ使用することができ、Western
   Digitalの事前の書面による承認を得て使用することができます。承認は状況に応じて提供されます。承認下におけるすべての使用は、商標およびロゴ
   使用ガイドライン（Trademark and Logo Usage Guidelines）に厳密に従わなければなりません。Western
   Digitalのマークの抜粋リストについては、ここ（here）をクリックしてください。

米国政府制限権限　

   本サービスには「制限付き権利」が付与されています。合衆国政府による使用、複製、または開示は、FAR52.227-14およびDFAR252.22
   7-7013以降、その後継者またはその他の適用される法律および規制に定められている制限の対象となります。合衆国政府による本サービスの使用は、米
   国政府の所有権の認定を意味します。

法律の選択；分離取り扱い条項　

   サービスの使用（または使用不能）を含むサービスから生じた、またはそれに関連するクレームは、抵触法の原則に関係なく、カリフォルニア州の法律に従い
   ます。お客様は、本サービスの利用に起因または関連するあらゆる紛争の解決のために、カリフォルニア州サンタクララ郡にある州裁判所および連邦裁判所の
   専属管轄権に服することに同意するものとします。本使用条件のいずれかの条項が無効、無効、または何らかの理由で執行不能であるとみなされる場合、その
   条項は切り離し可能とみなされ、本使用条件の残りの条項の有効性および実施可能性に影響しません。

   カリフォルニア州消費者サービス利用者は、以下の特定の消費者権利に関する通知を受け取る権利があります。カリフォルニア州消費者局の消費者サービス部
   門の苦情援助単位は、サクラメントのSuite N 1126 North Market Blvd. 、CA
   95834、または電話（800）952-5210にて入手できます。

将来予測に関する記述　

   investor.wdc.comなどの当社のウェブサイトを含む当社のサービスに関する情報の一部には、予想される成長、当社の事業および当社が事業
   を行っている市場の動向、および将来の出来事または状況のその他の特徴を含む将来の事象、当社の将来の事業または財務計画または業績に関する記述を含む
   連邦証券法の意味での将来見通しに関する記述が含まれる場合があります。過去の事実でないすべての記述は、当社の現在における予想に基づいており、実際
   の結果が将来の見通しに関する記述において表現または暗示されたものと大きく異なる可能性のある多数のリスクおよび不確実性を伴います。もし興味がおあ
   りでしたら、当社の事業に影響を及ぼす可能性のあるリスクと不確実性に関する詳細な情報は、米国証券取引委員会（以下「SEC」）に提出され、定期的な
   最新提出書類を含めてSECのウェブサイトwww.sec.govに掲載されています。これらの将来予測に関する記述に過度の信頼を置くべきではありま
   せん。当社は法律で要求されている場合を除き、新情報、将来の開発、またはその他の結果として、将来の見通しに関する記述を公的に更新または改訂する義
   務を負いません。

サービスの変更について

   Western
   Digitalは、予告なくいつでもサービス（またはその一部）あるいは製品あるいは記載されているサービスを一時的または永久に変更または中止する権
   利を留保します。本サービスまたはその一部を解約した場合、Western
   Digitalはお客様が得られた情報内容またはその他のデータを維持または提供する義務を負いません。

お問い合わせ　

   これらの利用規約についてご質問、苦情、あるいはご意見がおありの際、あるいはサービスについてさらに詳しい情報をお求めの際、あるいはそれ以外の要件
   でWestern Digitalに直接お問い合わせのある際にはWestern Digitalへのお問い合わせページ（Contact
   Western Digital）に記載されている情報に従ってお問い合わせください。

   [ENGLISH | US____________]

QUICK LINKS

     * Company
     * Newsroom
     * Careers
     * Partners
     * Events
     * Investor Relations
     * Western Digital Capital
     * Customer Support

Western Digital Blog

   {{getMergeArray(feed.title, '')}}

   {{getMergeArray(feed.title, '')}}
   PRIVACY | LEGAL | COOKIE STATEMENT | TRADEMARKS
   |

   |
   © 2019 Western Digital Corporation or its affiliates.
   #alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate
   alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate
   alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate
   alternate alternate

   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-MB43D4S

   ____________________ ⚲
   SupportPartnersBlogCompany
     * Products

DATA CENTER
         ______________________________________________________________

       Storage Systems
       All-Flash & Hybrid Storage
       Cloud Object Systems
       Storage Platforms
       JBOF & JBOD
       Storage Servers
       COMPOSABLE INFRASTRUCTURE
       Data Center Drives
       Solid State (SSD)
       Hard Disk (HDD)

Mobility, Edge & Computing
         ______________________________________________________________

       Embedded & Removable Flash
       Automotive
       Connected Home
       Industrial and IoT
       Smartphone & Tablet
       Surveillance
       Internal Drives
       Computing
       Enterprise
       Gaming
       NAS
       Surveillance
       View Products A-Z
   For personal storage solutions visit these Western Digital brands
       At G-Technology® we design some of the highest-performing and most
       reliable leading-edge storage solutions for end-to-end creative
       workflows.
       Every day, millions of people count on the performance, quality,
       and reliability of SanDisk®-branded products.
       Upthere®, a Western Digital brand, is transforming the personal
       storage market by providing a new and better way to keep, find, and
       share what’s important and meaningful.
       WD® is a leading global data storage brand that empowers people to
       create, manage, experience and preserve digital content on a range
       of devices.

Fueled by

Darkness
       The WD BLACK SN750 M.2 NVMe SSD packs a powerful punch, delivering
       read speeds up to 3,470MB/s* to intensify your gaming experience.
       Learn More
       *Up to the stated speed. Values derived from internal testing;
       performance may vary depending upon drive capacity, host device, OS
       and application.
     * Solutions

Industries
         ______________________________________________________________

       Automotive & Transportation
       Banking & Finance
       Government
       Health Care & Research
       Media & Entertainment
       Oil & Gas
       Telecommunications

Use Cases
         ______________________________________________________________

       Application Workload
       Big Data
       Data Protection & Management
       Hybrid Cloud
       IoT & Edge
       Surveillance
       Virtualization
   For personal storage solutions visit these Western Digital brands
       At G-Technology® we design some of the highest-performing and most
       reliable leading-edge storage solutions for end-to-end creative
       workflows.
       Every day, millions of people count on the performance, quality,
       and reliability of SanDisk®-branded products.
       Upthere®, a Western Digital brand, is transforming the personal
       storage market by providing a new and better way to keep, find, and
       share what’s important and meaningful.
       WD® is a leading global data storage brand that empowers people to
       create, manage, experience and preserve digital content on a range
       of devices.
   [header-solutions-image-1-western-digital.png]

ROI in Less Than 3 Months
       Forrester examined the potential ROI your organization may realize
       using IntelliFlash storage.
       Download Now
     * Innovations

Innovations
         ______________________________________________________________

       Our Technology Focus
       Academic Collaborations
       Research publications
   image/svg+xml>
       Enabling a New Era of Open Data-Centric Computing Architectures.
       Learn More

GAME CHANGER SERIES
       Profiling the technologies and innovation that are moving the
       industry forward.
       Learn More
   A History of Innovation

   Contact

     * Products
          + Data Center
               o Storage Systems
                    # All-Flash & Hybrid Storage
                    # Cloud Object Storage
               o Storage Platforms
                    # JBOF & JBOD
                    # Storage Servers
                    # COMPOSABLE INFRASTRUCTURE
               o Data Center Drives
                    # Solid State (SSD)
                    # Hard Disk (HDD)
          + Mobility, Edge & Computing
               o Embedded & Removable Flash
                    # Automotive
                    # Connected Home
                    # Industrial and IoT
                    # Smartphone & Tablet
                    # Surveillance
               o Internal Drives
                    # Computing
                    # Enterprise
                    # Gaming
                    # NAS
                    # Surveillance
          + Personal Storage Solutions
               o G-Technology
               o SanDisk
               o Upthere
               o WD
          + All Products A-Z
     * Solutions
          + Industries
               o Automotive & Transportation
               o Banking & Finance
               o Government
               o Health Care & Research
               o Media & Entertainment
               o Oil & Gas
               o Telecommunications
          + Use Cases
               o Application Workload
               o Big Data
               o Data Protection & Management
               o Hybrid Cloud
               o IoT & Edge
               o Surveillance
               o Virtualization
     * Innovations
          + Our Technology Focus
          + Academic Collaborations
          + Publications
          + Risc-V
          + A History of Innovation
     * Partners
     * Support
     * Company
     * Blog
     * Contact
     * ⚲ ____________________

   NEWS

4.0 is the industry’s new IQ. Is your factory smart enough?

   Industry 4.0 smart factories demand industrial-grade solutions for IoT,
   AI, and ML applications. For that, we’ve got you covered.

   GET SMARTER

   INSIGHTS

Western Digital Releases Corporate Responsibility and Sustainability Report

   Read Report

   NEWS

Introducing the industry’s first open composable compliance lab

   See what’s inside

   NEWS

New: Higher performing, higher capacity platforms

   Discover Ultrastar storage servers

Data Readiness Can Lead to Business Transformation

Data Center

   SYSTEMS

   PLATFORMS

   DATA CENTER
   DRIVES

Mobility, Edge & Computing

   INTERNAL DRIVES

   Embedded &
   Removable Flash

   19.5 Zettabytes

   Estimated cloud data center traffic generated annually by 2021.^1

   $174 Billion

   Projected revenue generated by the global data center market by 2023.^2

   27%

   Predicted CAGR for annual cloud data center traffic through 2021^3.

Capture and Preserve Your Most Valuable Assets

   Visit Our Personal Storage Brands

Depth and Breadth of Expertise Helping Shape Business Outcomes

Meet Western Digital

   Who We Are

Exceptional data challenges require your exceptional skills. Join our team.

   SEARCH JOBS NOW

From World’s First Hard Drive to Recent Advancements in 3D NAND

   OUR HISTORY OF INNOVATION

Research Behind Value: The Fourth V of Data

   Learn More

   AUTOMOTIVE

Better Analytics, Smarter Transportation
     __________________________________________________________________

   feature-image-1-homepage-western-digital

   Western Digital iNAND memory has become an important part of automated
   driver systems with local storage to fit the demanding data needs of
   the vehicle.
   Learn more

     The automotive industry is undergoing significant transformation
     with electrification and the development of autonomous vehicles.
     Companies are gathering as much data as possible to help the machine
     learning (ML) algorithms make smart and lifesaving decisions.

   SURVEILLANCE

AI-Powered Surveillance with High-Capacity Drives
     __________________________________________________________________

   feature-image-2-homepage-western-digital

   We have expanded our surveillance portfolio with the introduction of
   the industry’s highest capacity, deep-learning-capable,
   surveillance-class drive.
   Learn more

Featured Articles from Our Blog

   Visit the western digital blog

   {{getMergeArray(feed.title, '')}}

{{getMergeArray(feed.title, '')}}

   {{getEllipsis(getUnEscapedHTMLContent(getMergeArray(feed.description)),
   180)}}
   Read More

   Disclosures

   1. Source: 95% of global data center traffic will be from the cloud by
   2021 (2/5/2018, TechRepublic)

   2. Source: Data Center Market - Global Outlook and Forecast 2018-2023
   (6/2018, Research and Markets)

   3. Source: Cisco Global Cloud Index: Forecast and Methodology,
   2016–2021 White Paper (11/19/2018, Cisco)

   [ENGLISH | US____________]

QUICK LINKS

     * Company
     * Newsroom
     * Careers
     * Partners
     * Events
     * Investor Relations
     * Western Digital Capital
     * Customer Support

Western Digital Blog

   {{getMergeArray(feed.title, '')}}

   {{getMergeArray(feed.title, '')}}
   PRIVACY | LEGAL | COOKIE STATEMENT | TRADEMARKS
   |

   |
   © 2019 Western Digital Corporation or its affiliates.
   #alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate
   alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate
   alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate
   alternate alternate

   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-MB43D4S

   ____________________ ⚲
   支援合作夥伴部落格公司
     * 產品

資料中心
         ______________________________________________________________

       儲存系統
       全快閃記憶體與混合儲存
       雲端物件系統
       儲存平台
       JBOF 與 JBOD
       儲存伺服器
       組件化基礎架構
       資料中心硬碟
       固態硬碟 (SSD)
       傳統硬碟 (HDD)

行動性、邊緣與運算
         ______________________________________________________________

       嵌入與卸除式快閃記憶體
       汽車
       聯網家居
       工業與物聯網
       智慧型手機與平板電腦
       監視系統
       內接式硬碟
       運算
       企業
       遊戲
       NAS
       監視系統
       檢視產品 A-Z
   如需瞭解個人儲存解決方案，請瀏覽這些 Western Digital 品牌
       在 G-Technology®，我們為各種創意工作流程設計了一些最高效能和最可靠的尖端儲存解決方案。
       每天都有數百萬人仰賴 SanDisk® 品牌產品所提供的效能、品質與可靠性。
       Upthere® (Western Digital 的一個品牌)
       正透過提供全新且更棒的保存、尋找和共用重要的、有意義的資料的方式，改變個人儲存市場。
       WD® 是領先的全球資料儲存裝置品牌，能夠協助人們在廣泛的裝置上建立、體驗及保留數位內容。

強勁推動力：

黑色
       WD BLACK SN750 M.2 NVMe SSD 裝載超強功能，能夠提供高達 3,470MB/s* 的讀取速度來強化遊戲體驗。
       瞭解更多資訊
       *可高達標示速度。值自內部測試得出；效能可能會因硬碟容量、主機裝置、作業系統及應用程式而有所不同。
     * 解決方案

產業
         ______________________________________________________________

       汽車與交通運輸
       銀行與金融
       政府
       醫療保健與研究
       媒體與娛樂
       油氣
       電訊業

使用案例
         ______________________________________________________________

       應用程式工作負載
       大數據
       資料保護與管理
       混合雲端
       物聯網和邊緣
       監視系統
       虛擬化
   如需瞭解個人儲存解決方案，請瀏覽這些 Western Digital 品牌
       在 G-Technology®，我們為各種創意工作流程設計了一些最高效能和最可靠的尖端儲存解決方案。
       每天都有數百萬人仰賴 SanDisk® 品牌產品所提供的效能、品質與可靠性。
       Upthere® (Western Digital 的一個品牌)
       正透過提供全新且更棒的保存、尋找和共用重要的、有意義的資料的方式，改變個人儲存市場。
       在 WD，我們為各種創意工作流程設計了一些最高效能和最可靠的尖端儲存解決方案。
   [header-solutions-image-1-western-digital.png.imgw.319.319.png]

ROI in Less Than 3 Months
       Forrester examined the potential ROI your organization may realize
       using IntelliFlash storage.
       立即下載
     * 創新技術

創新技術
         ______________________________________________________________

       我們的技術重點
       學術協作
       研究出版物
   image/svg+xml>
       開啟新紀元：以開放式資料為中心的計算架構。
         瞭解更多資訊

改變者系列
       分析推動行業發展的技術和創新。
         瞭解更多資訊
   創新歷程

   聯絡方式

     * 產品
          + 資料中心
               o 儲存系統
                    # 全快閃記憶體與混合儲存
                    # 雲端物件儲存
               o 儲存平台
                    # JBOF 與 JBOD
                    # 儲存伺服器
                    # 組件化基礎架構
               o 資料中心硬碟
                    # 固態硬碟 (SSD)
                    # 傳統硬碟 (HDD)
          + 行動性、邊緣與運算
               o 嵌入與卸除式快閃記憶體
                    # 汽車
                    # 聯網家居
                    # 工業與物聯網
                    # 智慧型手機與平板電腦
                    # 監視系統
               o 內接式硬碟
                    # 運算
                    # 企業
                    # 遊戲
                    # NAS
                    # 監視系統
          + 個人儲存解決方案
               o G-Technology
               o SanDisk
               o Upthere
               o WD
          + 所有產品 A-Z
     * 解決方案
          + 產業
               o 汽車與交通運輸
               o 銀行與金融
               o 政府
               o 醫療保健與研究
               o 媒體與娛樂
               o 油氣
               o 電訊業
          + 使用案例
               o 應用程式工作負載
               o 大數據
               o 資料保護與管理
               o 混合雲端
               o 物聯網和邊緣
               o 監視系統
               o 虛擬化
     * 創新技術
          + 我們的技術重點
          + 學術協作
          + 出版物
          + 創新歷程
          + 所有創新技術
     * 合作夥伴
     * 支援
     * 公司
     * 部落格
     * 聯絡方式
     * ⚲ ____________________

   適用於 IoT、5G、8K 時代

ZB 規模資料中心來勢洶洶。您準備好了嗎？

   採用 Zoned Storage，輕鬆過渡至 ZB 規模。這個支援 SMR 與 ZNS 的平台將讓效能、延遲和成本這三者實現新的平衡。

   瞭解 Zoned Storage

   適用於駕車「長征」的儲存設備

我們的高耐久度儲存設備與高效能車輛相得益彰

   瞭解更多資訊

   2019：NVMe 主宰之年

對 NVMe™ 感興趣？ 檢視我們的指南，瞭解所有須知事項

   瞭解更多資訊

   匯集一處

為榮獲“體現 LGBTQ 平等的最佳工作場所”稱號而自豪

   加入我們

資料準備能夠促進業務轉型

資料中心

   系統

   平台

   資料中心
   硬碟

行動性、邊緣與運算

   內接式硬碟

   嵌入式 &
   卸除式快閃記憶體

   19.5 ZB

   到 2021 年，雲端資料中心預計每年產生的流量。^1。

   1740 億美元

   到 2023 年，全球資料中心市場預計產生的收入。^2。

   27%

   到 2021 年，每年的雲端資料中心流量的預計 CAGR。^3。

獲取並保存您最有價值的資產

   了解我們的個人儲存品牌

廣泛且深入的專業知識助力打造業務成果

了解 Western Digital

   我們的定位

更嚴苛的資料挑戰要求您掌握更精進的技術。加入我們

   立即搜尋工作

從第一部硬碟的發明到最近 3D NAND 的進步

   我們的創新歷程

研究背後價值：資料第四個 V 開頭的特點

   瞭解更多資訊

   汽車

深入分析，明智交易
     __________________________________________________________________

   feature-image-1-homepage-western-digital

   Western Digital iNAND 記憶體作為滿足苛刻的汽車資料需求的本機儲存，已成為自動駕駛系統的重要組成部分。
   瞭解更多資訊

     汽車行業正在經歷電氣化和自動車輛開發的重大變革。許多公司正在收集儘可能多的資料，以協助機器學習 (ML)
     演算法做出明智和拯救生命的決定。

   監視系統

配備大容量硬碟的人工智慧型監控
     __________________________________________________________________

   feature-image-2-homepage-western-digital

   藉由採用業界最高的容量、深度學習能力以及監控級硬碟，我們擴展了我們的監控產品組合。
   瞭解更多資訊

我們部落格上的精選文章

   造訪 Western Digital 部落格

   {{getMergeArray(feed.title, '')}}

{{getMergeArray(feed.title, '')}}

   {{getEllipsis(getUnEscapedHTMLContent(getMergeArray(feed.description)),
   180)}}
   閱讀更多內容

   公開事項

   1. 1. 來源：到 2021 年，來自於雲端的全球資料中心流量將佔據總量的 95% (TechRepublic，2018 年 2 月 5
   日)

   2. 來源：資料中心市場 - 2018-2023 年全球展望和預測 (研究與市場，2018 年 6 月)

   3. 來源：Cisco 全球雲端指數：預測與方法，2016–2021 白皮書 (Cisco，2018 年 11 月 19 日)

   [CHINESE | 繁體字_____.....]

快速連結

     * 公司
     * 編輯部
     * 工作機會
     * 合作夥伴
     * 活動
     * 投資人關係
     * Western Digital 資本
     * 客戶支援

Western Digital 部落格

   {{getMergeArray(feed.title, '')}}

   {{getMergeArray(feed.title, '')}}
   隱私權 | 法務 | COOKIE 聲明 | 商標
   |
   ©2019 Western Digital Corporation 或其關聯公司。
   #alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate
   alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate
   alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate
   alternate alternate

   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-MB43D4S

   ____________________ ⚲
   支持合作伙伴博客公司
     * 产品

数据中心
         ______________________________________________________________

       存储系统
       全闪存和混合存储
       云对象系统
       存储平台
       JBOF 和 JBOD
       存储服务器
       组合型基础架构
       数据中心硬盘
       固态硬盘 (SSD)
       机械硬盘 (HDD)

移动性、终端与计算
         ______________________________________________________________

       嵌入式移动闪存卡
       车载
       互联家庭
       工业与 IoT
       智能手机和平板电脑
       监控
       内置硬盘
       计算
       企业
       游戏
       NAS
       监控
       查看产品 (A-Z)
   如需个人存储解决方案，请访问这些 Western Digital 品牌
       G-Technology® 专为端到端创意工作流程设计了一些具有更高性能和更高可靠性的领先存储解决方案。
       每天都有数百万人信赖于闪迪®产品所带来的性能、质量与可靠性。
       Western Digital 旗下品牌 Upthere®
       正在通过提供一种全新和更好的方式保存、发现和分享重要和有意义数据，引领个人存储市场的变革。
       WDC 专为端到端创意工作流程设计了一些具有更高性能和更高可靠性的领先存储解决方案。

妥协

没有
       毫不妥协。无可阻挡。WD Black™ NVMe™ SSD 的连续读写速度分别高达 3,400/s 和
       2,800MB/s*，可满足游戏、视频编辑、虚拟现实等的需求。
       了解更多
       *最高可达标示速度。数值来自内部测试；根据硬盘容量、主机设备、操作系统和应用程序的不同，实际性能可能不同。
     * 解决方案

工业
         ______________________________________________________________

       汽车和运输
       银行和金融
       政府
       医疗保健和研究
       媒体与娱乐
       油气行业
       电信

使用案例
         ______________________________________________________________

       应用工作负载
       大数据
       数据保护和管理
       混合云
       物联网和终端
       监控
       虚拟化
   如需个人存储解决方案，请访问这些 Western Digital 品牌
       G-Technology® 专为端到端创意工作流程设计了一些具有更高性能和更高可靠性的领先存储解决方案。
       每天都有数百万人信赖于闪迪®产品所带来的性能、质量与可靠性。
       Western Digital 旗下品牌 Upthere®
       正在通过提供一种全新和更好的方式保存、发现和分享重要和有意义数据，引领个人存储市场的变革。
       WDC 专为端到端创意工作流程设计了一些具有更高性能和更高可靠性的领先存储解决方案。
   [header-solutions-image-1-western-digital.png.imgw.319.319.png]

ROI in Less Than 3 Months
       Forrester examined the potential ROI your organization may realize
       using IntelliFlash storage.
       立即下载
     * 创新

创新
         ______________________________________________________________

       我们的技术核心
       学术合作
       研究出版物
   image/svg+xml>
       开启新纪元：以开放数据为中心的计算架构
         了解更多

变革系列
       分析正在推动行业发展的技术和创新。
         了解更多
   创新历程

   联系方式

     * 产品
          + 数据中心
               o 存储系统
                    # 全闪存和混合存储
                    # 云对象存储
               o 存储平台
                    # JBOF 和 JBOD
                    # 存储服务器
                    # 组合型基础架构
               o 数据中心硬盘
                    # 固态硬盘 (SSD)
                    # 机械硬盘 (HDD)
          + 移动性、终端与计算
               o 嵌入式移动闪存卡
                    # 车载
                    # 互联家庭
                    # 工业与 IoT
                    # 智能手机和平板电脑
                    # 监控
               o 内置硬盘
                    # 计算
                    # 企业
                    # 游戏
                    # NAS
                    # 监控
          + 个人存储解决方案
               o G-Technology
               o 闪迪
               o Upthere
               o WD
          + 所有产品 (A-Z)
     * 解决方案
          + 工业
               o 汽车和运输
               o 银行和金融
               o 政府
               o 医疗保健和研究
               o 媒体与娱乐
               o 油气行业
               o 电信
          + 使用案例
               o 应用工作负载
               o 大数据
               o 数据保护和管理
               o 混合云
               o 物联网和终端
               o 监控
               o 虚拟化
     * 创新
          + 我们的技术核心
          + 学术合作
          + 出版物
          + 创新历程
          + 所有创新
     * 合作伙伴
     * 支持
     * 公司
     * 博客
     * 联系方式
     * ⚲ ____________________

   适用于物联网、5G、8K 时代

ZB 级数据中心将要到来，您做好准备了吗？

   利用 Zoned Storage，您可以更轻松地过渡到 ZB 级计算。该平台支持 SMR 和 ZNS，可在性能、延迟和成本之间实现新的平衡。

   了解详情

想了解更多关于万亿字节时代的存储核心架构

   报名参加中国闪存市场峰会

   2019：NVMe 之年

对 NVMe™ 感兴趣？ 请查看我们的指南，了解所有须知事项

   了解更多

   广纳百川

被评为“LGBTQ 平等最佳工作场所”令我们深感自豪

   加入我们

充分的数字准备能够引导企业转型

数据中心

   系统

   平台

   数据中心
   硬盘

移动性、终端与计算

   内置硬盘

   嵌入式 &
   可移动闪存

   19.5 ZB

   预估到 2021 年每年产生的云数据中心流量。^1。

   1740 亿美元

   预计到 2023 年全球数据中心市场产生的收入。^2

   27%

   预测到 2021 年年度云数据中心流量的 CAGR。^3。

捕获并保存您最宝贵的信息资产

   查看我们的个人存储品牌

广泛且深入的专业知识助力取得业务成果

了解 Western Digital

   我们的定位

更大的数据挑战要求您掌握更先进的技能。加入我们的团队。

   立即搜索工作

从第一部硬盘的发明到 3D NAND 的最新发展

   我们的创新历程

研究背后价值：数据的第四个 V

   了解更多

   汽车

精准分析，智能交通
     __________________________________________________________________

   feature-image-1-homepage-western-digital

   Western Digital iNAND 闪存作为本地存储，可以满足智能汽车的对数据的严苛需求，已成为自动驾驶系统的重要组成部分。
   了解更多

     汽车行业正在经历电气化和自动驾驶车辆开发方面的重大变革。各个公司都在尽可能收集更多的数据，协助机器学习 (ML)
     算法做出明智且能挽救生命的决策。

   监控

借助高容量硬盘的人工智能监控
     __________________________________________________________________

   feature-image-2-homepage-western-digital

   藉由采用业界最高容量且具有深度学习能力的监控级硬盘，我们扩展了监控产品组合。
   了解更多

来自我们博客的精选文章

   访问 Western Digital 博客

   {{getMergeArray(feed.title, '')}}

{{getMergeArray(feed.title, '')}}

   {{getEllipsis(getUnEscapedHTMLContent(getMergeArray(feed.description)),
   180)}}
   了解详情

   披露

   1.  来源：95% of global data center traffic will be from the cloud by
   2021（到 2021 年，95% 的全球数据中心流量将来自云，2018 年 2 月 5 日，TechRepublic）

   2.  来源：Data Center Market - Global Outlook and Forecast
   2018-2023（2018-2023 年数据中心市场 - 全球展望和预测分析，2018 年 6 月，市场研究）

   3.  来源：Cisco Global Cloud Index: Forecast and Methodology, 2016–2021
   White Paper（Cisco 全球云指数：预测和方法，2016-2021 年白皮书，2018 年 11 月 19 日，Cisco）

   [CHINESE | 简化字_____.....]

快速链接

     * 公司
     * 新闻
     * 招聘信息
     * 合作伙伴
     * 活动
     * 投资者关系
     * Western Digital Capital
     * 客户支持

Western Digital Blog

   {{getMergeArray(feed.title, '')}}

   {{getMergeArray(feed.title, '')}}
   隐私 | 法律 | COOKIE 声明 | 商标
   |
   © 2019 Western Digital Corporation 或其关联公司。
   #alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate
   alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate
   alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate alternate
   alternate alternate

   IFRAME: //www.googletagmanager.com/ns.html?id=GTM-MB43D4S

   ____________________ ⚲
   지원파트너블로그회사
     * 제품

데이터 센터
         ______________________________________________________________

       스토리지 시스템
       올플래시 및 하이브리드 스토리지
       클라우드 오브젝트 시스템
       스토리지 플랫폼
       JBOF 및 JBOD
       스토리지 서버
       구성 가능 인프라
       데이터 센터 드라이브
       솔리드 스테이트(SSD)
       하드 디스크(HDD)

휴대 및 에지, 컴퓨팅
         ______________________________________________________________

       임베디드 이동식 플래시
       자동차
       커넥티드 홈
       산업 및 IoT
       스마트폰 및 태블릿
       감시 시스템
       내장형 드라이브
       컴퓨팅
       엔터프라이즈
       게임
       NAS
       감시 시스템
       제품 보기(A-Z 순)
   Western Digital 브랜드의 개인용 스토리지 솔루션 알아보기
       G-Technology®는 크리에이티브 작업 흐름 전체에 걸쳐 최고 성능을 갖춘 가장 안정적인 첨단 기술 스토리지
       솔루션을 설계합니다.
       매일 수백만 명의 사용자가 SanDisk® 브랜드 제품의 성능, 품질, 안정성을 신뢰하고 있습니다.
       Western Digital 브랜드인 Upthere®는 중요하고 의미있는 컨텐츠를 보관, 검색 및 공유할 수 있도록
       개선된 방법을 제공하여 개인용 스토리지 시장을 변화시키고 있습니다.
       WD®는 선도적인 글로벌 데이터 스토리지 브랜드로 사용자가 다양한 장치에서 디지털 컨텐츠를 작성과 관리, 운용 및 보존
       할 수 있도록 지원합니다.

어둠으로

채우라
       WD BLACK SN750 M.2 NVMe SSD는 읽기 속도 최대 3470MB/s*를 제공하는 강력한 성능을 발휘하여
       게임 환경을 강화시켜 줍니다.
       자세히 알아보기
       *최대 공인 속도. 측정 값은 내부 테스트를 기반으로 하며 성능은 드라이브 용량, 호스트 장치, OS 및 애플리케이션에
       따라 다를 수 있습니다.
     * 솔루션

산업
         ______________________________________________________________

       자동차 및 운송
       은행 및 금융
       정부
       의료 및 리서치
       미디어 및 엔터테인먼트
       석유 및 가스
       통신

사용 케이스
         ______________________________________________________________

       애플리케이션 작업 부하
       빅 데이터
       데이터 보호 및 관리
       하이브리드 클라우드
       IoT 및 에지
       보안 시스템
       가상화
   Western Digital 브랜드의 개인용 스토리지 솔루션 알아보기
       G-Technology®는 크리에이티브 작업 흐름 전체에 걸쳐 최고 성능을 갖춘 가장 안정적인 첨단 기술 스토리지
       솔루션을 설계합니다.
       매일 수백만 명의 사용자가 SanDisk® 브랜드 제품의 성능, 품질, 안정성을 신뢰하고 있습니다.
       Western Digital 브랜드인 Upthere®는 중요하고 의미있는 컨텐츠를 보관, 검색 및 공유할 수 있도록
       개선된 방법을 제공하여 개인용 스토리지 시장을 변화시키고 있습니다.
       WDC는 크리에이티브 작업 흐름 전체에 걸쳐 최고 성능을 갖춘 가장 안정적인 첨단 기술 스토리지 솔루션을 설계합니다.
   [header-solutions-image-1-western-digital.png.imgw.319.319.png]

ROI in Less Than 3 Months
       Forrester examined the potential ROI your organization may realize
       using IntelliFlash storage.
       지금 다운로드
     * 혁신

혁신
         ______________________________________________________________

       Western Digital 기술 주안점
       산학협력
       연구 간행물
   image/svg+xml>
       개방형 데이터 중심 컴퓨팅 아키텍처의 새로운 시대의 시작
         자세히 알아보기

획기적인 혁신 시리즈
       업계를 발전시키는 기술과 혁신의 프로파일.
         자세히 알아보기
   혁신의 역사

   연락처

     * 제품
          + 데이터 센터
               o 스토리지 시스템
                    # 올플래시 및 하이브리드 스토리지
                    # 클라우드 오브젝트 스토리지
               o 스토리지 플랫폼
                    # JBOF 및 JBOD
                    # 스토리지 서버
                    # 구성 가능 인프라
               o 데이터 센터 드라이브
                    # 솔리드 스테이트(SSD)
                    # 하드 디스크(HDD)
          + 휴대 및 에지, 컴퓨팅
               o 임베디드 이동식 플래시
                    # 자동차
                    # 커넥티드 홈
                    # 산업 및 IoT
                    # 스마트폰 및 태블릿
                    # 보안 시스템
               o 내장형 드라이브
                    # 컴퓨팅
                    # 엔터프라이즈
                    # 게임
                    # NAS
                    # 보안 시스템
          + 개인용 스토리지 솔루션
               o G-Technology
               o SanDisk
               o Upthere
               o WD
          + 모든 제품(A-Z 순)
     * 솔루션
          + 산업
               o 자동차 및 운송
               o 은행 및 금융
               o 정부
               o 의료 및 리서치
               o 미디어 및 엔터테인먼트
               o 석유 및 가스
               o 통신
          + 사용 케이스
               o 애플리케이션 작업 부하
               o 빅 데이터
               o 데이터 보호 및 관리
               o 하이브리드 클라우드
               o IoT 및 에지
               o 보안 시스템
               o 가상화
     * 혁신
          + Western Digital 기술의 주안점
          + 산학협력
          + 간행물
          + 혁신의 역사
          + 모든 혁신
     * 파트너
     * 지원
     * 회사
     * 블로그
     * 연락처
     * ⚲ ____________________

   IoT, 5G, 8K Age를 위해

Zettascale 데이터 센터. 준비되셨습니까?

   존 스토리지(Zoned Storage)로 보다 쉽게 zettascale로 전환하세요. SMR과 ZNS를 지원하는 단일 플랫폼에서
   성능과 지연, 비용의 새로운 균형을 제공합니다.

   존에 들어가기

   라이딩을 위한 스토리지

고성능 차량을 위한 내구성이 뛰어난 스토리지

   자세히 알아보기

   2019년은 NVMe의 해

NVMe™가 궁금하신가요? 여기 알아야할 모든 것을 담은 가이드가 있습니다

   자세히 알아보기

   모두를 위한 장소

‘Best Place to Work for LGBTQ Equality’(LGBTQ 차별 없는 최고의 직장)로 선정되어 영광으로 생각합니다

   참여하기

데이터 준비를 통한 비즈니스 변혁

데이터 센터

   시스템

   플랫폼

   데이터 센터
   드라이브

휴대 및 에지, 컴퓨팅

   내장형 드라이브

   임베디드 &
   이동식 플래시

   19.5제타바이트

   2021년까지 발생할 것으로 예상되는 클라우드 데이터 센터 트래픽량^1입니다.

   1740억 달러

   2023년까지 전세계 데이터 센터 시장에서 발생이 예상되는 수익 총액^2 수 입니다.

   27%

   2021년까지의 연간 클라우드 데이터 센터 트래픽에 대한 CAGR의 예측^3입니다.

가장 소중한 자산을 캡처하고 보존

   개인용 스토리지 브랜드 알아보기

구체화된 비즈니스 성과를 이끄는 깊고 넓은 전문성

Western Digital를 만나십시오

   우리는

예외적인 데이터 문제는 탁월한 기술을 요구합니다. 함께하세요.

   지금 구인 정보 검색하기

세계 최초 하드 드라이브에서 3D NAND의 최신 개발까지

   혁신의 역사

가치를 넘어서는 연구: 데이터의 네 번째 V

   자세히 알아보기

   자동차

더 나은 분석, 똑똑해진 교통 수단
     __________________________________________________________________

   feature-image-1-homepage-western-digital

   Western Digital iNAND 메모리는 자동차의 까다로운 데이터 요구 사항에 맞는 로컬 스토리지로써 자동 주행 시스템의
   중요한 부분이 되었습니다.
   자세히 알아보기

     자동차 업계는 전기화 및 자율 차량 개발로 인해 엄청난 변혁이 진행되고 있습니다. 회사들은 가능한 한 많은 데이터를
     수집하여 머신 러닝(ML) 알고리즘을 통해 인명을 구조할 수 있는 현명한 의사결정을 돕고자 합니다.

   감시 시스템

대용량을 사용하는 AI 지원 감시 시스템
     __________________________________________________________________

   feature-image-2-homepage-western-digital

   업계 최고 용량의 딥 러닝 가능한 보안 등급 드라이브를 도입하여 감시 시스템 포트폴리오를 확장했습니다.
   자세히 알아보기

블로그의 추천 기사

   Western Digital 블로그 방문하기

   {{getMergeArray(feed.title, '')}}

{{getMergeArray(feed.title, '')}}

   {{getEllipsis(getUnEscapedHTMLContent(getMergeArray(feed.description)),
   180)}}
   자세히 읽기

   공개 정보

   1. 출처: 95% of global data center traffic will be from the cloud by
   2021(TechRepublic, 2018년 2월 5일)

   2. 출처: Data Center Market - Global Outlook and Forecast
   2018-2023(Research and Markets, 2018년 6월)

   3. 출처: Cisco Global Cloud Index: Forecast and Methodology, 2016–2021
   White Paper(Cisco, 2018년 11월 19일)

   [KOREAN | 한국어______......]

빠른 링크

     * 회사
     * 뉴스룸
     * 채용 정보
     * 파트너
     * 이벤트
     * 투자자 정보
     * Western Digital 캐피탈
     * 고객 지원

Western Digital 블로그

   {{getMergeArray(feed.title, '')}}

   {{getMergeArray(feed.title, '')}}
   개인정보 보호 | 법률 | 쿠키 정책 | 상표
   |
   © 2019 Western Digital Corporation 또는 해당 계열사.
